

A NARROW grave-yard in the heart of a 
bustling, indifferent city, seen from the 
windows of a gloomy-looking inn, is at no 
time an object of enlivening suggestion ; and 
the spectacle is not at its best when the 
mouldy tombstones and funereal umbrage 
have received the ineffectual refreshment of 
a dull, moist snow-fall. If, while the air is 
thickened by this frosty drizzle, the calendar 
should happen to indicate that the blessed 
vernal season is already six weeks old, it will 
be admitted that no depressing influence is 
absent from the scene* This fact was 
keenly felt on a certain 12th of May, 
upwards of thirty years since, by a lady who 

B 



2 . . 

Stood looking out of one of the windows of 
the best hotel in the ancient city of Boston. 
She had stood there for half-an-hour — stood 
there, that is, at inten^als ; for from time to 
time she turned back into the room and 
measured its length with a resdess step. In 
the chimney-place was a red-hot fire, which 
emitted a small blue flame ; and in front of 
the fire, at a table, sat a young man who 
was busily plying a pencil. He had a 
number of sheets of paper cut into small 
equal squares, and he was apparently cover- 
ing them with pictorial designs — strange- 
looking figures. He worked rapidly and 
attentively, sometimes threw back his head 
and held out his drawing at arm's-length? 
and kept up a soft, gay-sounding humming 
and whistling. The lady brushed past him 
in her walk ; her much-trimmed skirts were 
voluminous. She never dropped her eyes 
upon his work; she only turned them, 
occasionally, as she passed, to a mirror 
suspended above a toilet-table on the other 
side of the room. Here she paused a 



 . 3 

moment, gave a pinch to her waist with 
her two hands, or raised these members — 
they were very plump and pretty — to the 
multifold braids of her hair, with a move- 
ment half-caressing, half-corrective* An 
attentive observer might have fancied that 
during these periods of desultory self- 
inspection her face forgot its melancholy; 
but as soon as she neared the window again 
it began to procldm that she was a very ill- 
pleased woman. And indeed in what met 
her eyes there was little to be pleased with. 
The window-panes were battered by the 
sleet; the head-stones in the grave-yard 
beneath seemed to be holding themselves 
askance to keep .it out of their faces. A tall 
iron railing protected them from the street, 
and on the other side of the railing an 
assemblage of Bostonians were trampling 
about in the liquid snow. Many of them 
were looking up and down; they appeared 
to be waiting for something. From time to 
time a strange vehicle drew near to the place 

where they stood, — ^such a vehicle as the 

B 2 



4 . . 

lady at the window, in spite of a consider- 
able acquaintance with human inventions, 
had never seen before : a huge, low omni- 
bus, painted in brilliant colours, and decor- 
ated apparently with jingling bells, attached 
to a species of groove in the pavement, 
through which it was dragged, with a great 
deal of rumbling, bouncing, and scratching, 
by a couple of remarkably small horses. 
When it reached a certain point the people 
in front of the grave-yard, of whom much 
the greater number were women, carrying 
satchels and parcels, projected themselves 
upon it in a compact body: — a movement 
suggesting the scramble for places in a life- 
boat at sea — and were engulfed in its large 
interior. Then the life-boat — or the Ufe- 
car, as the lady at the window of the hotel 
vaguely designated it — went bumping and 
jingling away upon its invisible wheels, with 
the helmsman (the man at the wheel) guiding 
its course incongruously from the prow. 
This phenomenon was repeated every three 
minutes, and the supply of eagerly-moving 



 . S 

women in cloaks, bearing reticules and 
bundles, renewed itself in the most liberal 
manner. On the other side of the grave- 
yard was a row of small red-brick houses, 
showing a series of homely, domestic- 
looking backs; at the end opposite the 
hotel a tall wooden church-spire, painted 
white, rose high into the vagueness of the 
snow-flakes. The lady at the window 
looked at it for some time; for reasons of 
her own she thought it the ugliest thing she 
had ever seen. She hated it, she despised 
it ; it threw her into a state of irritation that 
was quite out of proportion to any sensible 
motive. She had never known herself to 
care so much about church-spires. 

She was not pretty; but even when it 
expressed perplexed irritation her face was 
most interesting and agreeable. Neither 
was she in her first youth; yet, though 
slender, with a great deal of extremely well- 
fashioned roundness of contour — a sugges- 
tion both of maturity and flexibility — she 
carried her three-and- thirty years as a light- 



6 . . 

wristed Hebe might have carried a brim- 
ming wine-cup. Her complexion was 
fatigued, as the French say; her mouth was 
large, her lips too full, her teeth uneven, her 
chin rather commonly modelled ; she had a 
thick nose, and when she smiled — she was 
constantly smiling — the lines beside it rose 
too high, toward her eyes. But these eyes 
were charming: gray in colour, brilliant, 
quickly glancing, gently resting, full of 
intelligence. Her forehead was very low — 
it was her only handsome feature ; and she 
had a great abundance of crisp dark hair, 
finely frizzled, which was always braided in a 
manner that suggested some Southern or 
Eastern, some remotely foreign, woman. 
She had a large collection of ear-rings, and 
wore them in alternation ; and they seemed 
to give a point to her Oriental or exotic 
aspect. A compliment had once been paid 
her which, being repeated to her, gave her 
greater pleasure than anything she had ever 
heard. " A pretty woman ? " some one had 
said. "Why, her features are very bad." 



 . 7 

^^ I don't know about her features," a very 
discerning observer had answered ; " but she 
carries her head like a pretty woman." You 
may imagine whether, after this, she carried 
her head less becomingly. 

She turned away from the window at 
last, pressing her hands to her eyes. 
" It's too horrible ! " she exclaimed. " I 
shall go back — I shall go back!" And 
she flung herself into a chair before the fire. 

" Wait a little, dear child," said the young 
man softly, sketching away at his little 
scraps of paper. 

The lady put out her foot ; it was very 
small and there was an immense rosette on 
her slipper. She fixed her eyes for a while 
on this ornament, and then she looked at 
the glowing bed of anthracite coal in the 
grate. "Did you ever see anything so 
hideous as that fire?" she demanded. 
" Did you ever see anything so — so qffreux 
as — as everything ? " She spoke English 
with perfect purity; but she brought out 
this French epithet in a manner that 



S . . 

indicated that she was accustomed to using 
French epithets. 

" I think the fire is very pretty/' said the 
young man, glancing at it a moment. 
"Those little blue tongues, dancing on top 
of the crimson embers, are extremely pictur- 
esque. They are like a fire in an alchemist's 
laboratory." 

"You are too good-natured, my dear," 
his companion declared. 

The young man held out one of his 
drawings, with his head on one side. His 
tongue was gently moving along his under- 
lip. "Good-natured — yes. Too good- 
natured — no." 

" You are irritatmg," said the lady, 
looking at her slipper. 

He began to retouch his sketch. "I 
think you mean simply that you are irri- 
tated." 

" Ah, for that, yes ! ' said his companion, 
with a little bitter laugh. "It's the darkest 
day of my life — and you know what that 



means." 



 . 9 

" Wait till to-morrow," rejoined the young 
man. 

"Yes, we have made a great mistake. If 
there is any doubt about it to-day, there 
certainly will be none to-morrow. Ce sera 
clair, au moins 1 " 

The young man was silent a few moments, 
driving his pencil. Then at last, "There 
are no such things as mistakes," he affirmed. 

" Very true — for those who are not clever 
enough to perceive them. Not to recognize 
one's mistakes — that would be happiness in 
life," the lady went on, still looking at her 
pretty foot. 

" My dearest sister," said the young man, 
always intent upon his drawing, "it's the 
first time you have told me I am not 
clever." 

" Well, by your own theory I can't call it 
a mistake," answered his sister, pertinently 
enough. 

The young man gave a clear, fresh laugh. 
" You, at least, are clever enough, dearest 
sister," he said 



lo . . 

" I was not so when I proposed this." 

•^ Was it you who proposed it ? " asked her 
brother. 

She turned her head and gave him a little 
stare. " Do you desire the credit of it ? " 

"If you like, I will take the blame," he 
said, looking up with a smile. 

" Yes," she rejoined in a moment, " you 
make no difference in these things. You 
have no sense of property." 

The young man gave his joyous laugh 
again. " If that means I have no property, 
you are right ! " 

"Don't joke about your poverty," said his 
sister. " That is quite as vulgar as to boast 
about it." 

"My poverty! I have just finished a 
drawing that will bring me fifty francs I " 

"Voyons," said the lady, putting out her 
hand. 

He added a touch or two, and then gave 
her his sketch. She looked at it, but she 
went on with her idea of a moment before. 
" If a woman were to ask you to marry her 



 . ii 

you would say, ^Certainly, my dear, with 
pleasure ! ' And you would marry her, and 
be ridiculously happy. Then at the end of 
three months you would say to her, ^You 
know that blissful day when I begged you 
to be mine ! ' " 

The young man had risen from the table, 
stretching his arms a little; he walked to 
the window. "That is a description of a 
charming nature," he said. 

" Oh, yes, you have a charming nature ; I 
regard that as our capital. If I had not 
been convinced of that I should never have 
taken the risk of bringing you to this 
dreadful country." 

"This comical country, this delightful 
country ! ** exclaimed the young man ; 
and he broke into the most animated 
laughter. 

" Is it those women scrambling into the 
omnibus?" asked his companion. "What 
do you suppose is the attraction ? " 

"I suppose there is a very good-looking 
man inside," said the young man. 



12 . . 

" In each of them ? They come along in 
hundreds, and the men in this country don't 
seem at all handsome. As for the women 
— I have never seen so many at once since I 
left the convent." 

"The women are very pretty," her 
brother declared, "and the whole affair is 
very amusing. I must make a sketch of it." 
And he came back to the table quickly, and 
picked up his utensils — a small sketching- 
board, a sheet of paper, and three or four 
crayons. He took his place at the window 
with these things, and stood there glancing 
out, plying his pencil with an air of easy 
skill. While he worked he wore a brilliant 
smile. Brilliant is indeed the word at this 
moment for his strongly-lighted face. He 
was eight-and-twenty years old; he had a 
short, slight, well-made figure. Though he 
bore a noticeable resemblance to his sister, 
he was a better-favoured person : fair-haired, 
clear-faced, witty-looking, with a delicate 
finish of feature and an expression at once 
urbane and not at all serious, a warm blue 



 . 13 

eye, an eyebrow finely drawn and excessively 
arched — an eyebrow which, if ladies wrote 
sonnets to those of their lovers, might have 
been made the subject of such a piece of 
verse — and a light moustache that flourished 
upwards as if blown that way by the breath 
of a constant smile. There was something 
in his physiognomy at once benevolent and 
picturesque. But, as I have hinted, it was 
not at all serious. The young man's face 
was, in this respect, singular; it was not 
at all senous, and yet it inspired the liveliest 
confidence. 

^^Be sure you put in plenty of snow," 
said his sister. "Bonte divine, what a 
climate ! " 

"I shall 'leave the sketch all white, 
and I shall put in the little figures in 
black," the young man answered, laughing. 
" And I shall call it — what is that 
Ime in Keats? — Mid-May's Eldest 
Child ! " 

"I don't remember," said the lady, 
'^ that mamma ever told me it was like this." 



14 . . 

^* Mamma never told you anything dis- 
agreeable. And it's not like this — every day. 
You will see that to-morrow we shall have a 

splendid day." 

" Qu'en savez-vous ? To-morrow I shall 
go away." 

" Where shall you go ? " 

"Anywhere away from here. Back to 
Silberstadt. I shall write to the Reigning 
Prince." 

The young man turned a little and looked 
at her, with his crayon poised. " My dear 
Eugenia," he murmured, "were you so 
happy at sea ? " 

Eugenia got up; she still held in her 
hand the drawing her brother had given her. 
It was a bold, expressive sketch of a group 
of miserable people on the deck of a 
steamer, clinging together and- clutching at 
each other, while the vessel lurched down- 
ward, at a terrific angle, into the hollow of a 
wave. It was extremely clever, and full 
of a sort of tragicomical power. Eugenia 
dropped her eyes upon it and made a sad 



1.] . 15 

grimace. " How can you draw such odious 
scenes?" she asked. "I should like to 
throw it into the fire ! " And she tossed the 
paper away. Her brother watched, quietly, 
to see where it went. It fluttered down to 
the floor, where he let it lie. She came 
toward the window, 'pinching in her waist. 
" Why don't you reproach me — abuse me ?" 
she asked. "I think I should feel better 
then. Why don't you tell me that you hate 
me for bringing you here ? " 

"Because you would not believe it. I 
adore you, dear sister ! I am delighted to be 
here, and I am charmed with the pros- 
pect." 

" I don't know what had taken possession 
of me. I had lost my head," Eugenia 
went on. 

The young man, on his side, went on 
plying his pencil. "It is evidently a most 
curious and interesting country. Here we 
are, and I mean to enjoy it." 

His companion turned away with an 
impatient step, but presently came back. 



i6 . . 

"High spirits are doubtless an excellent 
thing," she said; "but you give one too 
much of them, and I can't see that they 
have done you any good." 

The young man stared, with lifted eye- 
brows, smiling; he tapped his handsome 
nose with his pencil. "They have made 
me happy ! " 

" That was the least they could do ; they 
have made you nothing else. You have 
gone through life thanking fortune for such 
very small favours that she has never put 
herself to any trouble for you." 

" She must have put herself to a Uttle, I 
think, to present me with so admirable a 
sister. 

"Be serious, Felix. You forget that I 
am your elder." 

"With a sister, then, so elderly!" re- 
joined Felix, laughing. "I hoped we had 
left seriousness in Europe." 

" I fancy you will find it here. Remem- 
ber that you are nearly thirty years old, 
and that you are nothing but an obscure 



 . 17 

Bohemian — a penniless correspondent of an 
illustrated paper." 

" Obscure as much as you please, but not 
so much of a Bohemian as you think. And 
not at all penniless! I have a hundred 
pounds in my pocket ; I have an engage- 
ment to make fifty sketches, and I mean to 
paint the portraits of all our cousins, and 
of all their cousins, at a hundred dollars a 
head." 

" You are not ambitious," said Eugenia. 

" You are, dear Baroness," the young man 
replied. 

The Baroness was silent a moment, look- 
ing out at the sleet-darkened grave-yard 
and the bumping horse-cars. "Yes, I am 
ambitious," she said at last. "And my 
ambition has brought me to this dread- 
tul place!" She glanced about her — the 
room had a certain vulgar nudity, the bed 
and the window were curtainless — and she 
gave a little passionate sigh. "Poor old 
ambition ! " she exclaimed. Then she flung 
herself down upon a sofa which stood near 



1 8 . . 

against the wall, and covered her face with 
her hands. 

Her brother went on with his drawing, 
rapidly and skilfully ; and after some 
moments he sat down beside her and showed 
her his sketch. "Now, don't you think 
that's pretty good for an obscure Bohe- 
mian?" he asked. "I have knocked off 
another fifty francs." 

Eugenia glanced at the little picture as he 
laid it on her lap. " Yes, it is verj^ clever," 
she said. And in a moment she added, 
" Do you suppose our cousins do that ? " 

" Do what ? " 

"Get into those things, and look like 
that." 

Felix meditated a while. " I really can't 
say. It will be interesting to discover." 

"Oh, the rich people can't!" said the 
Baroness. 

"Are you very sure they are rich? 
asked Felix, lightly. 

His sister slowly turned in her place, 
looking at him. ** Hea%-cnly powers ! " she 



^ *» 



 . 19 

murmured. ^ You have a way of bringing 
out things I " 

"It will certainly be much pleasanter if 
they are rich," Felix declared. 

"Do you suppose if I had not known 
they were rich I would ever have come ? " 

The young man met his sister's somewhat 
peremptory eye with his bright, contented 
glance. "Yes, it certainly will be plea- 
santer," he repeated. 

"That is all I expect of them," said the 
Baroness. " I don't count upon their being 
clever or friendly — at first — or elegant or 
interesting. But I assure you I insist upon 
their being rich." 

Felix leaned his head upon the back of 
the sofa and looked a while at the oblong 
patch of sky to which the window served as 
frame. The snow was ceasing; it seemed 
to him that the sky had begun to brighten. 
" I count upon their being rich," he said at 
last, " and powerful, and clever, and friendly, 
and elegant, and interesting, and generally 
delightful! Tu vas voir." And he bent 



c 2 



20 . [cn. 

forward and kissed his sister. " Look 
there ! " he went on. " As a portent, even 
while I speak, the sky is turning the 
colour of gold; the day is going to be 
splendid." 

And indeed, within five minutes the 
weather had changed. The sun broke out 
through the snow-clouds and jumped into 
the Baroness's room. "Bonte divine," ex- 
claimed this lady, " what a cUmate ! " 

"We will go out and see the world," said 
Felix. 

And after a while they went out. The 
air had grown warm, as well as brilliant ; 
the sunshine had dried the pavements. 
They walked about the streets at hazard, 
looking at the people and the houses, the 
shops and the vehicles, the blazing blue sky 
and the muddy crossings, the hurr)ung men 
and the slow-strolling maidens, the fresh 
red bricks and the bright green trees, the 
extraordinary mixture of smartness and 
shabbiness. From one hour to another the 
day had grown vernal ; even in the bustling 



 . it 

Streets there was an odour of earth and 
blossom. Felix was immensely entertained. 
He had called it a comical country, and he 
went about laughing at everything he saw. 
You would have said that American civiliza- 
tion expressed itself to his sense in a tissue 
of capital jokes. The jokes were certainly 
excellent, and the young man's merriment 
was very joyous and genial. He possessed 
what is called the pictorial sense, and this 
first glimpse of democratic manners stirred 
the same sort of attention that he would 
have given to the movements of a lively 
young person with a bright complexion. 
Such attention would have been demon- 
strative and complimentary; and in the 
present case Felix might have passed for an 
undispirited young exile revisiting the 
haunts of his childhood. He kept looking 
at the violet blue of the sky, at the scintil- 
lating air, at the scattered and multipUed 
patches of colour. 

" Comme c'est bariole, eh ? " he said to his 
sister in that foreign tongue which they both 



32 . . 

appeared to feel a mysterious prompting 
occasionally to use. 

"Yes, it is bariole indeed," the Baroness 
answered. "I don't like the colouring; it 
hurts my eyes." 

" It shows how extremes meet," the young 
man rejoined. "Instead of coming to the 
West we seem to have gone to the East. 
The way the sky touches the house-tops is 
just like Cairo; and the red and blue sign- 
boards patched over the face of everything 
remind one of Mahometan decoration." 

"The yoimg women are not Mahom- 
etan," said his companion. " They can't be 
said to hide their faces. I never saw any- 
thing so bold." 

"Thank heaven they don't hide their 
faces!" cried Felix. "Their faces are 
uncommonly pretty." 

"Yes, their faces are often very pretty," 
said the Baroness, who was a very clever 
woman. She was too clever a woman not 
to be capable of a great deal of just and fine 
observation. She clung more closely than 



 . 23 

usual to her brother's arm; she was not 
exhilarated, as he was; she said very little, 
but she noted a great many things and made 
her reflections. She was a little excited; 
she felt that she had indeed come to a 
strange country, to make her fortune. Super- 
ficially, she was conscious of a good deal of 
irritation and displeasure; the Baroness was 
a very delicate and fastidious person. Of 
old, more than once, she had gone, for enter- 
tainment's sake and in brilliant company, to 
a fair in a provincial town. It seemed to her 
now that she was at an enormous fair, — that 
the entertainment and the desagrements were 
very much the same. She found herself 
alternately smiling and shrinking ; the show 
was very curious, but it was probable from 
moment to moment that one would be jost- 
led. The Baroness had never seen so many 
people walking about before ; she had nevei 
been so mixed up with people she did not 
know. But little by litde she felt that this 
fair was a more serious undertaking. She went 
with her brother into a large public garden^ 



^4 . . 

which seemed very pretty, but where she 
was surprised at seeing no carriages. The 
afternoon was drawing to a close ; the coarse, 
vivid grass and the sknder tree-boles were 
gilded by the level sunbeams — gilded as 
with gold that was fresh from the mine. It 
was the hour at which ladies should come 
out for an airing and roll past a hedge of 
pedestrians, holding their parasols askance. 
Here, however, Eugenia observed no indica- 
tions of this custom, the absence of which 
was more anomalous as there was a charm- 
ing avenue of remarkably graceftil arching 
elms in the most convenient contiguity to a 
large, cheerful street, in which, evidently, 
among the more prosperous members of the 
bourgeoisie^ a great deal of pedestrianism 
went forward. Our friends passed out into 
tliis well-lighted promenade, and Felix no- 
ticed a great many more pretty girls and 
called his sister's attention to them. This 
latter measure, however, was superfluous ; for 
tlie Baroness had inspected, narrowly, these 
charming young ladies. 



 * 25 

"I feel an intimate comdction that our 
cousins are like that," said Felix. 

The Baroness hoped so, but this is not 
what she said. " They are very pretty," she 
said, " but they are mere little girls. Where 
are the women — the women of thirty ? " 

"Of thirty-three, do you mean?" her 
brother was going to ask ;. for he understood 
often both what she said and what she did 
not say. But he only exclaimed upon the 
beauty of the sunset, while the Baroness, 
who had come to seek her fortune, reflected 
that it would certainly be well for her if the 
persons against whom she might need to 
measure herself should all be mere litde 
girls. The sunset was superb ; they 
stopped to look at it ; Felix declared that he 
had never seen such a gorgeous mixture of 
colours. The Baroness also thought it 
splendid; and she was perhaps the more 

easily pleased from the fact that while she 

* 

stood there she was conscious of much 
admiring observation on the part of various 
nice-looking people who passed that way. 



26 . . 

and to whom a distinguished, strikingly- 
dressed woman with a foreign air, exclaim- 
ing upon the beauties of nature on a Boston 
street-corner in the French tongue, could 
not be an object of indifference. Eugenia's 
spirits rose. She surrendered herself to a 
certain tranquil gaiety. If she had come to 
seek her fortune, it seemed to her thdt her 
fortune would be easy to find. There was a 
promise of it in the gorgeous purity of the 
western sky ; there was an intimation in the 
mild, unimpertinent gaze of the passers of a 
certain natural facility in things. 

"You will not go back to Silberstadt, 
eh?" asked Felix. 

" Not to-morrow,** said the Baroness. 

"Nor write to the Reigning Prince?" 

"I shall write to him that they evidently 
know nothing about him over here." 

"He will not believe you," said the 
young man. "I advise you to let him 
alone." 

Felix himself continued to be in high 
good-humour. Brought up among ancient 



I] . 27 

customs and in picturesque cities, he yet 
found plenty of local colour in the little 
Puritan metropolis. That evening, after 
dinner, he told his sister that he would go 
forth early on the morrow to look up their 
cousins. 

" You are very impatient," said Eugenia. 

"What can be more natural," he asked, 
"after seeing all those pretty girls to-day? 
If one's cousins are of that pattern, the 
sooner one knows them the better." 

" Perhaps they are not," said Eugenia. 
" We ought to have brought some letters — 
to some other people." 

"The other people would not be our 
kinsfolk." 

"Possibly they would be none the worse 
for that," the Baroness replied. 

Her brother looked at her with his 
eye-brows lifted. "That was not what 
you said when you first proposed to 
me that we should come out here and 
fraternize with our relatives. You said 
that it was ^ the prompting of natural 



28 . [cir. 

affection ; and when I suggested some 
reasons against it you declared that the 
voix du sang should go before every- 
thing." 

" You remember all that ? " asked the 
Baroness. 

'^ Vividly ! I was greatly moved by it." 

She was walking up and down the room, 
as she had done in the morning ; she 
stopped in her walk and looked at her 
brother. She apparently was going to say 
something, but she checked herself and 
resumed her walk. Then, in a few 
moments, she said something different, 
which had the effect of an explanation ot 
the suppression of her earlier thought. 
"You will never be anything but a child, 
dear brother." 

" One would suppose that you, madam," 
answered Felix, laughing, " were a thousand 
Acars old.** 

** I am — sometimes," said the Baroness. 

"I will go, then, and announce to our 
cousins the arrival of a personage so 



L] . 29 

extraordinary. They will immediately come 
and pay you their respects." 

Eugenia paced the length of the room 
again, and then she stopped before her 
brother, laying her hand upon his arm. 
"They are not to come and see me," she 
said, " You are not to allow that. That 
is not the way I shall meet them first." 
And in answer to his interrogative glance 
she went on. *^You will go and examine, 
and report. You will come back and tell 
me who they are and what they are; their 
number, gender, their respective ages — all 
about them. Be sure you observe every- 
thing; be ready to describe to me the 
locality, the accessories — how shall I say it ? 
— the mise en scene. Then, at my own 
time, at my own hour, under circumstances 
of my own choosing, I will go to them. I 
will present myself — I will appear before 
them ! " said the Baroness, this time phrasing 
her idea with a certain frankness. 

"And what message am I to take to 
them ? " asked Felix, who had a lively 



30 . [cm. 

faith in the justness of his sister's arrange- 
ments. 

She looked at him a moment — at his 
expression of agreeable veracity; and, with 
that justness that he admired, she replied, 
"Say what you please. Tell my story in 
the way that seems to you most — nattiral." 
And she bent her forehead for him to 
kiss. 



iL] . 31 



CHAPTER II. 

The next day was splendid, as Felix had 
prophesied; if the winter had suddenly 
leaped into spring, the spring had for the 
moment as quickly leaped into summer. 
This was an observation made by a young 
girl who came out of a large square house in 
the country, and strolled about in the spa- 
cious garden which separated it from a 
muddy road. The flowering shrubs and the 
neatly-disposed plants were basking in the 
abundant light and warmth ; the transparent 
shade of the great elms — ^they were magnifi- 
cent trees — seemed to thicken by the hour ; 
and the intensely habitual stillness offered a 
submissive medium to the sound of a 
distant church-bell. The young girl 
listened to the church-bell ; but she was not 
dressed for . church. She was bare-headed ; 



32 . . 

she wore a white muslin waist with an em- 
broidered border, and the skirt of her dress 
was of coloured muslin. She was a young 
lady of some two or three-and-twenty years 
of age, and though a young person of her 
sex walking bare-headed in a garden, of a 
Sunday morning in spring-time, can, in 
the nature of things, never be a displeasing 
object, you would not have pronounced this 
innocent Sabbath-breaker especially pretty. 
She was tall and pale, thin and a little 
awkward; her hair was fair and perfectly 
straight ; her eyes were dark, and they had 
the singularity of seeming at once dull and 
restless — differing herein, as you see, fatally 
from the ideal " fine eyes," which we always 
imagine to be both brilliant and tranquil. 
The doors and windows of the large square 
house were all wide open, to admit the 
purifying sunshine, which lay in generous 
patches upon the floor of a wide, high, 
covered piazza adjusted to two sides of the 
mansion — a piazza on which several straw- 
bottomed rocking-chairs and half-a-dozen of 



I . 33 

those small cylindrical stools in green and 
blue porcelain, which suggest an affiliation 
between the residents and the Eastern trade, 
were symmetrically disposed. It was an 
ancient house — ancient in the sense of being 
eighty years old; it was built of wood, 
painted a clean, clear, faded gray, and 
adorned along the front, at intervals, with 
flat wooden pilasters, painted white. These 
pilasters appeared to support a kind of classic 
pediment, which was decorated in the middle 
by a large triple window in a boldly carved 
frame, and in each of its smaller angles by a 
glazed circular aperture. A large white 
door, furnished with a highly-polished brass 
knocker, presented itself to the rural-looking 
road, with which it was connected by a 
spacious pathway, paved with worn and 
cracked, but very clean, bricks. Behind t 
there were meadows and orchards, a barn 
and a pond ; and facing it, a short distance 
along the road, on the opposite side, stood a 
smaller house, painted white, with external 
shutters painted green, .a little garden on 



34 . » 

one hand and an orchard on the other. 
All this was shinmg in the morning air, 
through which the simple details of the 
picture addressed themselves to the eye 
as distinctly as the items of a " sum " in 
addition. 

A second young lady presently came out 
of the house, across the piazza, descended 
into the garden and approached the young 
girl of whom I have spoken. This second 
young lady was also thin and pale ; but she 
was older than the other ; she was shorter ; 
she had dark, smooth hair. Her eyes, un- 
like the other's, were quick and bright ; but 
they were not at all restless. She wore a 
straw bonnet with white ribbons, and a long 
red India scarf, which, on the front of her 
dress, reached to her feet. In her hand she 
carried a little key. 

" Gertrude," she said, " are you very sure 
you had better not go to church r " 

Gertrude looked at her a moment, 
plucked a small sprig from a Ulac- 
bush, smelled it and threw it away. "I 



. 35 

am not very sure of anything!" she 
answered. 

The other young lady looked straight 
past her, at the distant pond, which lay 
shining between the long banks of fir-trees. 
Then she said in a very soft voice, "This is 
the key of the dining-room closet. I think 
you had better have it, if any one should 
want anything." 

^^Who is there to want anything?" 
Gertrude demanded. ^*I shall be all alone 
in the house." 

"Some one may come," said her com- 
panion. 

" Do you mean Mr. Brand ? " 

"Yes, Gertrude. He may like a piece 
of cake." 

" I don't like men that are always eating 
cake!" Gertrude declared, giving a pull at 
the lilac-buish. 

Her companion glanced at her, and then 
looked down on the ground. "I think 
father expected you would come to church," 
she said. " What shall I say to him ? " 

D 2 



36 . . 

*^ Say I have a bad headache." 

"Would that be true?" asked the 
elder lady, looking straight at the pond 
again. 

"No, Charlotte," said the younger one 
simply. 

Charlotte transferred her quiet eyes to her 
companion's face. " I am afraid you are 
feeling restless." 

*^ I am feeling as I always feel," Gertrude 
replied, in the same tone. 

Charlotte turned away; but she stood 
there a moment. Presently she looked 
down at the front of her dress. "Doesn't 
it seem to you, somehow, as if my scarf were 
too long ? " she asked. 

Gertrude walked half round her, looking 
at the scarf. " I don't think you wear it 
right," she said. 

" How should I wear it, dear ? * 

"I don't know; differently from that. 
You should draw it differently over your 
shoulders, roimd your elbows; you should 
look differently behind." 



I . 37 

*'How should I look?" Charlotte in- 
quired. 

"I don't think I can tell you," said 
Gertrude, plucking out the scarf a little 
behind. " I could do it myself, but I don't 
think I can explain it." 

Charlotte, by a movement of her elbows, 
corrected the laxity that had come from her 
companion's touch. " Well, some day you 
must do it for me. It doesn't matter now. 
Indeed I don't think it matters," she added, 
" how one looks behind." 

"I should say it mattered more," said 
Gertrude. " Then you don't know who 
may be observing you. You are not on 
your guard. You can't try to look pretty." 

Charlotte received this declaration with 
extreme gravity. " I don't think one should 
ever try to look pretty," she rejoined, 
earnestly. 

Her companion was silent. Then she 
said, "Well, perhaps it's not of much 



use." 



Charlotte looked at her a little, and then 



38 . . 

kissed her. " I hope you will be better 
when we come back.'* 

" My dear sister, I am very well ! " said 
Gertrude. 

Charlotte went down the large brick walk 
to the garden gate ; her companion strolled 
ftfowly toward the house. At the gate 
Charlotte met a young man, who was 
coming in — a tall, fair young man, wearing 
a high hat and a pair of thread gloves. He 
was handsome, but rather too stout. He 
had a pleasant smile. " Oh, Mr. Brand ! ^ 
exclaimed the young lady. 

"I came to see whether your sister was 
not going to church," said the young 
man. 

•' She says she is not going ; but I am 
very glad you have come. I think if you 
were to talk to her a little" . . . And 
Charlotte lowered her voice. " It seems 
as if slie were restless." 

Mr. Brand smiled down on the yoiuig 
lady from his great height. "I shall be 
verv firlad to talk to her. For that I should 



I . 39 

be willing to absent myself from almost any 
occasion of worship, however attractive." 

"Well, I suppose you know," said 
Charlotte, softly, as if positive acceptance 
of this proposition might be dangerous. 
" But I am afraid I shall be late." 

" I hope you will have a pleasant sermon," 
said the young man. 

"Oh, Mr. Oilman is always pleasant," 
Charlotte answered. And she went on her 
way. 

Mr. Brand went into the garden, where 
Gertrude, hearing the gate close behind him, 
turned and looked at him. For a moment 
she watched him coming; then she turned 
away. But almost immediately she cor- 
rected this movement, and stood still, facing 
him. He took off his hat and wiped his 
forehead, as he approached. Then he put 
on his hat again and held out his hand. His 
hat being removed, you would have per- 
ceived that his forehead was very large and 
smooth, and his hair abundant but rather 
colourless. His nose was too large, and 



40 . . 

his tnouth and eyes were too small j 
but for all this he was, as I have said, 
a young man of striking appearance. The 
expression of his little clean-coloured blue 
eyes was irresistibly gentle and serious ; he 
looked, as the phrase is, as good as gold. 
The young girl, standing in the garden path, 
glanced, as he came up, at his thread gloves. 

" I hoped you were going to church," he 
said. " I wanted to walk with you." 

" I am very much obliged to you," 
Gertrude answered. "I am not going to 
church." 

She had shaken hands with him ; he held 
her hand a moment. " Have you any 
special reason for not going ? " 

" Yes, Mr. Brand," said the young girl. 

" May I ask what it is ? " 

She looked at him smiling; and in her 
smile, as I have intimated, there was a certain 
dulness. But mingled with this dulness was 
something sweet and suggestive. " Because 
the sky is so blue ! " she said. 

He looked at the sky, which was magnifi- 



I . 41 

cent, and then said, smiling too, "I have 
heard of young ladies staying at home for 
bad weather, but never for good. Your 
sister, whom I met at the gate, tells me you 
are depressed," he added. 

" Depressed ? I am never depressed." 

"Oh, surely, sometimes," replied Mr 
Brand, as if he thought this a regrettable 
account of one's self. 

" I am never depressed," Gertrude repeat- 
ed. " But I am sometimes wicked. When 
I am wicked I am in high spirits. I was 
wicked just now to my sister." 

" What did you do to her ? " 

" I said things that puzzled her — on 
purpose." 

" Why did you do that. Miss Gertrude ? " 
asked the young man. 

She began to smile again. •• Because the 
sky is so blue ! " 

"You say things that puzzle me," Mr. 
Brand declared. 

" I always know when I do it," proceeded 
Gertrude. "But people puzzle me more. 



42 . . ' 

I think. And they don't seem to 
know ! " 

"This is very interesting," Mr. Brand 
observed, smiling. 

" You told me to tell you about my— my 
struggles," the young girl went on. 

"Let us talk about them. I have so 
many things to say." 

Gertrude turned away a moment; and 
then, turning back, " You had better go to 
church," she said, 

"You know," the young man urged, 
" that I have always one thing to say." 

Gertrude looked at him a moment. 
" Please don't say it now ! " 

" We are all alone," he continued, taking 
off his hat ; " all alone in this beautiful 
Sunday stillness." 

Gertrude looked around her, at the break- 
ing buds, the shining distance, the blue sky 
to which she had referred as a pretext for her 
irregularities. "That's the reason," she 
said, " why I don't want you to speak. Do 
me a favour ; go to church." 



n.l . 43 

"May I speak when I come back?" 
asked Mr. Brand. 

" If you are still disposed," she answered. 

" I don't know whether you are wicked," 
he said, '' but you are certainly puzzling." 

She had turned away; she raised her 
hands to her ears. He looked at her a 
moment, and then he slowly walked to 
church. 

She wandered for a while about the 
garden, vaguely and without purpose. The 
church-bell had stopped ringing ; the still- 
ness was complete. This young lady 
relished highly, on occasions, the sense of 
being alone — the absence of the whole 
family and the emptiness of the house. 
To-day, apparently, the servants had also 
gone to church : there was never a figure 
at the open windows; behind the house 
there was no stout negress in a red turban, 
lowering the bucket into the great shingle- 
hooded well. And the front door of the 
big, xinguarded home stood open, with the 
trustfulness of the golden age; or, what is 



44 . fcH. 

more to the purpose, with that of New 
England's silvery prime. Gertrude slowly 
passed through it, and went from one of the 
empty rooms to the other — large, clear- 
coloured rooms, with white wainscots, 
ornamented with thin-legged mahogany 
furniture, and, on the walls, with old- 
fashioned engravings, chiefly of Scriptural 
subjects, hung very high. This agreeable 
sense of solitude, of having the house to 
herself, of which I have spoken, always 
excited Gertrude's imagination; she could 
not have told you why, and neither can her 
humble historian. It always seemed to her 
that she must do something particular — ^thsct 
she must honour the occasion ; and while 
she roamed about, wondering what she 
could do, the occasion usually came to an 
end. To-day she wondered more than ever. 
At last she took down a book ; there was 
no library in the house, but there were books 
in all the rooms. None of them were 
forbidden books, and Gertrude had not 
stopped at home for the sake ol a chance 



I . 45 

to climb to the inaccessible shelves. She 
possessed herself of a very obvious volume — 
one of the series of the Arabian Nights* — 
and she brought it out into the portico and 
sat down with it in her lap. There, for a 
quarter of an hour, she read the history of 
the loves of the Prince Camaralzaman and 
the Princess Badoura. At last, looking up, 
she beheld, as it seemed to her, the Prince 
Camaralzaman standing before her. A 
beautiful young man was making her a very 
low bow — a magnificent bow, such as she 
had never seen before. He appeared to 
have dropped from the clouds ; he was 
wonderfully handsome; he smiled — smiled 
as if he were smiling on purpose. Extreme 
surprise, for a moment, kept Gertrude sitting 
still; then she rose, without even keeping 
her finger in her book. The young man, 
with his hat in his hand, still looked at her, 
smiling and smiling. It was very strange. 

" Will you kindly tell me," said the 
mysterious visitor, at last, ^* whether I have 
the honour of speaking to Miss Wentworth ?" 



46 . . 

"My name is Gertrude Wentworth," 
murmured the yoimg woman. 

"Then — ^then — I have the honour — ^the 
pleasure — of being your cousin." 

The young man had so much the 
character of an apparition that this an- 
nouncement seemed to complete his unre- 
ality. " What cousin ? Who are you ? " 
said Gertrude. 

He stepped back a few paces and looked 
up at the house ; then glanced round him 
at the garden and the distant view. After 
this he burst out laughing. " I see it must 
seem to you very strange," he said. There 
was, after all, something substantial in his 
laughter. Gertrude looked at him from 
head to foot Yes, he was remarkably 
handsome ; but his smile was almost a 
grimace. "It is very still," he went on, 
coming nearer again. And as she only 
looked at him, for reply, he added, "Are 
you all alone ? " 

"Every one has gone to church," said 
Gertrude. 



I . 47 

^^I was afraid of that!" the young man 
exclaimed. " But I hope you are not afraid 
of me.** 

"You ought to tell me who you are,'* 
Gertrade answered. 

" I am afraid of you ! " said the young 
man. " I had a different plan. I expected 
the servant would take in my card, and 
that you would put your heads togetheij, 
before admitting me, and make out my 
identity.** 

Gertrude had been wondering with a 
quick intensity which brought its result; 
and the result seemed an answer — a 
wondrous, delightful answer — to her vague 
wish that something would befall her. " I 
know — I know," she said. " You come 
from Europe." 

"We came two days ago. You have 
heard of us, then — you believe in us ? '* 

"We have known, vaguely,'* said Ger- 
trude, " that we had relations in France." 

" And have you ever wanted to see us ? " 
asked the young man. 



48 . . 

Gertrude was silent a moment. ^^ I have 
wanted to see you." 

"I am glad, then, it is you I have 
found. We wanted to see you, so we 



came." 



" On purpose ? " asked Gertrude, 

The young man looked round him, 
smiling still. "Well, yes; on purpose. 
Does that sound as if we should bore you ? " 
he added, " I don't think we shall — I 
really don't think we shall. We are rather 
fond of wandering, too ; and we were glad 
of a pretext." 

"And you have just arrived ? " 

" In Boston, two days ago. At the inn I 
asked for Mr. Wentworth. He must be 
your father. They found out for me where 
he lived ; they seemed often to have heard 
of him. I determined to come, without 
ceremony. So, this lovely morning, they 
set my face in the right direction and 
told me to walk straight before me, out 
of town, I came on foot because I 
wanted to see the country. I walked and 



I . 49 

walked, and here I am ! It's a good many 
miles." 

"It is seven miles and a half/' said 
Gertrude, softly. Now that this handsome 
young man was proving himself a reality she 
found herself vaguely trembling; she was 
deeply excited. She had never in her life 
spoken to a foreigner, and she had often 
thought it would be delightful to do so. 
Here was one who had suddenly been 
engendered by the Sabbath stillness for her 
private use; and such a brilliant, polite, 
smiling one ! She found time and means to 
compose herself, however ; to remind herself 
that she must exercise a sort of official 
hospitality. "We are very — ^very glad to 
see you," she said. "Won't you come into 
the house?" And she moved toward the 
open door. 

" You are not afraid of me, then ? " asked 
the young man again, with his light laugh. 

She wondered a moment, and then, " We 
are not afraid — ^here," she said. 

*^Ah, com me vous devez avoir raison!" 



E 



so . . 

cried the young man, looking all round him, 
appreciatively. It was the first time that 
Gertrude had heard so many words ot 
French spoken. They gave her something 
of a sensation. Her companion followed 
her, watching, with a certain excitement of 
his own, this tall, interesting-looking girl, 
dressed in her clear, crisp muslin. He 
paused in the hall, where there was a broad 
white staircase with a white balustrade. 
"What a pleasant house!" he said. "It's 
lighter inside than it is out." 

" It's pleasanter here," said Gertrude, and 
she led the way into the parlour — a high, 
clean, rather empty-looking room. Here 
they stood looking at each other — the 
young man smiling more than ever; 
Gertrude, very serious, trying to smile. 

" I don't believe you know my name," he 
said. "I am called Felix Young. Your 
father is my uncle. My mother was his 
half-sister, and older than he.'* 

"Yes," said Gertrude, "and she turned 
Roman Catholic and married in Europe." 



I . 51 

"I see you know," said the young man. 
"She married, and she died. Your father's 
family didn't like her husband. They 
called him a foreigner; but he was not. 
My poor father was born in Sicily, but his 
parents were American." 

" In Sicily ? " Gertrude murmured. 

" It is true," said Felix Young, " that they 
had spent their lives in Europe. But they 
were very patriotic. And so are we." 

" And you are Sicilian," said Gertrude. 

" Sicilian, no ! Let's see. I was born at a 
little place — a dear little place — in France. 
My sister was born at Vienna." 

" So you are French," said Gertrude. 

" Heaven forbid ! " cried the young man. 
Gertrude's eyes were fixed upon him almost 
insistently. He began to laugh again. " I 
can easily be French, if that will please 
you." • 

" You are a foreigner of some sort," said 
Gertrude. 

" Of some sort — yes ; I suppose so. But 
who can say of what sort ? I don't think 



52 . . 

we have ever had - occasion to settle the 

question. You know there are people like 

that. About their country, their religion, 

their profession, they can't tell." 

Gertrude stood there gazing ; she had not 

asked him to sit down. She had never 

heard of people like that; she wanted to 

hear. *^ Where do you live ? " she asked. 
" They can't tell that, either ! " said Felix. 

"I am afraid you will think we are little 
better than vagabonds. I have lived any- 
where — everywhere. I really think I have 
lived in every city in Europe." Gertrude 
gave a little long, soft exhalation. It made 
the young man smile at her again ; and his 
smile made her blush a little. To take 
refuge from blushing she asked him if, after 
his long walk^ he was not hungry or thirsty. 
Her hand was in her pocket ; she was fumb- 
ling with the little key that her sister had 
given her. ^^Ah, my dear young lady," he 
said, clasping his hands a little, "if you 
could give me, in charity, a glass of 
wme! 



I . 53 

Gertrude gave a smile and a little nod, 
and went quickly out of the room. Pre- 
sently she came back with a very large 
decanter in one hand and a plate in the 
other, on which was placed a big round 
cake with a frosted top. Gertrude, in tak- 
ing the cake from the closet, had had a 
moment of acute consciousness that it com- 
posed the refection of which her sister had 
thought that Mr. Brand would like to par- 
take. Her kinsman from across the seas 
was looking at the pale high-hung engrav- 
ings. When she came in he turned and 
smiled at her, as if they had been old friends 
meeting after a separation. *^You wait 
upon me yourself?" he. asked. "I am * 
served like the gods!" She had waited 
upon a great many people, but none of them 
had ever told her that. The observation 
added a certain lightness to the step with 
which she went to a little table where there 
were some curious red glasses — glasses 
covered with little gold sprigs, which Char- 
lotte used to dust every morning with her 



54 . . 

own hands. Gertrude thought the glasses 
very handsome, and it was a pleasure to her 
to know that the wine was good ; it was her 
father's famous madeira. Felix Young 
thought it excellent; he wondered why he 
had been told that there was no wine in 
America. She cut him an immense triangle 
out of the cake, and again she thought of 
Mr. Brand. Felix sat there, with his glass 
in one hand and his huge morsel of cake in 
the other— eating, drinking, smiling, talking. 
" I am very hungry," he said. " I am not 
at all tired; I am never tired. But I am 
very hungry." 

" You must stay to dinner," said Gertrude. 
" At two o'clock. They will all have come 
back from church ; you will see the others." 

" Who are the others ? " asked the young 
man. " Describe them all." 

" You will see for yourself. It is you that 
must tell me ; now, about your sister." 

"My sister is the Baroness Munster," 
said Felix. 

On hearing that his sister was a Baroness, 



I . 55 

Gertrude got up and walked about slowly, in 
front of him. She was silent a moment. 
She was thinking of it. "Why didn't she 
come, too ? " she asked. 

" She did come ; she is in Boston, at the 
hotel." 

" We will go and see her," said Gertrude, 
looking at him 

" She begs you will not ! " the young man 
replied. " She sends you her love ; she sent 
me to announce her. She will come and 
pay her respects to your father." 

Gertrude felt herself trembling again. A 
Baroness Miinster, who sent a brilliant 
young man to ^* announce " her ; who was 
coming, as the Queen of Sheba came to 
Solomon, to pay her "respects" to quiet 
Mr. Wentworth — such a personage pre- 
sented herself to Gertrude's vision with 
a most effective unexpectedness. For a 
moment she hardly knew what to say. 
^When will she come ? " she asked at 
last. 

As soon as you will allow her — to- 



iC 



56 . . 

morrow. She is very impatient," answered 
Felix, who wished to be agreeable. 

"To-morrow, yes," said Gertrude. She 
wished to ask more about her; but she 
hardly knew what could .be predicated of a 
Baroness Munster. "Is she — is she — 
married ? " 

Felix had finished his cake and wine ; he 
got up, fixing upon the young girl his 
bright, expressive eyes. "She is married 
to a German prince — Prince Adolf, of 
Silberstadt-Schreckenstein. He is not the 
Reigning Prince ; he is a younger brother." 

Gertrude gazed at her informant ; her 
lips were slightly parted. "Is she a — a 
Princess ? " she asked at last. 

"Oh, no," said the young man; "her 
position is rather a singular one. It's a 
morganatic marriage." 

"Morganatic?" These were new names 
and new words to poor Gertrude. 

"That's what they call a marriage, you 
know, contracted between a scion of a ruling 
house and — and a common mortal. They 



I . 57 

made Eugenia a Baroness, poor woman ; but 
that was all they could do. Now they want 
to dissolve the marriage. Prince Adolf, 
between ourselves, is a ninny; but his 
brother, who is a clever man, has plans for 
him. Eugenia, naturally enough, makes 
difficulties; not, however, that I think she 
cares much — she's a very clever woman; 
I'm sure you'll like her — but she wants to 
bother them. Just now everything is en 

The cheerful ofF-hand tone in which her 
visitor related this darkly romantic tale 
seemed to Gertrude very strange; but it 
seemed also to convey a certain flattery to 
herself, a recognition of her wisdom and 
dignity. She felt a dozen impressions 
stirring within her, and presently the one 
that was uppermost found words. "They 
want to dissolve her marriage?" she 
asked. 

" So it appears." 

" And against her will ? " 

" Against her right." 



58 . . 

"She must be very unhappy!" said 
Gertrude. 

Her visitor looked at her, smiling ; he 
raised his hand to the back of his head and 
held it there a moment. " So she says," he 
answered. "That's her story. She told 
me to tell it you." 

" Tell me more," said Gertrude. 
" No, I will leave that to her ; she does it 
better." 

Gertrude gave her little excited sigh again. 
" Well, if she is unhappy," she said, " I am 
glad she has come to us." 

She had been so interested that she failed 
to notice the sound of a footstep in the 
portico ; and yet it was a footstep that she 
always recognized. She heard it in the hall, 
and then she looked out of the window. 
They were all coming back from church — 
her father, her sister and brother, and their 
cousins, who always came to dinner on 
Sunday. Mr. Brand had come in first ; he 
was in advance of the others, because, 
apparently, he was still disposed to say what 



I . 59 

she had not wished him to say an hour 
before. He came into the parlour, looking 
for Gertrude. He had two little books in 
his hand. On seeing Gertrude's companion 
he slowly stopped, looking at him. 

" Is this a cousin ? " asked Felix. 

Then Gertrude saw that she must in- 
troduce him ; but her ears, and, by sym- 
pathy, her lips — were full of all that he 
had been telling her. "This is the Prince," 
she said — " the Prince of Silberstadt- 
Schreckenstein ! " 

Felix burst out laughing, and Mr. Brand 
stood staring, while the others, who had 
passed into the house, appeared behind him 
in the open doorway. 



6o . . 



CHAPTER III. 

That evening, at dinner, Felix Young 
gave his sister, the Baroness Munster, an 
account of his impressions. She saw that 
he had come back in the highest possible 
spirits ; but this fact, to her own mind, was 
not a reason for rejoicing. She had but a 
limited confidence in her brother s judg- 
ment; his capacity for taking rose-coloured 
views was such as to vulgarize one of the 
prettiest of tints. Still, she supposed he 
could be trusted to give her the mere facts ; 
and she invited him, with some eagerness, to 
communicate them. "I suppose, at least, 
they didn t turn you from the door," she said. 
" You have been away some ten hours." 

"Turn me from the door!** Felix 
exclaimed. " They took me to their hearts ; 
they killed the fatted calf." 



»» 



1» 



II . 6i 

" I know what you want to say : they are 
a collection of angels." 

"Exactly," said Felix. "They are a 
collection of angels — simply," 

"C'est bien vague," remarked the Ba- 
roness. " What are they like ? 

" Like nothing you ever saw/ 

" I am sure I am much obliged ; but 
that is hardly more definite. Seriously, they 
were glad to see you ? " 

"Enchanted. It has been the proudest 
day of my life. Never, never have I been 
so lionized ! I assure you, I was cock of the 
walk. My dear sister," said the young man, 
" nous n'avons qu ^ nous tenir ; we shall be 
great swells ! " 

Madame Miinster looked at him, and her 
eye exhibited a slight responsive spark. She 
touched her lips to a glass of wine, and then 
she said, " Describe them. Give me a 
picture." 

Fehx drained his own glass. " Well, it's 
in the country, among the meadows and 
woods ; a wild sort of place, and yet not far 



62 . . 

from here. Only, such a road, my dear! 
Imagine one of the Alpine glaciers repro- 
duced in mud. But you will not spend 
much time on it, fof they want you to come 
and stay, once for all." 

" Ah," said the Baroness, '^ they want me 
to come and stay, once for all ? Bon." 

" It's intensely rural, tremendously natural ; 
and all overhung with this strange white 
light, this far-away blue sky. There's a 
big wooden house — a kind of three-storey 
•bungalow; it looks like a magnified 
Nuremberg toy. There was a gentleman 
there that made a speech to me about it and 
called it a ' venerable mansion ; ' but it looks 
as if it had been built last night." 

'^ Is it handsome — is it elegant ? " asked 
the Baroness. 

Felix looked at her a moment, smiling. 
" It's very clean ! No splendoiurs, no gilding, 
no troops of servants; rather straight- 
backed chairs. But you might eat off the 
floors, and you can sit down on the 
stairs." 



II . 63 

"That must be a privilege. And the 
inhabitants are straight-backed too, of 
course." 

"My dear sister," said Felix, "the in- 
habitants are charming." 

" In what style ? " 

" In a style of their own. How shall I 
describe it ? It's primitive ; it's patriarchal ; 
it's the ton of the golden age." 

"And have they nothing golden but 
their . ton ? Are there no symptoms of 
wealth ? " 

"I should say there was wealth without 
symptoms. A plain, homely way of life; 
nothing for show, and very little for — what 
shall I call it ? — for the senses ; but a great 
aisance, and a lot of money, out of sight, 
that comes forward very quietly for 
subscriptions to institutions, for repairing 
tenements, for paying doctor's bills ; perliaps 
even for portioning daughters." 

"And the daughters?" Madame 
Miinster demanded. "How many are 
there ? 



.." 



64 . , 

" There are two, Charlotte and Gertrude." 

" Are they pretty ? " 

" One of them," said Felix. 

« Which is that ? " 

The young man was silent, looking at his 
sister. " Charlotte," he said at last. 

She looked at him in return. "I see. 
You are in love with Gertrude. They must 
be Puritans to their finger-tips ; anything 
byt gay I " 

'^No, they are not gay," Felix admitted. 
"They are sober; they are even severe. 
They are of a pensive cast ; they take things 
hard. I think there is something the matter 
with them ; they have some melancholy me- 
mory or some depressing expectation. It's 
not the epicurean temperament. My uncle, 
Mr. Wentworth, is a tremendously high- 
toned old fellow; he looks as if he were 
undergoing martyrdom, not by fire, but by 
freezing. But we shall cheer them up ; we 
shall do them good. They will take agood 
deal of stirring up ; but they are wonderfully 
kind and gentle. And they are appreciative. 



III.I . 65 

They think one clever; they think one 
remarkable I " 

" That is very fine, so far as it goes," said 
the Baroness. "But are we to be shut up 
to these three people, Mr. Wentworth 
and the two young women — what did 
you say their names were — Deborah and 
Hephzibah ? " 

"Oh, no; there is another little girl, a 
cousin of theirs, a very pretty creature; a 
thorough little American. And then there 
is the son of the house." 

"Good," said the Baroness. "We are 
coming to the gentlemen. What of the son 
of the house ? " 

" I am afraid he gets tipsy." 

"He, then, has the epicurean tempera- 
ment I How old is he ? " 

" He is a boy of twenty ; a pretty young 
fellow, but I am afraid he has vulgar tastes. 
And then there is Mr. Brand — a very tall 
young man, a sort of lay-priest. They seem 
to think a good deal of him, but I don't 
exactly make him out." 



r 



66 . . 

"And is there nothing," asked the 
Baroness, " between these extremes — this 
mysterious ecclesiastic and that intemperate 
youth ? " 

"Oh, yes; there is Mr. Acton, I 
think," said the young man, with a 
nod at his sister, "that you will like Mr. 
Acton." 

"Remember that I am very fastidious," 
said the Baroness. "Has he very good 
manners ? " 

" He will have them with you. He is a 
man of the world ; he has been to China." 

Madame Miinster gave a little laugh. 
" A man of the Chinese world I He must 
be very interesting." 

" I have an idea that he brought home a 
fortune," said Felix. 

"That is always interesting. Is he 
young, good-looking, clever ? " 

" He is less than forty ; he has a baldish 
head ; he says witty things. I rather think," 
added the young man, " that he will admire 
the Baroness Miinster." 



II . 67 

" It is very possible," said this lady. Her 
brother never knew how she would take 
things; but shortly afterwards she declared 
that he had made a very pretty description, 
and that on the morrow she would go and 
see for herself. 

They mounted, accordingly, into a great 
barouche — a vehicle as to which the 
Baroness found nothing to criticize but the 
price that was asked for it and the fact that 
the coachman wore a straw hat. (At Silber- 
stadt Madame Miinster had had liveries of 
yellow and crimson.) They drove into the 
country, and the Baroness, leaning far back 
and swaying her lace-fringed parasol, looked 
to right and to left and surveyed the way- 
side objects. After a while she pronounced 
them qffreux. Her brother remarked that 
it was apparently a country in which the 
foreground was inferior to the plans recules ; 
and the Baroness rejoined that the landscape 
seemed to be all foreground. Felix had 
fixed with his new friends the hour at which 

he should bring his sister; it was four 

p 2 



68 .- . 

o'clock in the afternoon. The large clean- 
faced house wore, to his eyes, as the 
barouche drove up to it, a very friendly 
aspect ; the high, slender elms made length- 
ening shadows in front of it. The Baroness 
descended ; her American kinsfolk were 
stationed in the portico. Felix waved his 
hat to them, and a tall, lean gentleman, with 
a high forehead and a clean-shaven face, 
came forward toward the garden gate. 
Charlotte Wentworth walked at his side; 
Gertrude came behind, more slowly. Both 
of these young ladies wore rustling silk 
dresses. Felix ushered his sister into the 
gate. ^^ Be very gracious," he said to her. 
But he saw the admonition was superfluous. 
Eugenia was prepared to be gracious as only 
Eugenia could be. Felix knew no keener 
pleasure than to be able to admire his sister 
unrestrictedly; for if the opportunity was 
frequent, it was not inveterate. When she 
desired to please she was to him, as to every 
one else, the most charming woman in the 
world. Then he forgot that she was ever 



II . 69 

anything else; that she was sometimes hard 
and perverse ; that he was occasionally afraid 
of her. Now, as she took his arm to pass 
into the garden, he felt that she desired, that 
she proposed, to please, and this situation 
made him very happy. Eugenia would 
please. 

The tall gentleman came to meet her, 
looking very rigid and grave. But it was a 
rigidity that had no illiberal meaning. Mr. 
Wentworth's manner was pregnant, on the 
contrary, with a sense of grand responsi- 
bility, of the solemnity of the occasion, of its 
being difficult to show sufficient deference to 
a lady at once so distinguished and so un- 
happy. Felix had observed on the day 
before his characteristic pallor ; and now he 
perceived that there was something almost 
cadaverous in his uncle's high-featured white 
face. But so clever were this young man's 
quick sympathies and perceptions, that he 
had already learned that in these semi- 
mortuary manifestations there was no cause 
for alarm. His light imagination had 



70 . . 

gained a glimpse of Mr. Wentworth's spirit- 
ual mechanism, and taught him that, the 
old man being infinitely conscientious, the 
special operation of conscience within him 
announced itself by several of the indications 
of physical faintness. 

The Baroness took her uncle's hand, and 
stood looking at him with her ugly face and 
her beautiful smile. '' Have I done right to 
come ? " she asked. 

" Very right, very right," said Mr. Went- 
worth, solemnly. He had arranged in his 
mind a little speech ; but now it quite faded 
away* He felt almost frightened. He had 
never been looked at in just that way — with 
just that fixed, intense smile — by any 
woman ; and it perplexed and weighed upon 
him, now, that the woman who was smiUng 
so, and who had instantly given him a vivid 
sense of her possessing other unprecedented 
attributes, was his own niece, the child of his 
own father's daughter. The idea that his 
niece should be a German Baroness, married 
" morganatically " to a Prince, had already 



II . 71 

given him much to think about. Was it 
right, was it just, was it acceptable? He 
always slept badly, and the night before 
he had lain awake much more even than 
usual, asking himself these questions. The 
strange word "morganatic" was constantly 
in his ears; it reminded him of a certain 
Mrs. Morgan whom he had once known, 
and who had been a bold, unpleasant 
woman. He had a feeling that it was his 
duty, so long as the Baroness looked at him, 
smiling in that way, to meet her glance with 
his own scrupulously adjusted, consciously 
frigid organs of vision ; but on this occasion 
he failed to perform his duty to the last. 
He looked away toward his daughters. 

We are very glad to see you," he had said. 

Allow me to introduce my daughters — 
Miss Charlotte Wentworth, Miss Gertrude 
Wentworth." 

The Baroness thought she had never seen 
people less demonstrative. But Charlotte 
kissed her and took her hand, looking at her 
sweetly and solemnly. Gertrude seemed to 



k6 



72 . . 

her most funereal, though Gertrude might 
have found a source of gaiety in the fact 
that Felix, with his magnificent smile, had 
been talking to her; he had greeted her 
as a very old friend. When she kissed 
the Baroness she had tears in her eyes. 
Madame Miinster took each of these young 
women by the hand, and looked at them all 
over. Charlotte thought her very strange- 
looking and singularly dressed; she could 
not have said whether it was well or ill. 
She was glad, at any rate, that they had put 
on their silk gowns — especially Gertrude. 
" My cousins are very pretty," said the 
Baroness, turning her eyes from one to the 
other. "Your daughters are very hand- 



some, sir." 



Charlotte blushed quickly; she had never 
yet heard her personal appearance alluded to 
in a loud, expressive voice. Gertrude 
looked away — not at Felix; she was ex- 
tremely pleased. It was not the compliment 
that pleased her ; she did not believe it ; she 
thought herself very plain. She could 



iiij . -ji 

hardly have told you the source of her 
satisfaction; it came from something in the 
way the Baroness spoke, and it was not 
diminished — it was rather deepened, oddly 
enough — by the young girl's disbelief. 
Mr. Wentworth was silent; and then he 
asked, formally, " Won't you come into the 
house ? " 

*' These are not all ; you have some other 
children," said the Baroness. 

*' I have a son," Mr. Wentworth answered. 

"And why doesn't he come to meet 
me?" Eugenia cried. '^I am afraid he is 
not so charming as his sisters." 

"I don't know; I will see about it," the 
old man declared. 

"He is rather afraid of ladies," Charlotte 
said, softly. 

"He is very handsome," said Gertrucle, 
as loud as she could. 

"We will go in and find him. We will 
draw him out of his cachette^ And the 
Baroness took Mr. Wentworth's arm, who 
was not aware that he had offered it to her. 



74 . . 

and who, as they walked toward the house, 
wondered whether he ought to have offered 
it and whether it was proper for her to take 
it if it had not been offered. " I want to 
know you well," said the Baroness, inter- 
rupting these meditations, " and I want you 
to know me." 

"It seems natural that we should know 
each other," Mr. Wentworth rejoined. 
" We are near relatives." 

" Ah, there comes a moment in life when 
one reverts, irresistibly, to one's natural ties 
— to one's natural affections. You must 
have found that ! " said Eugenia. 

Mr. Wentworth had been toM the day 
before by Felix that Eugenia was very 
clever, very brilliant, and the information 
had held him in some suspense. This was 
the cleverness, he supposed; the brilliancy 
was beginning. " Yes, the natural affections 
are very strong," he murmured. 

" In some people," the Baroness declared. 
" Not in all." Charlotte was walking beside 
her; she took hold of her hand again, 



iiL] . 75 

smiling always. "And you, cottsine, where 
did you get that enchanting complexion?" 
she went on ; '^ such lilies and roses ? " The 
roses in poor Charlotte's countenance began 
speedily to predominate over the lilies, and 
she quickened her step and reached the 
portico. "This is the coimtry of complex- 
ions," the Baroness continued, addressing 
herself to Mr. Wentworth, ^^I. am con- 
vinced they are more delicate. There are 
very good ones in England — in Holland; 
but they are very apt to be coarse. There 
is too much red." 

"I think you will find/' said Mr. 
Wentworth, "that this country is superior 
in many respects to those you mention. 
I have been to England and Holland." 

"Ah, you have been to Europe?" cried 
the Baroness. " Why didn't you come and 
see me ? But it's better, after all, this way," 
she said. They were entering the house ; she 
paused and looked round her. "I see you 
have arranged your house — your beautiful 
house — in the — ^in the Dutch taste ! " 



76 . £ch. 

"The house is very old," remarked Mr. 
Wentworth. "General Washington once 
spent a week here." 

" Oh, I have heard of Washington," cried 
the Baroness. "My father used to adore 
him." 

Mr. Wentworth was silent a moment, 
and then, " I found he was very well known 
in Europe," he said. 

Felix had lingered in the garden with 
Gertrude; he was standing before her and 
smiling, as he had done the day before. 
What had happened the day before seemed 
to her a kind of dream. He had been 
there and he had changed everything; the 
others had seen him, they had talked with 
him; but that he should come again, that 
he should be part of the future, part of her 
small familiar, much-meditating life — this 
needed, afresh, the evidence of her senses. 
The evidence had come to her senses now; 
and her senses seemed to rejoice in it. 
" What do you think of Eugenia ? " Felix 
asked. " Isn't she charming ? " 



II . n 

"She is very brilliant," said Gertrude. 
"But I can't tell yet. She seems to me 
like a singer singing an air. You can't tell 
till the song is done." 

"Ah, the song will never be done!'* 
exclaimed the young man^ laughing. 
" Don't you think her handsome ? " 

Gertrude had been disappointed in the 
beauty of the Baroness Miinster ; she had 
expected her, for mysterious reasons, to 
resemble a very pretty portrait of the 
Empress Josephine, of which there hung an 
engraving in one of the parlours and which 
the younger Miss Wentworth had always 
greatly admired. But the Batoness was not 
at all like that — not at all. Though 
different, however, she was very wonderful, 
and Gertrude felt herself most suggestively 
corrected. It was strange, nevertheless, 
that Felix should speak in that positive way 
about his sister's beauty. " I think I shall 
think her handsome," Gertrude said. "It 
must be very interesting to know her. I 
don't feel as if I ever could." 



7S . . 

^' Ah, you will know her well ; you will 
become great friends," Felix declared, as if 
this were the easiest thing in the world. 

^^She is very graceful," said Gertrude, 
looking after the Baroness, suspended to her 
father's arm. It was a pleasure to her to 
say that any one was graceful. 

Felix had been looking about him. 
"And your little cousin of yesterday," he 
said, '^ who was so wonderfully pretty — ^wbat 
has become of her ? " 

"She is in the parlour," Gertrude 
answered. "Yes, she is very pretty." She 
felt as if it were her duty to take him 
straight into tlie house, to where he might 
be near her cousin. But after hesitating 
a moment she lingered still. "I didn't 
believe you would come back," she 
said. 

" Not come back ! " cried Felix, laughing. 
"You didn't know, then, the impression 
made upon this susceptible heart of mine." 

She wondered whether he meant the 
impression her cousin Lizzie had made. 



III.J . 79 

" Well," she said, " I didn't think we should 
ever see you again." 

"And pray what did you think would 
become of me?" 

" I don't know. I thought you would 
melt away." 

^ That's a compliment to my solidity ! I 
melt very often," said Felix, " but there is 
always something left of me." 

" I came and waited for you by the door, 
because the others did," Gertrude went on. 
" But if you had never appeared I should not 
have been surprised." 

"I hope," declared Felix, looking at 
her, "that you would have been disap- 
pointed." 

She looked at him a little, and shook her 
head. "No— no!" 

"Ah, par exemplel" cried the young 
man. "You deserve that I should never 
leave you." 

Going into the parlour they found Mr. 
Wentworth performing introductions. A 
young man was standing before the 



=*►-«*! 



8o . . 

Baroness, blushing a good deal, laughing a 
little and shifting his weight from one foot to 
the other — a slim, mild-faced young man, with 
neatly-arranged features, like those of Mr. 
Wentworth. Two other gentlemen, behind 
him, had risen from their seats, and a little 
apart, near one of the windows, stood a 
remarkably pretty young girl. The young 
girl was knitting a stocking; but, while her 
fingers quickly moved, she looked with wide, 
brilliant eyes at the Baroness. 

" And what is your son's name ? " 
said Eugenia, smiling at the young 
man. 

"My name is Clifford Wentworth, 
ma'am," he said in a tremulous voice. 

" Why didn't you come out to meet me, 
Mr. Clifford Wentworth?" the Baroness 
demanded, with her beautiful smile. 

" I didn't think you would want me," said 
the young man, slowly sidling about. 

" One always wants a beau cousin — if one 
has one ! But if you are very nice to me in 
future I won't remember it against you." 



II . 8i 

And Madame Miinster transferred her smile 
to the other persons present. It rested first 
upon the candid coimtenance and long- 
skirted figure of Mr. Brand, whose eyes 
were intently fixed upon Mr. Wentworth, 
as if to beg him not to prolong an 
anomalous situation. Mr. Wentworth pro- 
nounced his name; Eugenia gave him a 
very charming glance, and then looked at 
the other gentleman. 

This latter personage was a man of rather 
less than the usual stature and the usual 
weight, with a quick, observant, agreeable 
dark eye, a small quantity of thin dark hair, 
and a small moustache. He had been 
standing with his hands in his pockets ; and 
when Eugenia looked at him he took them 
out. But he did not, like Mr. Brand, look 
evasively and urgently at their host. He 
met Eugenia*s eyes; he appeared to 
appreciate the privilege of meeting them. 
Madame Miinster instantly felt that he 
was, intrinsically, the most important 
person present. She was not unconscious 



82 . . 

that this impression was in some degree 
manifested in the Httle sympathetic nod 
with which she acknowledged Mr. Went- 
worth's announcement, "My cousin, Mr. 
Acton ! " 

• " Your cousin — not mine ? " said the 
Baroness. 

" It only depends upon you," Mr. Acton 
declared, laughing. 

The Baroness looked at him a moment, 
and noticed that he had very white teeth. 
" Let it depend upon your behaviour," she 
said. " I think I had better wait. I have 
cousins enough. Unless I can also claim 
relationship," she added, " with that charm- 
ing young lady." And she pointed to the 
young girl at the window. 

"That's my sister," said Mr. Acton. 
And Gertrude Wentworth put her arm 
round the young girl and led her forward. 
It was not, apparently, that she needed much 
leading. She came toward the Baroness 
with a light, quick step, and with perfect 
self-possession, rolling her stocking round 



II . 83 

its needles. She had dark blue eyes and dark 
brown hair ; she was wonderfully pretty. 

Eugenia kissed her, as she had kissed the 
other young women, and then held her off 
2L little, looking at her. " Now this is quite 
another typey' she said ; she pronounced the 
word in the French manner. "This is a 
different outline, my uncle, a different 
character, from that of your own daughters. 
This, Felix," she went on, "is very much 
more what we have always thought of as the 
American type." 

The young girl, during this exposition, 
was smiling askance at every one in turn, 
and at Felix out of turn. " I find only one 
type here!" cried Felix, laughing. "The 
type adorable ' " 

This sally was received m perfect silence, 
but Felix, who learned all things quickly, 
had already learned that the silences fre- 
quently observed among his new acquaint- 
ances were not necessarily re^'trictive or 
resentful. It was, as one might say, the 

silence of expectation, of modesty. They 

G 2 



84 . * . 

were all standing round his sister, as if they 
were expecting her to acquit herself of the 
exhibition of some peculiar faculty, some 
brilliant talent. Their attitude seemed to 
imply that she was a kind of conversational 
mountebank, attired, intellectually, in gauze 
and spangles. This attitude gave a certain 
ironical force to Madame Miinster's next 
words. " Now this is your circle," she said 
to her uncle. " This is your salon. These 
are your regular habitues, eh? I am so 
glad to see you all together." 

"Oh," said Mr. Wentworth, "they are 
always dropping in and out. You must do 
the same." 

" Father," interposed Charlotte Went- 
worth, "they must do something more." 
And she turned her sweet serious face, that 
seemed at once timid and placid, upon their 
interesting visitor. " What is your name r " 
she asked. 

" Eugenia - Camilla - Dolores," said the 
Baroness, smiHng. "But you needn't say 
all that." 



II . 85 

"I will say Eugenia, if you will let me. 
You must come and stay with us." 

The Baroness laid her hand upon Char- 
lotte's arm very tenderly ; but she reserved 
herself. She was wondering whether it 
would be possible to "stay" with these 
people. " It would be very charming — very 
charming," she said ; and her eyes wandered 
over the company, over the room. She 
wished to gain time before committing 
herself. Her glance fell upon young Mr. 
Brand, wlio stood there, with his arms 
folded and his hand on his chin, looking 
at her. " The gentleman, I suppose, is a 
sort of ecclesiastic," she added to Mr. 
Wentworth, lowering her voice a little. 

" He is a minister," answered Mr. Went- 
worth. 

" A Protestant ? " asked Eugenia. 

"I am a Unitarian, madam," replied Mr. 
Brand, impressively. 

"Ah, I see," said Eugenia. "Something 
new." She had never heard of tliis form of 
worship. 



86 . [cii. 

Mr. Acton began to laugh, and Gertrude 
looked anxiously at Mr. Brand. 

"You have come very far," said Mr. 
Wentworth. 

"Very far — very fai," the Baroness 
replied, with a graceful shake of her head, a 
shake that might have meant many different 
things. 

" That's a reason why you ought to settle 
down with us," said Mr. Wentworth, with 
that dryness of utterance which, as Eugenia 
was too intelligent not to feel, took nothing 
from the delicacy of his meaning. 

She looked at him, and for an instant, in 
his cold, still face, she seemed to see a far- 
away likeness to the vaguely remembered 
image of her mother. Eugenia was a 
woman of sudden emotions, and now, 
unexpectedly, she felt one rising in her 
heart. She kept looking round the circle ; 
she knew that there was admiration in all the 
eyes that were fixed up )n her. She smiled 
at them all. 

" I came to look — to try — to ask," s' e 



II . 87 

said. " It seems to me I have done well. I 
am very tired ; I want to rest." There were 
tears in her ^ eyes. The luminous interior, 
the gentle, tranquil people, the simple, 
serious life — the sense of these things 
pressed upon her with an overmastering 
force, and she felt herself yielding to one of 
the. most genuine emotions she had ever 
known. " I should like to stay here," she 
said. " Pray take me in." 

Though she was smiling, there were tears 
in her voice as well as in her eyes. " My 
dear niece," said Mr. Wentworth, softly. 
And Charlotte put out her arms and drew 
the Baroness toward her; while Robert 
Acton turned away, with his hands stealing 
into his pocket<^. 



88 . . 



CHAPTER IV. 

A FEW days after the Baroness Munster had 
presented herself to her American kinsfolk 
she came, with her brother, and took up her 
abode in that small white house adjacent to 
Mr. Wentworth's own dwelling of which 
mention has already been made. It was on 
going with his daughters to return her visit 
that Mr. Wentworth placed this comfortable 
cottage at her service ; the offer being the 
result of a domestic colloquy, diffused 
through the ensuing twenty-four hours, in 
the course of which the two foreign visitors 
were discussed and analyzed with a great deal 
of earnestness and subtlety. The discussion 
went forward, as I say, in the family circle ; 
but that circle on the evening following 
Madame Miinster's return to town, as on 
many other occasions, included Robert 



ivj . 89 

Acton and his pretty sister. If you had 
been present, it would probably not have 
seemed to you that the advent of these 
brilliant strangers was treated as an ex- 
hilarating occurrence, a pleasure the more 
in this tranquil household, a prospective 
source of entertainment. This was not Mr. 
Wentworth's way of treating any human 
occurrence. The sudden irruption into the 
well-ordered consciousness of the Went- 
worths of an element not allowed for in its 
scheme of usual obligations, required a 
readjustment of that sense of responsibility 
which constituted its principal furniture. 
To consider an event, crudely and baldly, 
in the light of the pleasure it might bring 
them was an intellectual exercise with which 
Felix Young's American cousins were 
almost wholly unacquainted, and which they 
scarcely supposed to be largely pursued in 
any section of human society. The arrival 
of Felix and his sister was a satisfaction, but 
it was a singularly joyless and inelastic satis- 
faction. It was an extension of duty, of 



90 . . 

the exercise of the more recondite virtues; 
but neither Mr. Wentworth, nor Charlotte, 
nor Mr. Brand, who, among these excellent 
people, was a great promoter of reflection 
and aspiration, frankly adverted to it as an 
extension of enjoyment. This function was 
ultimately assumed by Gertrude Wentworth, 
who was a peculiar girl, but the full compass 
of whose peculiarities had not been exhibited 
before they very ingeniously found their 
pretext in the presence of these possibly too 
agreeable foreigners. Gertrude, however, 
had to struggle with a great accumulation 
of obstructions, both of the subjective, as 
the metaphysicians say, and of the objective, 
order ; and indeed it is no small part of the 
purpose of this little history to set forth 
her struggle. What seemed paramount 
in this abrupt enlargement of Mr. 
Wentworth's sympathies and those of his 
daughters was an extension of the field 
of possible mistakes; and the doctrine, as 
it may almost be called, of the oppressive 
gravity of mistakes was one of the most 



IV.] . 91 

cherished traditions of the Wentworth 
family. 

*'I don't believe she wants to come and 
stay in this house," said Gertrude ; Madame 
Miinster, from this time forward, receiving 
no other designation than the personal pro- 
noun. Charlotte and Gertrude acquired 
considerable facility in addressing her, di- 
rectly, as " Eugenia ; " but in speaking of 
her to each other they rarely called her 
anything but " she." 

"Doesn't she think it good enough for 
her ? " cried little Lizzie Acton, who was 
always asking unpractical questions that 
required, in strictness, no answer, and to 
which indeed she expected no other answer 
than such as she herself invariably furnished 
in a small innocently-satirical laugh. 

" She certainly expressed a willingness to 
come," said Mr. Wentworth. 

"That was only politeness," Gertrude 
rejoined. 

" Yes, she is very polite — very polite,'' 
said Mr. Wentworth. 



92 . . 

" She is too polite," his son declared, in a 
softly growling tone which was habitual to 
him, but which was an indication of nothing 
worse than a vaguely humorous intention. 
" It is very embarrassing." 

"That is more than can be said of you, 
sir," said Lizzie Acton, with her little laugh. 

*^Well, I don't mean to encourage her," 
Clifford went on. 

" I'm sure I don't care if you do ! " cried 
Lizzie. 

" She will not think, of you, Clifford," said 
Gertrude, gravely. 

" I hope not ! " Clifford exclaimed. 

"She will think of Robert," Gertrude 
continued, in the same tone. 

Robert Acton began to blush ; but there 
was no occasion for it, for every one was 
looking at Gertrude — every one, at least, 
save Lizzie, who, with her pretty head on 
one side, contemplated her brother. 

"Why do you attribute motives, Ger- 
trude ? " asked Mr. Wentworth 

"I don't attribute motives, father," said 



IV.] . 93 

Gertrude. "I only say she will think of 
Robert ; and she will ! " 

" Gertrude judges by herself! " Acton 
exclaimed, laughing. "Don't you, Ger- 
trude? Of course the Baroness will think 
of me. She will think of me from morning 
till night." 

" She will be very comfortable here," said 
Charlotte, with something of a housewife's 
pride. "She can have the large north-east 
room. And the French bedstead," Charlotte 
added, with a constant sense of the lady's 
foreignness. 

" She will not like it," said Gertrude, " not 
even if you pin little tidies all over the chairs." 

"Why. not, dear?" asked Charlotte, 
perceiving a touch of irony here, but not 
resenting it. 

Gertrude had left her chair; she was 
walking about the room ; her stiff silk dress, 
which she had put on in honour of the 
Baroness, made a sound upon the carpet. 
" I don't know," she replied. " She will want 
something more — more private." 



94 . . 

" If she wants to be private she can stay 
in her room," Lizzie Acton remarked. 

Gertrude paused m her walk, looking at 
her. "That would not be pleasant," she 
answered. " She wants privacy and pleasure 
together." 

Robert Acton began to laugh again. 
" My dear cousin, what a picture I " 

Charlotte had fixed her serious eyes upon 
her sister; she wondered whence she had 
suddenly derived these strange notions. 
Mr. Wentworth also observed his younger 
daughter. 

"I don't know what her manner of life 
may have been," he said ; " but she certainly 
never can have enjoyed a more refined 
and salubrious home." 

Gertrude stood there looking at them all 
" She is the wife of a Prince," she said. 

"We are all princes here," said Mr. 
Wentworth; "and I don't know of any palace 
in this neighbourhood that is to let." 

"Cousin William," Robert Acton mter- 
posed, " do you want to do something hand- 



iv.J THE KUROPEAxNS. 95 

some? Make them a present, for three 
months, of the Httle house over the way." 

^^You are very generous with other people's 
things!" cried his sister. 

"Robert is very generous with his own 
things," Mr. Wentworth observed dis- 
passionately and looking in cold meditation 
at his kinsman. 

" Gertrude," Lizzie went on, " I had an 
idea you were so fond of your new 



cousin." 



" Which new cousin ? " asked Gertrude. 

" I don't mean the Baroness ! " the young 
girl rejoined, with her laugh. "I thought 
you expected to see so much of him." 

" Of Felix ? I hope to see a great deal of 
him," said Gertrude, simply. 

" Then why do you want to keep him out 
of the house ? " 

Gertrude looked at Lizzie Acton, and then 
looked away. 

" Should you want me to live in the house 
with you, Lizzie ? " asked Clifford. 

" I hope you never will. I hate 



96 . . 

you!'' Such was this young lady's 
reply. 

*^ Father," said Gertrude, stopping before 
Mr. Wentworth and smiling, with a smile 
the sweeter, as her smile always was, for its 
rarity, " do let them live in the little house 
over the way. It will be lovely ! " 

Robert Acton had been watching her. 
" Gertrude is right," he said. " Gertrude is 
the cleverest girl in the world. If I might 
take the liberty, I would strongly recom- 
mend their living there." 

"There is nothing there so pretty as the 
north-east room," Charlotte urged. 

" She will make it pretty. Leave her 
alone ! " Acton exclaimed. 

Gertrude, at his compliment, had blushed 
and looked at him ; it was as if some one less 
familiar had complimented her. " I am sure 
she will make it pretty. It will be very 
interesting. It will be a place to go to. It 
will be a foreign house." 

" Are we very sure that we need a foreign 
house ? " Mr. Wentworth inquired. " Do 



IV.] . 97 

you think it desirable to establish a foreign 
house — in this quiet place ? " 

" You speak," said Acton, laughing, ^' as if 
it were a question of the poor Baroness 
opening a wine-shop or a gaming-table." 

" It would be too lovely ! " Gertrude 
declared again, laying her hand on the back 
of her father's chair. 

** That she should open a gaming-table ? " 
Charlotte asked, with great gravity. 

Gertrude looked at her a moment, and 
then, " Yes, Charlotte," she said, simply, 

" Gertrude is growing pert," Clifford 
Wentworth observed, with his humorous 
young growl. "That comes of associating 
with foreigners." 

Mr. Wentworth looked up at his daughter, 
who was standing beside him ; he drew her 
gently forward. " You must be careful," he 
said. " You must keep watch. Indeed, we 
must all be careful. This is a great change ; 
we are to be exposed to peculiar influences, 
I don't say they are bad ; I don't judge them 
in advance. But they may perhaps make it 



98 . . 

necessary that we should exercise a great deal 
of wisdom and self-control. It will be a 
different tone." 

Gertrude was silent a moment, in defer- 
ence to her father's speech ; then she spoke 
in a manner that was not in the least an 
answer to it. "I want to see how they 
will live. I am sure they will have different 
hours. She will do all kinds of little things 
differently. When we go over there it will 
be like going to Europe. She will have a 
boudoir. She will invite us to dinner — very 
late. She will breakfast in her room." 

Charlotte gazed at her sister ag<ain. 
Gertrude's imagination seemed to her to be 
fairly running riot. She had always known 
that Gertrude had a great deal of imagin- 
ation — she had been very proud of it. But 
at the same time she had always felt that it 
was a dangerous and irresponsible faculty; 
and now, to her sense, for the moment, it 
seemed to threaten to make her sister a 
strange person who should come in sud- 
denly, as from a journey, talking of the 



IV.] . 99 

peculiar and possibly unpleasant things she 
had observed. Charlotte's imagination took 
no journeys whatever; she kept it, as it 
were, in her pocket, with the other furniture 
of this receptacle — a thimble, a little box of 
peppermint, and a morsel of court-plaster. 
" I don't believe she would have any dinner 
— or any breakfast," said Miss Wentworth. 
^ I don't believe she knows how to do any- 
thing herself. I should have to get her 
ever so many servants, and she wouldn't like 
them." 

"She has a maid," said Gertrude; "a 
French maid. She mentioned her." 

" I wonder if the maid has a little fluted 
cap and red slippers," said Lizzie Acton. 
"There was a French maid in that play 
that Robert took me to see. She had pink 
stockings ; she was very wicked." 

" She was a soubrette^^ Gertrude an- 
nounced, who had never seen a play in her 
life. "They call that a soubrette. It will 
be a great chance to learn French." 

Charlotte gave a little soft, helpless groan. 

H 2 



loo . [oh. 

She had a vision of a wicked theatrical 
person^ clad in pink stockings and red shoes, 
and speaking, with confounding volubility, 
an incomprehensible tongue, flitting through 
the sacred penetralia of that large, . clean 
house. "That is one reason in favour of 
their coming here," Gertrude went on. 
"But we can make Eugenia speak French 
to us, and Felix. I mean to begin — the 
next time." 

Mr. Wentworth had kept her standing 
near him, and he gave her his earnest, 
thin, unresponsive glance again. " I want 
you to make me a promise, Gertrude," he 
said. 

'^ What is it ? " she asked, smiling. 

" Not to get excited. Not to allow these 
— these occurrences to be an occasion for 
excitement." 

She looked down at him a moment, and 
then she shook her head. " I don't think I 
can promise that, father. I am excited 
already." 

Mr. Wentworth was silent a while ; they 



iv.J . loi 

all were silent, as if in recognition of some- 
thing audacious and portentous. 

" I think they had better go to the other 
house," said Charlotte, quietly. 

" I shall keep them in the other house," 
Mr. Wentworth subjoined, more pregnantly. 

Gertrude turned away ; then she looked 
across at Robert Acton. Her cousin Robert 
was a great friend of hers ; she often looked 
at him this way instead of saying things. 
Her glance on this occasion, however, struck 
him as a substitute for a larger volume of 
diffident utterance than usual ; inviting him 
to observe, among other things, the ineffi- 
ciency of her father's design — if design it 
was — ^for diminishing, in the interest of quiet 
nerves, their occasions of contact with their 
foreign relatives. But Acton immediately 
complimented Mr. Wentworth upon his 
liberality. " That's a very nice thing to do," 
he said, " giving them the little house. You 
will have treated them handsomely, and, 
whatever happens, you will be glad of it." 
Mr. Wentworth was liberal, and he knew he 



I02 . . 

was liberal. It gave him pleasure to know 
it, to feel it, to see it recorded; and this 
pleasure is the only palpable form of self- 
indulgence with which the narrator of these 
incidents will be able to charge him. 

" A three days' visit at most, over there, is 
all I should have found possible," Madame 
Munster remarked to her brother, after they 
had taken possession of the little white 
house. " It would have been too intime — 
decidedly too intime. Breakfast, dinner, 
and tea en famille — it would have been the 
end of the world if I could have reached the 
third day." And she made the same 
observation to her maid Augustine, an 
intelligent person, who enjoyed a liberal 
share of her confidence. Felix declared 
that he would willingly spend his life in the 
bosom of the Wentworth family ; that they 
were the kindest, simplest, most amiable 
people in the world, and that he had taken 
a prodigious fancy to them all. The 
Baroness quite agreed with him that they 
were simple and kind ; they were thoroughly 



IV.] . 103 

nice people, and she liked them extremely. 
The girls were perfect ladies ; it was impossi- 
ble to be more of a lady than Charlotte 
Wentworth, in spite of her little village air. 
" But as for thinking them the best company 
in the world," said the Baroness, "that is 
another thing ; and as for wishing to live 
porte a porte with them, I should as soon 
think of wishing myself back in the convent 
again, to wear a bombazine apron and sleep 
in a dormitory." And yet the Baroness was 
in high good-humour; she had been very 
much pleased. With her lively perception 
and her refined imagination, she was capable 
of enjoying anything that was characteristic, 
anything that was good of its kind. The 
Wentworth household seemed to her very 
perfect of its kind — ^wonderfully peaceful and 
unspotted; pervaded by a sort of dove- 
coloured freshness that had all the quietude 
and benevolence of what she deemed to be 
Quakerism, and yet seemed to be founded 
upon a degree of material abundance for 
which, in certain matters of detail, one might 



I04 . . 

have looked in vain at the frugal little court 
of Silberstadt-Schreckenstein. She perceived 
immediately that her American relatives 
thought and talked very little about money ; 
and this of itself made an impression upon 
Eugenia's imagination. She perceived at 
the same time that if Charlotte or Gertrude 
should ask their father for a very considerable 
sum he would at once place it in their 
hands ; and this made a still greater impres- 
sion. The greatest impression of all, 
perhaps, was made by another rapid in- 
duction. The Baroness had an immediate 
conviction that Robert Acton would put his 
hand into his pocket every day in the week 
if that rattle-pated little sister of his should 
bid him. The men in this country, said the 
Baroness, are evidently very obliging. Her 
declaration that she was looking for rest and 
retirement had been by no means wholly 
untrue ; nothing that the Baroness said was 
wholly untrue. It is but fair to add, per- 
haps, that nothing that she said was wholly 
true. She wrote to a friend in Germany 



IV.] . 105 

that it was a return to nature; it was like 
drinking new milk, and she was very fond of 
new milk. She said to herself, of course, 
that it would be a little dull ; but there can 
be no better proof of her good spirits than 
the fact that she thought she should not 
mind its being a little dull. It seemed to 
her, when from the piazza of her eleemosy- 
nary cottage she looked out over the 
soundless fields, the stony pastures, the 
clear-faced ponds, the rugged little orchards, 
that she had never been in the midst of so 
peculiarly intense a stillness ; it was almost a 
delicate sensual pleasure. It was all very 
good, very innocent and safe, and out of it 
something good must come. Augustine, 
indeed, who had an unbounded faith in her 
mistress's wisdom and far-sightedness, was a 
great deal perplexed and depressed. She 
was always ready to take her cue when she 
understood it; but she liked to understand 
it, and on this occasion comprehension 
failed. What, indeed, was the Baroness 
doing dans cette galere ? what fish did she 



io6 . . 

expect to land out of these very stagnant 
waters? The game was evidently a deep 
one. Augustine could trust her, but the 
sense of walking in the dark betrayed itself 
in the physiognomy of this spare, sober, 
sallow, middle-aged person, who had nothing 
in common with Gertrude Wentworth's 
conception of a soubrette, by the most 
ironical scowl that had ever rested upon the 
unpretending tokens of the peace and plenty 
of the Wentworths. Fortunately, Augustine 
could quench scepticism in action. She 
quite agreed with her mistress — or rather 
she quite outstripped her mistress — in 
thinking that the little white house was 
pitifully bare. " II faudra," said Augustine, 
"lui faire un peu de toilette." And she 
began to hang up portieres in the doorways; 
to place wax candles, procured after some 
research, in unexpected situations; to dis- 
pose anomalous draperies over the arms of 
sofas and the backs of chairs. The 
Baroness had brought with her to the New 
World a copious provision of the element of 



IV.] . 107 

costume; and the two Miss Wentworths, 
when they came over to see her, were 
somewhat bewildered by the obtrusive 
distribution of her wardrobe. There were 
India shawls suspended, curtain-wise, in the 
parlour door, and curious fabrics, corre- 
sponding to Gertrude*s metaphysical vision 
of an opera-cloak, tumbled about in the 
sitting-places. There were pink silk blinds 
in the windows, by which the room was 
strangely bedimmed; and along the chim- 
ney-piece was disposed a remarkable band of 
velvet, covered with coarse, dirty-looking 
lace. " I have been making myself a little 
comfortable," said the Baroness, much to the 
confusion of Charlotte, who had feen on the 
point of proposing to come and Ijielp her put 
her superfluous draperies away. But what 
Charlotte mistook for an almost culpably 
delayed subsidence Gertrude very presently 
perceived to be the most ingenious, the most 
interesting, the most romantic intention. 
"What is life, indeed, without curtains?" 
she secretly asked herself; and she appeared 



io8 . . 

to herself to have been leading hitherto an 
existence singularly garish and totally devoid 
of festoons. 

Felix was not a young man who troubled 
himself greatly about anything — least of 
all about the conditions of enjoyment. His 
faculty of enjoyment was so large, so 
unconsciously eager, that it may be said of 
it that it had a permanent advance upon 
embarrassment and sorrow.. His sentient 
nature was intrinsically joyous, and novelty 
and change were in themselves a delight to 
him. As they had come to him with a 
great deal of frequency, his life had ueen 
more agreeable than appeared. Never was 
a nature more perfectly fortunate. It was 
not a restless, apprehensive, ambitious spirit, 
running a race with the tyranny of fate, but 
a temper so unsuspicious as to put Adversity 
off her guard, dodging and evading her with 
the easy, natural motion of a wind-shifted 
flower. Felix extracted entertainment from 
all things, and all his faculties — his imagin- 
ation, his intelligence, his affections, his 



iv.J . 109 

senses — had a hand in the game. It seemed 
to him that Eugenia and he had been very 
well treated ; there was something absolutely 
touching in that combination of paternal 
liberality and social considerateness which 
marked Mr. Wentworth's deportment. It 
was most uncommonly kind of him, for 
instance, to have given them a house. 
Felix was positively amused at having a 
house of his own ; for the little white cottage 
among the apple-trees — the chalet, as 
Madame Miinster always called it — was 
much more sensibly his own than any 
domiciliary quatrieme^ looking upon a court, 
with the rent overdue. Felix. had spent a 
good deal of his life in looking into courts, 
with a perhaps slightly tattered pair of 
elbows resting upon the ledge of a high- 
perched window, and the thin smoke of a 
cigarette rising into an atmosphere in which 
street-cries died away and the vibration of 
chimes from ancient belfries became sensible. 
He had never known anything so infinitely 
rural as these New England fields ; and he 



no . fcH. 

took a great fancy to all their pastoral 
roughness. He had never had a greater 
sense of luxurious security ; and at the risk 
of making him seem a rather sordid adven- 
turer I must declare that he found an 
irresistible charm in the fact that he might 
dine every day at his uncle*s. The charm 
was irresistible, however, because his fancy 
flung a rosy light over this homely privilege. 
He appreciated highly the fare that was set 
before him. There was a kind of fresh- 
looking abundance about it which made him 
think that people must have lived so in the 
mythological era, when they spread their 
tables upon* the grass, replenished them 
from cornucopias, and had no particular 
need of kitchen stoves. But the great thing 
that Felix enjoyed was having found a 
family — sitting in the midst of gentle, 
generous people whom he might call by 
their first names. He had never known any- 
thing more charming than the attention they 
paid to what he said. It was like a large 
sheet of clean, fine-grained drawing-paper, 



IV.] . in 

all ready to be washed over with effective 
splashes of water-colour. He had never 
had any cousins, and he had never before 
found himself in contact so unrestricted with 
young unmarried ladies. He was extremely 
fond of the society of ladies, and it was new 
to him that it might be enjoyed in just this 
manner. At first he hardly knew what to 
make of his state of mind. It seemed to 
him that he was in love, indiscriminately, 
with three girls at once. He saw that Lizzie 
Acton was more brilliantly pretty than 
Charlotte and Gertrude; but this was 
scarcely a superiority. His pleasure came 
from something they had in common — a 
part of which was, indeed, that physical 
delicacy which seemed to make it proper 
that they should always dress in thin 
materials and clear colours. But they were 
delicate in other ways, and it was most agree- 
able to him to feel that these latter delicacies 
were appreciable by contact, as it were. He 
had known, fortunately, many virtuous 
gentlewomen, but it now appeared to him 



112 . [cp* 

that in his relations with them (especially 
when they were unmarried) he had been 
looking at pictures under glass. He 
perceived at present what a nuisance the glass 
had been — how it perverted and interfered, 
how it caught the reflection of other objects 
and kept you walking from side to side. He 
had no need to ask himself whether Charlotte 
and Gertrude, and Lizzie Acton, were in the 
right light; they were always in the right 
light. He liked everything about them : he 
was, for instance, not at all above liking the 
fact that they had very slender feet and high 
insteps. He liked their pretty noses; he 
liked their surprised eyes and their hesi- 
tating, not at all positive way of speaking ; 
he liked so much knowing that he was 
perfectly at liberty to be alone for hours, 
anywhere, with either of them, that preference 
for one to the other, as a companion of 
solitude, remained a minor affair. Charlotte 
Wentworth's sweetly severe features were as 
agreeable as Lizzie Acton's wonderfully 
expressive blue eyes; and Gertrude's air of 



IV.] . 113 

being always ready to walk about and listen 
was as charming as anything else, especially 
as she walked very gracefully. After a while 
Felix began to distinguish; but even then 
he would often wish, suddenly, that they 
were not all so sad. Even Lizzie Acton, in 
spite of her fine little chatter and laughter, 
appeared sad. Even Clifford Wentworth, 
who had extreme youth in his favour and 
kept a buggy with enormous wheels and a 
little sorrel mare with the prettiest legs in the 
world — even this fortunate lad was apt to 
have an averted, uncomfortable glance, and 
to edge away from you at times, in the 
manner of a person with a bad conscience. 
The only person in the circle with no sense 
of oppression of any kind was, to Felix's 
perception, Robert Acton. 

It might perhaps have been feared that 
after the completion of those graceful domi- 
ciliary embellishments which have been 
mentioned Madame MUnster would have 
found herself confronted with alarming 
possibilities of ennui. But as yet she had 



114 . [en. 

not taken the alarm. The Baroness was a 
restless soul, and she projected her rest- 
lessness, as it may be said, into any situation 
that lay before her. Up to a certain point 
her resdessness might be counted upon to 
entertain her. She was always expecdng 
something to happen, and, until it was 
disappointed, expectancy itself was a delicate 
pleasure. What the Baroness expected just 
now it would take some ingenuity to set 
forth; It is enough that while she looked 
about her she found something to occupy 
her imagination. She assured herself that 
she was enchanted with her new relatives; 
she professed to herself that, like her 
brother, she felt it a sacred satisfaction to 
have found a family. It is certain that she 
enjoyed to the utmost the gentleness of her 
kinsfolk's deference. She had, first and last, 
received a great deal of admiration, and her 
experience of well-turned compliments was 
very considerable; but she knew that she 
had never been so real a power, never 
counted for. so much, as now when, for the 



IV.] . 115 

first time, the standard of comparison of her 
little circle was a prey to vagueness. The 
sense, indeed, that the good people about 
her had, as regards her remarkable self, no 
standard of comparison at all gave her a 
feeling of almost illimitable power. It was 
true, as she said to herself, that if for this 
reason they would be able to discover 
nothing against her, so they would perhaps 
neglect to perceive some of her superior 
points; but she always wound up her 
reflections by declaring that she would take 
care of that. 

Charlotte and Gertrude were in some 
perplexity between their desire to show all 
proper attention to Madame MUnster and 
their fear of being importunate. The little 
house in the orchard had hitherto been 
occupied during the summer months by 
intimate friends of the family, or by poor 
relations who found in Mr. Wentworth a 
landlord attentive to repairs and oblivious of 
quarter-day. Under these circumstances 
the open door of the small house and that of 



ii6 . . 

the large one, facing each other across their 
homely gardens, levied no tax upon hourly 
visits. But the Misses Wentworth received 
an impression that Eugenia was no friend to 
the primitive custom of " dropping in ; " she 
evidently had no idea of living without a 
door-keeper. " One goes into your house 
as into an inn — except that there are no 
servants rushing forward," she said to 
Charlotte. And she added that that was 
very charniing. Gertrude explained to her 
sister that she meant just the reverse; she 
didn't like it at all. Charlotte inquired why 
she should tell an untruth, and Gertrude 
answered that there was probably some very 
good reason for it which they should 
discover when they knew her better. 
"There can surely be no good reason for 
telling an untruth," said Charlotte. " I 
hope she does not think so." 

They had of course desired, from the first, 
to do everything in the way of helping her 
to arrange herself. It had seemed to 
Charlotte that there would be a great many 



IV.] . 117 

things to talk about ; but the Baroness was 
apparently inclined to talk about nothing. 

"Write her a note, asking her leave 
to come and see her. I think that is what 
she will like," said Gertrude. 

"Why should I give her the trouble of 
answering me?" Charlotte asked. "She 
will have to write a note and send it over." 

" I don't think she wiU take any trouble," 
said Gertrude, profoundly. 

" What then will she do ? " 

" That is what I am curious to see," said 
Gertrude, leaving her sister with an 
impression that her curiosity was morbid. 

They went to see the Baroness without 
preliminary correspondence : and in the 
little salon which she had already created, 
with its becommg light and its festoons, they 
found Robert Acton. 

Eugenia was intensely gracious, but she 
accused them of neglecting her cruelly. 
" You see Mr. Acton has had to take pity 
upon me," she said. " My brother goes off 
sketching, for hours ; I can never depend 



ii8 . . 

upon him. So I was to send Mr. Acton to 
beg you to come and give me the benefit oi 
your wisdom." 

Gertrude looked at her sister. She 
wanted to say, " That is what she would 
have done." Charlotte said that they 
hoped the Baroness would always come 
and dine with them ; it would give them 
so much pleasure; and, in that case, she 
would spare herself the trouble of having a 
cook. 

" Ah, but I must have a cook ! " cried the 
Baroness. "An old negress in a yellow 
turban. I have set my heart upon that. I 
want to look out of my window and see 
her sitting there on the grass, against the 
backgroimd of those crooked, dusky little 
apple-trees, pulling the husks off a lapful of 
Indian corn. That will be local colour, you 
know. There isn't much of it here — you 
don't mind my saying that, do you ? — so one 
must make the most of what one can get. 
I shall be most happy to dine with you 
whenever you will let me ; but I want to be 



iv.J . 119 

able to ask you sometimes. And I want to 
be able to ask Mr. Acton,** added the 
Baroness. 

" You must come and ask me at home,'* 
said Acton. " You must come and see me ; 
you must dine with me first. 1 want to 
show you my place; I want to introduce 
you to my mother.'* He called again upon 
Madame Miinster, two days later. He was 
constantly at the other house; he used to 
walk across the fields from his own place, 
and he appeared to have fewer scruples than 
his cousins with regard to dropping in. On 
this occasion he found that Mr. Brand had 
come to pay his respects to the charming 
stranger ; but after Acton's arrival the young 
theologian said nothing. He sat in his 
chair with his two hands clasped, fixing upon 
his hostess a grave, fascinated stare. The 
Baroness talked to Robert Acton, but, as she 
talked, she turned and smiled at Mr. Brand, 
who never took his eyes off her. The two 
men walked away together ; they were going 
to Mr. Wentworth's. Mr. Brand still said 



I20 . . 

nothing ; but after they had passed into Mr. 
Wentworth's garden he stopped and looked 
back for some time at the little white house. 
Then, looking at his companion, with his 
head bent a little to one side and his eyes 
somewhat contracted, " Now I suppose 
that's what is called conversation," he said; 
" real conversation." 

" It's what I call a very clever woman," 
said Acton, laughing. 

"It is most interesting," Mr. Brand 
continued. "I only wish she would speak 
French; it would seem more in keeping. 
It must be quite the style that we have 
heard about, that we have read about — ^the 
style of conversation of Madame de Stael, of 
Madame Recamier." 

Acton also looked at Madame Miinster's 
residence among its hollyhocks and apple- 
trees. "What I should like to know," he 
said, smiling, "is just what has brought 
Madame Recamier to live in that place ! " 



v.] . 121 



CHAPTER V. 

Mr. Wentworth, with his cane and his 
gloves in his hand, went every afternoon to 
call upon his niece. A couple of hours later 
she came over to the great house to tea. 
She had let the proposal that she should 
regularly dine there fall to the ground ; she 
was in the enjoyment of whatever satisfac- 
tion was to be derived from the spectacle of 
an old negress in a crimson turban shelling 
peas imder the apple-trees. Charlotte, who 
had provided the ancient negress, thought 
it must be a strange household, Eugenia 
having told her that Augustine managed 
everything, the ancient negress included — 
Augustine, who was naturally devoid of all 
acquaintance with the expurgatory English 
tongue. By far the most immoral sentiment 
which I shall have occasion to attribute to 



122 . . 

Charlotte Wentworth was a certain emotion 
of disappointment at finding that in spite of 
these irregular conditions the domestic ar- 
rangements at the small house were appar- 
ently not — from Eugenia's peculiar point of 
view — strikingly offensive. The Baroness 
found it amusing to go to tea ; she dressed 
as if for dinner. The tea-table offered an 
anomalous and picturesque repast; and on 
leaving it they all sat and talked in the large 
piazza, or wandered about the garden in the 
starlight, with their ears full of those sounds 
of strange insects which, though they are 
supposed to be, all over the world, a part of 
the magic of summer nights, seemed to the 
Baroness to have, beneath these western 
skies, an incomparable resonance. 

Mr. Wentworth, though, as I say, he 
went punctiliously to call upon her, was not 
able to feel that he was getting used to his 
niece. It taxed his imagination to believe 
that she was really his half-sisters child. 
His sister was a figure of his early years; 
she had been only twenty when she went 



v.] . 123 

abroad, never to return, making in foreign 
parts a wilful and undesirable marriage. 
His aunt, Mrs. Whiteside, who had taken 
her to Europe for the benefit of the tour, 
gave, on her return, so lamentable an 
account of Mr. Adolphus Young, to whom 
the headstrong girl had united her destiny, 
that it operated as a chill upon family- 
feeling — especially in the case of the half- 
brothers. Catherine had done nothing 
subsequently to propitiate her family; she 

had not even written to them in a way that 
indicated a lucid appreciation of their 
suspended sympathy ; so that it had become 
a tradition in Boston circles that the highest 
charity, as regards this young lady, was to 
think it well to forget her and to abstain 
from conjecture as to the extent to which 
her aberrations were reproduced in her 
descendants. Over these young people — 
a vague report of their existence had come 
to his ears — Mr. Wentworth had not, in the 
course of years, allowed his imagination to 
hover. It had plenty of occupation nearer 



124 . . 

home and, though he had many cares upon 
his conscience, the idea that he had been an 
unnatural uncle was, very properly, never 
among the number. Now that his nephew 
and niece had come before him, he per- 
ceived that they were the fruit of influences 
and circumstances very different from those 
under which his own familiar progeny had 
reached a vaguely-qualified maturity. He 
felt no provocation to say that these influ- 
ences had been exerted for evil ; but he was 
sometimes afraid that he should not be able 
to like his distinguished, delicate, lady-like 
niece. He was paralyzed and bewildered by 
her foreignness. She spoke, somehow, a 
different language. There was something 
strange in her words. He had a feeling that 
another man, in his place, would accommo- 
date himself to her tone; would ask her 
questions and joke with her, reply to those 
pleasantries of her own which sometimes 
seemed startling as addressed to an uncle. 
But Mr. Wentworth could not do these 
things. He could not even bring himself 



v.] . 125 

to attempt to measure her position in the 
world. She was the wife of a foreign noble- 
man who desired to repudiate her. This 
had a singular sound, but the old man felt 
himself destitute of the materials for a 
judgment. It seemed to him that he ought 
to find them in his own experience, as a 
man of the world and an almost public 
character ; but they were not there, and he 
was ashamed to confess to himself — much 
more to reveal to Eugenia by interrogations 
possibly too innocent — the unfurnished 
condition of this repository. 

It appeared to him that he could get 
much nearer, as he would have said, to his 
nephew ; though he was not sure that Felix 
was altogether safe. He was so bright and 
handsome and talkative that it was im- 
possible not to think well of him ; and yet it 
seemed as if there were something almost 
impudent, almost vicious — or as if there 
ought to be — in a young man being at once 
so joyous and so positive. It was to be 
observed that while Felix was not at all a 



126 . [cH. 

serious young man there was somehow 
more of him — he had more weight and 
volume and resonance — than a number of 
young men who were distinctly serious. 
While Mr. Wentworth meditated upon this 
anomaly his nephew was admiring him 
unrestrictedly. He thought him a most 
delicate, generous, high-toned old gentle- 
man, with a very handsome head, of the 
ascetic type, which he promised himself the 
profit of sketching. Felix was far from 
having made a secret of the fact that he 
wielded the paint-brush, and it was not his 
own fault if it failed to be generally 
understood that he was prepared to execute 
the most striking likenesses on the most 
reasonable terms. "He is an artist — my 
cousin is an artist," said Gertrude ; and she 
offered this information to every one who 
would receive it. She offered it to her- 
self, as it were, by way of admonition 
and reminder; she repeated to herself at 
odd moments, in lonely places, that Felix 
was invested with this sacred character. 



v.] . 127 

Grertrude had never seen an artist before; 
she had only read about such people. 
They seemed to her a romantic and 
mysterious class, whose life was made up 
of those agreeable accidents that never 
happened to other persons. And it merely 
quickened her meditations on this point that 
Felix should declare, as he repeatedly did, 
that he was really not an artist. "I have 
never gone into the thing seriously," he- 
said. "I have never studied; I have had 
no training. I do a little of everything, and 
nothing well. I am only an amateur." 

It .pleased Gertrude even more to think 
that he was an amateur than to think that 
he was an artist ; the former word, to her 
fancy, had an even subtler connotation. 
She knew, however, that it was a word to use 
more soberly. Mr. Wentworth used it 
freely; for though he had not been exactly 
familiar with it, he found it convenient as a 
help toward classifying Felix, who, as a 
young man extremely clever and active and 
apparently respectable and yet not engaged 



128 . . 

in any recognized business, was an impor- 
tunate anomaly. Of course the Baroness 
and her brother — she was always spoken of 
first — were a welcome topic of conversation 
between Mr. Wentworth and his daughters 
and their occasional visitors. 

"And the young man, your nephew, 
what is his profession r " asked an old 
gentleman — Mr. Broderip, of Salem — ^who 
had been Mr. Wentworth's class-mate at 
Harvard College in the year 1809 and who 
came into his office in Devonshire Street. 
(Mr. Wentworth, in his later years, used to 
go but three times a week to his office, 
where he had a large amount of highly 
confidential trust-business to transact.) 

"Well, he's an amateur," said Felix's 
uncle, with folded hands, and with a 
certain satisfaction in being able to say 
it. And Mr. Broderip had gone back to 
Salem with a feeling that this was probably 
a " European " expression for a broker or a 
grain-exporter. 

" I should like to do your head, sir,** said 



v.] . 129 

Felix to his uncle one evening, before them 
all — Mr. Brand and Robert Acton being 
also present. "I think I should make a 
very fine thing of it. It's an interesting 
head ; it's very mediaeval." 

Mr. Wentworth looked grave; he felt^ 
awkwardly, as if all the company had come 
in and found him standing before the 
looking-glass. "The Lord made it," he 
said. " I don't think it is for man to make 
it over again," 

"Certainly the Lord made it," replied 
Felix, laughing, " and he made it very well. 
But life has been touching up the work. It 
is a Very interesting type of head. It's 
delightfully wasted and emaciated. The 
complexion is wonderfully bleached." And 
Felix looked round at the circle, as if to 
call their attention to these interesting 
points. Mr. Wentworth grew visibly 
paler. "I should like to do you as an 
old prelate, an old cardinal, or the prior of 
an order." 



C( 



A prelate, a cardinal?" murmured Mr. 

K 



130 . . 

Wentworth. ^^Do you refer to the Roipar\ 
Catholic priesthood ? " 

^^I mean an old ecclesiastic who should 
have led a very pure, abstinent life. Now I 
take it that has been the case with you^ sir ; 
one sees it in your face," Felix proceeded. 
"You have been very — a — ^very moderate. 
Don't you think one always sees that in a 
man's face ? '' 

"You see more in a man's face tha^ I 
should think of looking for," said Mr. 
Wentworth coldly. 

The Baroness rattled her fan and gave h^r 
brilliant laugh. ^ It is a risk to look so close ! " 
she exclaimed. *^ My uncle has some pecca- 
dilloes on his conscience." Mr. Wentworth 
looked at her, painfully at a loss ; and in so far 
as the signs of a pure and abstinent life were 
visible in his face they were then probably 
peculiarly manifest. " You are a beau vieil- 
lard, dear uncle," said Madame Miinster, 
smiling with her foreign eyes. 

" I think you are paying me a com- 
pliment," said the old man. 



v.] . 131 

" Surely, I am not the first woman that 
ever did so ! " cried the Baroness. 

^^I think you are," said Mr. Wentworth 
gravely. And turning to Felix he added, in 
the same tone, " Please don't take my 
likeness. My children have my daguerreo- 
t3rpe. That is quite satisfactory." 

^^I won't promise," said Felix, "not to 
work your head into something ! " 

Mr. Wentworth looked at him and then 
at all the others ; and then he got up and 
slowly walked away. 

"Felix,'* said Gertrude, in the silence that 
followed, " I wish you would paint my 
portrait." 

Charlotte wondered whether Gertrude was 

right m wishing this; and she looked at 

Mr. Brand as the most legitimate way of 

ascertaining. Whatever Gertrude did or 

said, Charlotte always looked at Mr. Brand. 

It was a standing pretext for looking at Mri 

Brand — always, as Charlotte thought, in the 

interest of Gertrude's welfare. It is true that 

she felt a tremulous interest in Gertrude 

E 2 



132 . . 

being right ; for Charlotte, in her small, still 
way, was an heroic sister. 

"We should be glad to have your 
portrait. Miss Gertrude," said Mr. Brand. 

"I should be delighted to paint so 
charming a model," Felix declared. 

"Do you think you are so lovely, my 
dear ? " asked Lizzie Acton, with her little 
inoffensive pertness, biting off a knot in her 
knitting. 

" It is not because I think I am beautiful," 
said Gertrude, looking all round. " I don't 
think I am beautiful, at all." She spoke 
with a sort of conscious deliberateness ; 
and it seemed very strange to Charlotte to 
hear her discussing this question so publicly. 
" It is because I think it would be amusing 
to sit and be painted. I have always thought 
that." 

"I am sorry you have not had better 
things to think about, my daughter," said 
Mr. Wentworth. 

" You are very beautiful, cousin Gertrude," 
Felix declared. 



v.] . 133 

"That's a compliment," said Gertrude. 
" I put all the compliments I receive into a 
little money-jug that has a slit in the side. 
I shake them up and down, and they rattle. 
There are not many yet — only two or three." 

"No, it's not a compliment," Felix re- 
joined. "See; I am careful not to give it 
the form of a compliment. I did not think 
you were beautiful at first. But you have 
come to seem so little by little." 

" Take care, now, your jug doesn't burst ! " 
exclaimed Lizzie. 

" I think sitting for one's portrait is only 
one of the various forms of idleness," said 
Mr. Wentworth. " Their name is legion." 

" My dear sir," cried Felix, " you can't be 
said to idle when you are making a man 
work so ! " 

"One might be painted while one is 
asleep," suggested Mr. Brand, as a contribu- 
tion to the discussion. 

" Ah, do paint me while I am asleep," said 
Gertrude to Felix, smiling. And she closed 
her eyes a litde. It had by this time 



134 . [oh. 

become a matter of almost exciting anxiety 
to Charlotte what Gertrude would say or 
would do next. 

She began to sit for her portrait on the 
following day — ^in the open air, on the north 
side of the piazza. " I wish you would tell me 
what you think of us — how we seem to you,** 
she said to Felix, as he sat before his easel. 

^^ You seem to me the best people in the 
world," said Felix. 

'^ You say that," Gertrude resumed, " be- 
cause it saves you the trouble of saying 
anything else." 

The young man glanced at her over 
the top of his canvas. "What else 
should I say? It would certainly be a 
great deal of trouble to say anything 
different." 

" Well," said Gertrude, " you have seen 
people before that you have liked, have you 
not ? " 

" Indeed I have, thank Heaven I " 

" And they have been very different from 
us," Gertrude went on. 



v.] . 135 

"That ohly proves," said Felix, "that 
there are a thousand difierent ways of being 
good company." 

"Do you tbiiik us good company?" 
asked Gertrude. 

" Company for a king ! " 

Gertrude was silent a moment ; and then, 
" There must be a thousand different ways of 
being dreary," she said ; " and sometimes I 
think we make use bf them all." 

Fehx stood up quickly, holding up his 
hand. " If you could only keep that look on 
your face for half-an-hour — while I catch it ! " 
he said. " It is uncommonly handsome." 

"To look handsome for half-an-hour — 
that is a great deal to ask of me," she 
answered. 

"It would be the portrait of a young 
woman who has taken some vow, some 
pledge, that she repents of," said Felix, " and 
who is thinking it over at leisure." 

" I have taken no vow, no pledge," said 
Gertrude, very gravely. " I have nothing to 
repent of." 



136 . * . 

" My dear cousin, that was only a figure of 
speech. I am very sure that no one in your 
excellent family has anything to repent of." 

"And yet we are always repenting!" 
Gertrude exclaimed. " That is what I mean 
by our being dreary. You know it perfectly 
well ; you only pretend that you don't." 

Felix gave a quick laugh. "The half- 
hour is going on, and yet you are handsomer 
than ever. One must be careful what one 
says, you see." 

"To me," said Gertrude, "you can say 
anything." 

Felix looked at her, as an artist might, 
and painted for some time in silence. " Yes, 
you seem to me different from your father 
and sister — from most of the people you 
have lived with," he observed. 

"To say that one's self," Gertrude went 
on, " is like saying — by implication, at least 
— that one is better. I am not better ; I 
am much worse. But they say themselves 
that I am different. It makes them un- 
happy." 



v.] . 137 

" Since you accuse me of concealing my 
real impressions, I may admit that I think 
the tendency — among you generally — is to 
be made unhappy too easily." 

" I wish you would tell that to my father," 
said Gertrude. 

"It might make him more unhappy I" 
Felix exclaimed, laughing. 

" It certainly would. I don't believe you 
have seen people like that." 

" Ah, my dear cousin, how do you know 
what I have seen?" Felix demanded. 
" How can I tell you ? " 

" You might tell me a great many things, 
if you only would. You have seen people 
like yourself — people who are bright and 
gay and fond of amusement. We are not 
fond of amusement." 

"Yes," said Felix, "I confess that rather 
strikes me. You don't seem to me to get 
all the pleasure out of life that you might. 
You don't seem to me to enjoy . . . Do 
you mind my saying this ? " he asked, 
pausmg. 



138 . . 

** Please go on," said the girl, earnestly. 

*^ You seem to me very well placed, for 
fenjoying. You have money and liberty and 
what is called in Europe a * position.' But 
you take a painful view of life, as one itiay 
say. 

"One ought to think it bright ind 
charming and delightful, eh?" asked Ger- 
trude. 

" I should say so — if one can. It is true 
it all depends upon that," Felix added. 

" You know there is a great deal of misery 
in the world," said his model. 

"1 have seen a httle of it," the young 
man rejoined. " But it was aU ovei there-^ 
beyond the sea. I don't see any here. 
This is a paradise." 

Gertrude said nothing ; she sat looking at 
the dahlias and the currant-bushes in the 
garden, while Felix went on with his work. 
"To ^ enjoy,'" she began at last, "to take 
life — not painfully, must one do something 
wrong ^ " 

Felix gave his long, light laugh again. 



v.] . 139 

^Seriously, I think not. And for this 
reason, among others : you strike me as 
very capable of enjoying, if the chance were 
given you, and yet at the same time as 
incapable of wrong-doing." 

'^ I am sure," said Gertrude, " that you are 
very wrong in telling a person that she is 
incapable of that. We are never nearer to 
evil than when we believe that." 

"You are handsomer than ever," ob- 
served Felix, irrelevantly. 

Gertrude had got used to hearing him 
say this. There was not so much excite- 
ment in it as at first. " What ought one to 
do?" die continued. "To give parties, to 
go to the theatre, to read novels, to keep 
late hours ? " 

" I don't think it's what one does or one 
doesn't do that promotes enjoyment," her 
companion answered. "It is the general 
way of looking at life." 

"They look at it as a discipline — that is 
what they do here. I have often been told 
that." 



Uo . [ck 

"Well, that's very good. But there is 
another way," added Felix, smiling: "to 
look at it as an opportunity." 

"An opportunity — yes," said Gertrude. 
" One would get more pleasure that way." 

"I don't attempt to say anything better 
for it than that it has been my own way— 
and that is not saying much ! " Felix had 
laid down his palette and brushes; he was 
leaning back, with his arms folded, to judge 
the effect of his work. '^And you know," 
he said, " I am a very petty personage." 

"You have a great deal of talent," said 
Gertrude. 

" No — no," the young man rejoined, in a 
tone of cheerful impartiality, "I have not a 
great deal of talent. It is nothing at all 
remarkable. I assure you I should know if 
it were.* I shall always be obscure. The 
world will never hear of me." Gertrude 
looked at him with a strange feeling. She 
was thinking of the great world which he 
knew and which she did not, and how full of 
brilliant talents it must be, since it could 



v.] . 141 

afford to make light of his abilities. " You 
needn't in general attach much importance 
to anything I tell you," he pursued ; ^^ but 
you may beUeve me when I say this — that I 
am little better than a good-natured feather- 
head." 

"A feather-head ? " she repeated, 

" I am a species of Bohemian." 

^^A Bohemian?" Gertrude had never 
heard this term before, save as a geo- 
graphical denomination ; and she quite 
failed to understand the figurative meaning 
which her companion appeared to attach to 
it. But it gave her pleasure. 

Felix had pushed back his chair and risen 
to his feet; he slowly came toward her, 
smiling. "I am a sort of adventurer," he 
said, looking down at her. 

She got up, meeting his smile. "An 
adventurer ? " she repeated. " I should like 
to hear your adventures." 

For an instant she believed that he was 
going to take her hand ; but he dropped his 
own haij|ds suddenly into the pockets of his 



143 . , 

painting-jacket. "There is no reason wky 
you shouldA t," he said. " I have been ^ 
adventurer, but my adventures have heett 
very innocent. They have all been happy 
ones; I don't think there are any I 
shouldn't tell. They were very pleasaafi 
and very pretty ; I should like to go over 
them in memory. Sit down again, aacf I 
will begin," he added in a moment, witli his 
naturally persuasive smile. 

Gertrude sat down again on that day, and 
she sat down on several other days. Felix^ 
while he plied his brush, told her a great 
many stories, and she listened with channedi 
avidity. Her eyes rested upon his lips ; ^e 
was very serious ; sometimes, from her air ofi 
wondering gravity, he thought she was di»v 
pleased. But Felix never believed for more 
than a single moment in any displeasure of 
his own producing; This would have beea 
fatuity if the optimism it expressed had not 
been much more a hope than a prejudice. 
It is beside the matter to say that he had a 
good conscience ; for the best conscience is 



v.] . 143 

a soft of self-reproach, and this young 
man's brilliantly healthy nature spent itself 
in objective good intentions which were 
ignorant of any test save exactness in hitting 
their mark. He told Gertrude how he had 
walked over Prance and Italy with a painter's 
knapsack on his back, paying his way often 
by knocking off a flattering portrait of his 
host or hostess. He told her how he had 
played the violin in a little band of musicians 
Ts-not of high celebrity — who travelled 
^ough foreign lands giving provincial 
concerts. He told her also how he had 
been a moment^ ornament of a troop of 
stroHing actors, engaged in the arduous task 
of interpreting Shakspeare to French and 
German, Polish and Hungarian audiences. 

While this periodical recital was going on, 
Gertrude lived in a fantastic world; she 
seemed to herself to be reading a romance 
that came out in daily numbers. She had 
l^nown nothing so delightful since the 
perusal of Nicholas Nichleby. One after- 
noon she went to see her cousin, Mrs. 



144 . . 

Acton; Robert's mother, who was a great 
invalid, never leaving the house. She came 
back alone, on foot, across the fields — this 
being a short way which they often used 
Felix had gone to Boston with her father, 
who desired to take the young man to call 
upon some of his friends, old gentlemen who 
remembered his mother — remembered her, 
but said nothing about her — and several of 
whom, with the gentle ladies their wives, had 
driven out from town to pay their respects at 
the little house among the apple-trees, in 
vehicles which reminded the Baroness, who 
received her visitors with discriminating 
civility, of the large, light, rattling barouche 
in which she herself had made her journey 
to this neighbourhood. The afternoon was 
waning ; in the western sky the great pic- 
ture of a New England sunset, painted in 
crimson and silver, was suspended from the 
zenith ; and the stony pastures, as Gertrude 
traversed them, thinking intently to herself, 
were covered with a light, clear glow. At 
the open gate of one of the fields she saw 



v.] . 145 

from the distance a man's figure ; he stood 
there as if he were waiting for her, and as 
she came nearer she recognized Mr. Brand. 
She had a feeling as of not having seen him 
for some time ; she could not have said for 
how long, for it yet seemed to her that he 
had been very lately at the house. 

" May I walk back with you ? " he asked. 
And when she had said that he might if he 
wanted, he observed that he had seen her 
and recognized her half-a-mile away, 

"You must have very good eyes," said 
Gertrude. 

"Yes, I have very good eyes, Miss 
Gertrude," said Mr. Brand. She perceived 
that he meant something ; but for a long 
time past Mr. Brand had constantly meant 
something, and she had almost got used to 
it. She felt, however, that what he meant 
had now a renewed power to disturb her, to 
perplex and agitate her. He walked beside 
her in silence for a moment, and then he 
added, " I have had no trouble in seeing that 
you are beginning to avoid me. But 



L 



146 . . 

perhaps/' he went on, "one needn't have 
had very good eyes to see that." 

" I have not avoided you/' said Gertrude, 
without looking >at hina. 

^^ I think you have been unconscious tbftt 
you were avoiding me/' Mr. Brand TeplioL 
"You have ndt. even known that I was 
there." 

" Well, you are here now, Mr. Brand ! " 
said Gertrude^ with a short laugh. " I know 
that very weU." 

He made no rejoinder. He simply 
walked beside her, slowly, as they were 
obliged to walk over the soft grass. 
Presently they came to another gate, which 
was closed. Mr. Brand laid his hand upon 
it, but he made no movement to open it; he 
stood and looked at his companion. " You 
are very much interested — very much 
absorbed," he said. 

Gertrude glanced at him ; she saw that he 
was pale and that he looked excited. She 
had never seen Mr. Brand excited before, 
and she felt that the spectacle, if fully carried 



v.] . 147 

out, would be impressive, almost painful. 
*' Absorbed in what ? " she asked. Then she 
looked away, at the illuminated sky. She 
feit guilty and uncomfortable, and yet she 
was vexed with herself for feeling so. But 
Mr. Brand, as he stood there looking at her 
with his small, kind, persistent eyes, repre- 
sented an immense body of half-obliterated 
obligations, that were rising again into a 
certain distinctness. 

"You have new interests, new occupa- 
tions," he went on. "I don't know that I 
can say that you have new duties. We 
have always old ones, Gertrude," he added. 

"Please open the gate, Mr. Brand," she 
said ; and she felt as if, in saying so, she 
were cowardly and petulant. But he opened 
the gate, and allowed her to pass ; then he 
closed it behind himself. Before she had 
time to turn away he put out his hand and 
held her an instant by the wrist. 

"I want to say something to you," he 
said. 

" I know what you want to say," she 



148 . . 

answered. And she was on the point of 
adding, ^^ And I know just how you will say 
it ; " but these words she kept back. 

"I love you, Gertrude," he said. "I 
love you very much ; I love you more than 
ever." 

He said the words just as she had known 
he would ; she had heard them before- 
They had no charm for her ; she had said 
to herself before that it was very strange. 
It was supposed to be delightful for a 
woman to listen to such words; but these 
seemed to her flat and mechanical. " I wish 
you would forget that," she declared. 

^^ How can I — ^why should I ? " he asked. 

" I have made you no promise — given 
you no pledge," she said, looking at him, 
with her voice trembling a little. 

"You have let me feel that I have an 
influence over you. You have opened your 
mind to me." 

"I never opened my mind to you, Mr. 
Brand ! " Gertrude cried with some vehe- 
mence. 



Y.J . 149 

" Then you were not so frank as I thought 
— as we all thought." 

" I don't see what any one else had to do 
with it ! " cried the girl. 

"I mean your father and your sister* 
You know it makes them happy to think 
you will listen to me." 

She gave a little laugh. " It doesn't make 
them happy," she said. "Nothing makes 
them happy. No one is happy here." 

" I think your cousin is very happy — Mr. 
Young," rejoined Mr. Brand, in a soft, 
almost timid tone. 

"So much the better for him!" And 
Gertrude gave her little laugh again. 

The young man looked at her a moment. 
^ You are very much changed," he said. 

" I am glad to hear it," Gertrude declared. 

"I am not. I have known you a long 
time, and I have loved you as you were." 

" I am much obliged to you," said 
Gertrude. " I must be going home." 

He, on his side, gave a little laugh. 
*' You certainly do avoid me — ^you see ! " 



ISO . . 

"Avoid me, then," said the girl. 

He looked at her again; and then, very 
gently, "No, I will not avoid yon,'* he re- 
plied ; " but I will leave you, for the present, 
to yourself. I think you will remember — 
after a while— some of the things you have 
forgotten. I think you will come back to 
me ; I have great faith in that." 

This time his voice was very touching; 
there was a strong reproachful force in what 
he said, and Gertrude could answer nothing. 
He turned away and stood there, leaning his 
elbows on the gate and looking at the beauti^ 
ful sunset. Gertrude left him and took her 
way home again ; but when she reached the 
middle of the next field she suddenly burst 
into tears. Her tears seemed to her to have 
been a long time gathering, and for some 
moments it was a kind of glee to shed them. 
But they presently passed away.f There was 
something a little hard in Gertrude ; and she 
never wept again. 



VI.1 . 151 



CHAPTER VI. 

Going o£ aa afternoon to call upon his 
ntece^ Mr. Wentworth more than once 
£annd Robert Acton sitting in her little 
dnlwk^-room. This was in no degree, to 
Mr. Wentworth, a perturbing fact, for he 
hdd no sense of competing with his 
young kinsman for Eugenia's good graces. 
Madame Miinster's uncle had the highest 
opinion of Robert Acton, who, indeed, in 
the feimily at larg^ was the object of a great 
d^ of undemonstrative appreciation. They 
were all proud of him, in so far as the charge 
of being, proud may be brought against 
people who were, habitually, distinctly 
guiltless of the misdemeanour known as 
"taking credit." They never boasted of 
Robert Acton, nor indulged in vain-glorious 
reference to him ; they never quoted the 



154 . . 

all things — ^beginning with his estimate of 
himself. He knew that he was by no means 
so much of a man of the world as he wad 
(Supposed to be in local circles ; but it must 
be added that he knew also that his natural 
sfhrewdness had a reach of which he had 
never quite given local circles the itieasure. 
He was addicted to taking the humorous 
view of things, and he had discovered that 
even in the narrowest circles such a dis- 
position may find frequent opportunities. 
Such opportunities had formed for sonie 
time — ^that is, since his return from China^ 
a year and a half beforeT— the most actire 
element in this gentleman's lifi^ which had 
just now a rather indolent air. He was 
perfectly willing to get married. He was 
very fond of books, and he had a hamlsorae 
library ; that is, his books were much more 
numerous than Mr. Wentworth's. He was 
aiso very fond of pictures; but it must be 
confessed, in the fierce light of con- 
temporary criticism, that his walls were 
adorned with several rather abortive master- 



V . 153 

liked any individual much better than all 
other individuals; but he thought Robert 
Acton extremely judicious; and this was 
perhaps as near an approach as he was 
capable of to the eagerness of preference, 
which his temperament repudiated as it 
would have disengaged itself from some-* 
thing slightly unchaste. Acton was, in fact, 
very judicious — and something more beside ; 
and indeed it must be claimed for Mr. 
Wentworth that in the more illicit parts of 
his preference there hovered the vague 
adumbration of a belief that his cousin's 
final merit was a certain enviable capacity 
for whistling, rather gallantly, at the sane- 
tions of mere judgment — for showing a 
larger courage, a finer quality of pluck, 
than common occasion demanded. Mr. 
Wentworth would never have risked the 
intimation that Acton was made, in the 
smallest degree, of the stuff" of a hero ; but 
this is small blame to him, for Robert would 
certainly never have risked it himself. 
Acton certainly exercised great discretion in 



154 . . 

all things — ^beginning with his estimate of 
himself. He knew that he was by na means 
so much of a man of the world as he wad 
(Supposed to be in local circles ; but it must 
be added that he knew also that his natural 
sfhrewdness had a reach of which he had 
never quite given local circles the rtieasure. 
He was addicted to taking the humorous 
view of things, and he had discovered that 
even in the narrowest circles such a dis- 
position may find frequent opportunities. 
Such opportunities had formed for sonie 
time — ^that is, since his return from China^ 
a year and a half before^— the most actire 
element in this gentleman's life, which had 
just now a rather indolent air. He was 
perfectly willing to get married. He was 
very fond of books, and he had a hamlsorae 
library ; that is, his books were much more 
numerous than Mr. Wentwoith's. He was 
abo very fond of pictures; but it must be 
confessed, in the fierce light of con- 
temporary criticism, that his walls were 
adorned with several rather abortive master- 



vr.] . 155 

pieces. He had got his learning — and there 
was more of it than commonly appeared — ^at 
Harvard College ; and he took a pleasure in 
old associations which made it a part of his 
daily contentment to live so near this insti- 
tution that he often passed it in driving to 
Boston. He was extremely interested in the 
Baroness Miinster. 

She was very frank with him ; or at least 
sh^ intended to be. "I am sure you find 
it very strange that I should have settled 
down in this out-of-the-way part of the 
world ! *' she said to him three or four weeks 
after she had installed herself. " I am certain 
you are wondering about my motives. They 
are very pure.'* The Baroness by this time 
was art old inhabitant; the best society in 
Boston had called upon her, and Clifford 
Wentworth had taken her several times to 
drive in his buggy. 

Robert Acton was seated near her, playing 
with a fan; there were always several fens 
lying about her drawing-room, with long 
ribbons of different colours attached to 



156 . [ca 

them, and Acton was always playing with 
one. " No, I don't find it at all strange," he 
said slowly, smiling. "That a clever woman 
should turn up in Boston, or its suburbs — 
that doesn't require so much explanation. 
Boston is a very nice place." 

"If you wish to make me contradict 
you," said the Baroness, '\vous vous y prenez 
mal. In certain moods there is nothing I 
am not capable of agreeing to. Boston is 
a paradise, and we are in the suburbs of 
Paradise." 

"Just now I am not at all in the suburbs; 
I am in the place itself," rejoined Acton, who 
was lounging a little in his chair. He was, 
however, not always lounging ; and when he 
was he was not quite so relaxed as he pre- 
tended. To a certain extent, he sought 
refuge from shyness in this appearance ot 
relaxation; and like many persons in the 
same circumstances, he somewhat exaggerated 
the appearance. Beyond this, the air of 
being much at his ease was a cover for 
vigilant observation. He was more than 



V . 157 

interested in this clever woman, who, what- 
ever he might say, was clever not at all after 
the Boston fashion ; she plunged him into a 
kind of excitement, held him in vague 
suspense. He was obliged to admit to him- 
self that he had never yet seen a woman just 
like this — not even in China. He was 
ashamed, for inscrutable reasons, of the 
vivacity of his emotion, and he carried it off^ 
superficially, by taking, still superficially, the 
humorous view of Madame Miinster. It 
was not at all true that he thought it very 
natural of her to have made this pious pil- 
grimage. It might have been said of him 
in advance that he was too good a Bostonian 
to regard in the light of an eccentricity the 
desire of even the remotest alien to visit the [j 
New England metropolis. This was an 
impulse for which, surely, no apology was 
needed; and Madame Miinster was the 
fortunate possessor of several New England 
cousins. In fact, however, Madame Miin- 
ster struck him as out of keeping with her 
little circle; she was at the best a very 



iS« . . 

agreeable, a gracefully mystifying, anomaly. 
He knew very well that it would not do tp 
address these reflections too crudely to Mr. 
Wentworth ; he would never have remarked 
to the old gentleman that he wondered what 
the Baroness was up to. And indeed he 
had no great desire to share his vague mis- 
trust with any one. There was a personal 
pleasure in it; the greatest pleasure he had 
known at least since he had come from 
China. He would keep the Baroness, for 
better or worse, to himself ; he had a feeling 
that he deserved to enjoy a monopoly of her, 
for he was certainly the person who had most 
adequately gauged her capacity for social 
intercourse. Before long it became apparent 
to him that the Baroness was disposed to lay 
no tax upon such a monopoly. 

One day (he was sitting there again and 
playing with a fan) she asked him to apolo- 
gize, should the occasion present itself, to 
certain people in Boston for her not having 
returned their calls. "There are half-a- 
dozen places," she said ; " a formidable list. 



V . 159 

Charlotte Wentworth has written it out for 
me, in a terrifically distinct hand. There is 
no ambiguity on the subject; 1 know 
perfectly where I must go. Mr. Went- 
worth informs me that the carriage is 
always at my disposal, and Charlotte offers 
to go with me, in a pair of tight gloves 
and a very stiff petticoat. And yet for 
three days I have been putting it 
off. They must think me horribly 



vicious." 



"You ask me to apologize," said Acton, 
"but you don't tell me what excuse I can 
offer." 

" That is more," the Baroness declared, 
" than I am held to. It would be like my 
^king you to buy me a bouquet and giving 
you the money. I have no reason except 
that — somehow — it's too violent an effort. 
It is not inspiring. Wouldn't that serve as 
an excuse, in Boston ? I am told they are 
very smcere ; they don't tell fibs. And then 
Felix ought to go with me, and he is never 
in readines.s. I don't see him. He is always 



i6o . . 

roaming about the fields and sketching old 
barns, or taking ten-mile walks, or painting 
some one's portrait, or rowing on the pond, 
or flirting with Gertrude Wentworth." 

" I should think it would amuse you to 
go and see a few people," said Acton. ^^ You 
are having a very quiet time of it here. It's 
a dull life for you." 

" Ah, the quiet — the quiet ! " the Baroness 
exclaimed. ^^ That's what I like. It's rest. 
That's what I came here for. Amusement ? 
I have had amusement. And as for seeing 
people — I have already seen a great many in 
my life. If it didn't sound ungracious I 
should say that I wish very humbly your 
people here would leave me alone ! " 

Acton looked at her a moment, and she 
looked at him. She was a woman who 
took being looked at remarkably well. 
" So you have come here for rest ? " he 
asked. 

"So I may say. I came for many of 
those reasons that are no reasons — don't you 
know ? — and yet that are really the best : to 



V . i6i 

• come away, to change, to break with every- 
thing. When once one comes away one 
must arrive somewhere, and I asked myself 
why I shouldn't arrive here." 

^^ You certainly had time, on the way ! " 
said Acton, laughing. 

Madame Miinster looked at him again; 
and then, smiling, " And I have certainly 
had time, since I got here, to ask myself why 
I came. However, I never ask myself idle 
questions. Here I am, and it seems to me 
you ought only to thank me." 

"When you go away you will see the 
difficulties I shall put in your path." 

"You mean to put difficulties in my 
path?" she asked, rearranging the rosebud 
in her corsage. 

" The greatest of all — that of having been 
so agreeable — '' 

"That I shall be unable to depart? 
Don't be too sure. I have left some very 
agreeable people over there." 

" Ah," said Acton, " but it was to come 
here, where I am I " 



M 



i62 . . 

"I didn't know of your existence. 
Excuse me for saying anything so rude; 
but, honestly speaking; I did not. No," 
the Baroness pursued, " it was precisely not 
to see you — such people as you — ^that I 
came." 

^^ Such people as me ? " cried Acton. 

"I had a sort of longing to come into 
those natural relations which I knew I 
should find here. Over there I had only, 
as I may say, artificial relations. Don't you 
see the difference ? " 

^^The difference tells against me," said 
Acton. "I suppose I am an artificial 
relation." 

" Conventional," declared the Baroness ; 
" very conventional." 

"Well, there is one way in which the 
relation of a lady and a gentleman may 
always become natural," said Acton. 

"You mean by their becoming lovers? 
That may be natural or not. And at any 
rate," rejoined Eugenia, ^'nous nen sommes 
pas la ! 



rv I »» 



V . 163 

They were not, as yet ; but a little later, 

when she began to go with him to drive, 

it might almost have seemed that they were. 

He came for her several times, alone, in his 

high " wagon," drawn by a pair of charming 

light-limbed horses. It was different, her 

having gone with Clifford Wentworth, who 

was her cousin and so much younger. It 

was not to be imagined that she should have 

a flirtation with Clifford, who was a mere 

shame-faced boy, and whom a large section 

of Boston society supposed to be ^^ engaged" 

to Lizzie Acton. Not indeed that it was 

to be conceived that the Baroness was a 

possible party to any flirtation whatever ; for 

she was undoubtedly a married lady. It 

was generally known that her matrimonial 

condition was of the " morganatic " order ; 

but in its natural aversion to suppose that 

this meant anything less than absolute 

wedlock, the conscience of the community 

took refuge in the belief that it implied 

something even more. 

Acton wished her to think highly of 

M 2 



i64 . . 

American scenery, and he drove her to great 
distances, picking out the prettiest roads 
and the largest points of view. If we are 
good when we are contented, Eugenia's 
virtues should now certainly have been 
uppermost; for she found a charm in the 
rapid movement through a wild country, and 
in a companion who from time to time 
made the vehicle dip, with a motion like a 
swallow's flight, over roads of primitive 
construction, and who, as she felt, would do 
a great many things that she might ask him^ 
Sometimes, for a couple of hours together, 
there were almost no houses ; there were 
nothing but woods and rivers and lakes 
and horizons adorned with bright-looking 
mountains. It seemed to the Baroness very 
wild, as I have said, and lovely; but the 
impression added something to that sense 
of the enlargement of opportunity which had 
been born of her arrival in the New World. 
One day — it was late in the afternoon — 
x\cton pulled up his horses on the crest of a 
hill which commanded a beautiful prospect. 



V . 165 

He let them stand a long time to rest, while 
he sat there and talked with Madame 
Miinster. The prospect was beautiful in 
spite of there being nothing human within 
sight. There was a wilderness of woods, and 
the gleam of a distant river, and a glimpse 
of half the hill-tops in Massachusetts. The 
road had a wide, grassy margin, on the 
further side of which there flowed a deep, 
clear brook ; there were wild flowers in the 
grass, and beside the brook lay the trunk of 
a fallen tree. Acton waited a while ; at last 
a rustic wayfarer came trudging along the 
road. Acton asked him to hold the horses 
— a service he consented to render, as a 
friendly turn to a fellow-citizen. Then he 
invited the Baroness to descend, and the two 
wandered away, across the grass, and sat 
down on the log beside the brook. 

" I imagine it doesn't remind you of 
Silberstadt," said Acton. It was the first 
time that he had mentioned Silberstadt to 
her, for particular reasons. He knew 
she had a husband there, and this was 



i66 . . 

disagreeable to him; and, furthermore, it 
had been repeated to him that this husband 
wished to put her away — a state of affairs to 
which even indirect reference was to be 
deprecated. It was true, nevertheless, that 
the Baroness herself had often alluded to 
Silberstadt ; and Acton had often wondered 
why her husband wished to get rid of her. 
It was a curious position for a lady — this 
being known as a repudiated wife ; and it is 
worthy of observation that the Baroness 
carried it off with exceeding grace and 
dignity. She had made it felt, from the 
first, that there were two sides to the question, 
and that her own side, when she should 
choose to present it, would be replete with 
touching interest. 

^^ It does not remind me of the town, ot 
course," she said ; " of the sculptured gables 
and the Gothic churches, of the wonderfiJ 
Schloss, with its moat and its clustering 
towers. But it has a little look of some 
other parts of the principality. One might 
fancy one's self among those grand old 



»» 



»» 



V . 167 

German forests, those legendary mountains ; 
the sort of country one sees from the 
windows at Schreckenstein." 

*^ What is Schreckenstein ? " asked Acton. 

"It is a great castle — the summer re- 
sidence of the Reigning Prince.' 

" Have you ever lived there ? 

" I have stayed there," said the Baroness. 
Acton was silent ; he looked a while at the 
uncastled landscape before him. " It is the 
first time you have ever asked me about 
Silberstadt," she said. " I should think you 
would want to know about my marriage; 
it must seem to you very strange." 

Acton looked at her a moment. "Now 
you wouldn't like me to say that ! " 

" You Americans have such odd ways ! " 
the Baroness declared. "You never ask 
anything outright; there seem to be so 
many things you can't talk about." 

"We Americans are very polite," said 
Acton, whose national consciousness had 
been complicated by a residence in foreign 
lands, and who yet disliked to hear 



i68 . . 

Americans abused. ^^We don't like to 
tread upon people's toes," he said. "But I 
should like very much to hear about your 
marriage. Now tell me how it came 
about." 

" The Prince fell in love with me," replied 
the Baroness simply. " He pressed his suit 
very hard. At first he didn't wish me to 
marry him ; on the contrary. But on that 
basis I refused to listen to him. So he 
offered me marriage — in so far as he might. 
I was young, and I confess I was rather 
flattered. But if it were to be done again 
now, I certainly should not accept him." 

" How long ago was this ? " asked Acton. 

"Oh — several years," said Eugenia. 
*^ You should never ask a woman for dates." 

"Why, I should think that when a 
woman was relating history" . . . Acton 
answered. " And now he wants to break it 
off?" 

"They want him to make a political 
marriage. It is his brother's idea. His 
brother is very clever," 



V . 169 

"They must be a precious pair!" cried 
Robert Acton. 

The Baroness gave a little philosophic 
shrug. " Que voulez-vous ? They are 
princes. They think they are treating me 
very well. Silberstadt is a perfectly despotic 
little state, and the Reigning Prince may 
annul the marriage by a stroke of his pen. 
But he has promised me, nevertheless, not to 
do so without my formal consent." 
And this you have refused ? " 
Hitherto. It is an indignity, and I have 
wished at least to make it difficult for them. 
But I have a little document in my writing- 
desk which I have only to sign and send 
back to the Prince." 

" Then it wiU be all over ? " 

The Baroness lifted her hand and dropped 
it again. " Of course I shall keep my title ; 
at least, I shall be at liberty to keep it if 1 
choose. And I suppose I shall keep it. One 
must have a name. And I shall keep my pen- 
sion. It is very small — it is wretchedly small ; 
but it is what I live on." 






I70 . [cil 

"And you have only to sign that paper?" 
Acton asked. 

The Baroness looked at him a moment 
" Do you urge it ? " 

He got up slowly, and stood with his 
hands in his pockets. " What do you gain 
by not doing it ? " 

" I am supposed to gain this advantage — 
that if I delay, or temporize, the Prince may 
come back to me, may make a stand against 
his brother. He is very fond of me, and his 
brother has pushed him only little by httle." 

" If he were to come back to you," said 
Acton, "would you — ^would you take him 
back ? " 

The Baroness met his eyes ; she coloured 
just a little. Then she rose. " I should 
have the satisfaction of saying, ^ Now it is 
my turn. I break with your Serene 
Highness ! ' " 

They began to walk toward the carriage. 
" Well," said Robert Acton, " it's a curious 
story! How did you make his acquaint- 
ance ? " 



V . 171 

" I was Staying with an old lady — an old 
Countess — in Dresden. She had been a 
friend of my father's. My father was dead ; 
I was very much alone. My brother was 
wandering about the world in a theatrical 
troop.** 

" Your brother ought to have stayed with 
you," Acton observed, " and kept you from 
putting your trust in princes." 

The Baroness was silent a moment, and 
then, "He did what he could," she said. 
^ He sent me money. The old Countess 

encouraged the Prince ; she was even press- 
ing. It seems to me," Madame Miinster 
added, gently, " that — under the circum - 
stances — I behaved very well." 

Acton glanced at her, and made the 
observation — he had made it before — that 
a woman looks the prettier for having 
unfolded her wrongs or her sufferings. 
" Well," he reflected, audibly, " I should 
like to see you send his Serene Highness — 
somewhere ! " 

Madame Miinster stooped and plucked a 



172 . [cii. 

daisy from the grass. "And not sign my 
renunciation ? " 

" Well, I don't know — I don't know," said 
Acton. 

" In one case I should have my revenge ; 
in another case I should have my liberty." 

Acton gave a little laugh as he helped her 
into the carriage. '^At any rate," he said, 
" take good care of that paper." 

A couple of days afterward he asked her 
to come and see his house. The visit had 
already been proposed, but it had been put 
off in consequence of his mother's illness. 
She was a constant invalid, and she had 
passed these recent years, very patiently, in a 
great flowered arm-chair at her bedroom 
window. Lately, for some days, she had 
been unable to see any one; but now she 
was better, and she sent the Baroness a very 
civil message. Acton had wished their 
visitor to come to dinner; but Madame 
Miinster preferred to begin with a simple 
call. She had reflected that if she should go 
to dinner Mr. Wentworth and his daughters 



V . 173 

would also be asked, and it had seemed to 
her that the peculiar character of the 
occasion would be best preserved in a tete-a- 
tete with her host. Why the occasion 
should have a peculiar character she ex- 
plained to no one. As far as any one could 
see, it was simply very pleasant. Acton 
came for her and drove her to his door, 
an operation which was rapidly performed. 
His house the Baroness mentally pro- 
nounced a very good one; more articu- 
lately, she declared that it was enchanting. 
It was large and square and painted brown ; 
it stood in a well-kept shrubbery, and was 
approached, from the gate, by a short drive. 
It was,^ moreover, a much more modern 
dwelling than Mr. Wentworth's, and was 
more redundantly upholstered and expen- 
sively ornamented. The Baroness perceived 
that her entertainer had analyzed material 
comfort to a sufficiently fine point. And 
then he possessed the most delightful 
chinoiseries — trophies of his sojourn in the 
Celestial Empire: pagodas of ebony and 



174 . . 

cabinets of ivory ; sculptured monsters, 
grinning and leering on chimney-pieces, m 
front of beautifully figured hand-screens; 
porcelain dinner-sets, gleaming behind the 
glass doors of mahogany buffets; large 
screens, in corners, covered with tense silk 
and embroidered with mandarins and drag- 
ons. These things were scattered all over 
the house, and they gave Eugenia a pretext 
for a complete domiciliary visit. She liked 
it, she enjoyed it ; she thought it a very nice 
place. It had a mixture of the homely and 
the liberal, and though it was almost a 
museum the large, little-used rooms were as 
fresh and clean as a well-kept dairy. Lizzie 
Acton told her that she dusted all the pago- 
das and other curiosities every day with her 
own hands ; and the Baroness answered that 
she was evidently a household fairy. Lizzie 
had not at all the look of a young lady who 
dusted things ; she wore such pretty dresses 
and had such delicate fingers that it was 
• difficult to imagine her immersed in sordid 
cares. She came to meet Madame Miinster 



Ti.] . 175 

on her arrival, but she said nothing, or 
almost nothing, and the Baroness again 
reflected — she had had occasion to do so 
before — that American girls had no manners. 
She disliked this little American girl, and she 
was quite prepared to learn that she had 
failed to commend herself to Miss Acton. 
Lizzie struck her as positive and explicit 
almost to pertness ; and the idea of her 
combining the apparent incongruities of a 
taste for housework and the wearing of fresh, 
Parisian-looking dresses suggested the pos- 
session of a dangerous energy. It was a 
source of irritation to the Baroness that in 
this country it should seem to matter 
whether a little girl were a trifle less or a 
trifle more of a nonentity ; for Eugenia had 
hitherto been conscious of no moral pressure 
as regards the appreciation of diminutive 
virgins. It was perhaps an indication of 
Lizzie's pertness that she very soon retired 
and left the Baroness on her brother's hands. 
Acton talked a great deal about his chinoise- 
ries ; he knew a good deal about porcelain 



176 . .- 

and bnc-a-orac. The Baroness, in her pro- 
gress through the house, made, as it were, a 
great many stations. She sat down every- 
where, confessed to being a little tired, and 
asked about the various objects with a 
curious mixture of alertness and inattention. 
If there had been any one to say it to she 
would have declared that she was positively 
in love with her host ; but she could hardly 
make this declaration — even in the strictest 
confidence — to Acton himself. It gave her, 
nevertheless, a pleasure that had some of the 
charm of unwontedness to feel, with that 
admirable keenness with which she was 
capable of feeling things, that he had a 
disposition without any edges ; that even his 
humorous irony always expanded toward the 
point. One's impression of his honesty was 
almost like carrying a bunch of flowers; 
the perfume was most agreeable, but they 
were occasionally an inconvenience. One 
could trust him, at any rate, round all the 
corners of the world ; and, withal, he was 
not absolutely simple, which would have 



V . 177 

been excess ; he was only relatively- 
simple, which was quite enough for the 
Baroness. 

Lizzie reappeared, to say that her mother 
would now be happy to receive Madame 
Miinster ; and the Baroness followed her to 
Mrs. Acton's apartment. Eugenia reflected, 
as she went, that it was not the affectation of 
impertinence that made her dislike this 
young lady, for on that ground she could 
easily have beaten her. It was not an 
aspiration on the girl's part to rivalry, but 
a kind of laughing, chjldishly-mocking in- 
difference to the results of comparison. 
Mrs. Acton was an emaciated, sweet-faced 
woman of five and fifty, sitting with pillows 
behind her and looking out on a clump of 
hemlocks. She was very modest, very timid, 
and very ill ; she made Eugenia feel grateful 
that she herself was not like that — neither so 
ill, nor, possibly, so modest. On a chair, 
beside her, lay a volume of Emerson's 
Essays. It was a great occasion for poor 
Mrs. Acton, in her helpless condition. 



178 . . 

to be confronted with a clever foreign 
lady, who had more manner than any 
lady — any dozen ladies — that she had ever 
seen. 

"I have heard a great deal about you," 
she said, softly, to the Baroness. 

" From your son, eh ? " Eugenia asked. 
"He has talked to me immensely of you. 
Oh, he talks of you as you would like," the 
Baroness declared; "as such a son must 
talk of such a mother ! " 

Mrs. Acton sat gazing; this was part 
of Madame Miinster's "manner." But 
Robert Acton was gazing too, in vivid 
consciousness that he had barely mentioned 
his mother to their brilliant guest. He 
never talked of this still maternal presence — 
a presence refined to such delicacy that it 
had almost resolved itself, with him, simply 
into the subjective emotion of gratitude. 
And Acton rarely talked of his emotions. 
The Baroness turned her smile toward him, 
and she instantly felt that she had been 
observed to be fibbing. She had struck a 



V . 179 

false note. But who were these people to 
whom such fibbing was not pleasing? If 
they were annoyed, the Baroness was equally 
so; and after the exchange of a few civil 
inquiries and low-voiced responses she 
took leave of Mrs. Acton, bhe begged 
Robert not to come home with her; 
she would get into the carriage alone; she 
preferred that. This was imperious, and she 
thought he looked disappointed. While she 
stood before the door with him — the carriage 
was turning in the gravel-walk — this thought 
restored her serenity. 

When she had given him her hand in 
farewell she looked at him a moment. "I 
have almost decided to despatch that paper," 
she said. 

He knew that she alluded to the docu- 
ment that she had called her renunciation ; 
and he assisted her in to the carriage 
without saying anything. But just before 
the vehicle began to move he said, "Well, 
when you have in fact despatched it, I 

hope you will let me know ! " 

N 2 



i8o . . 



CHAPTER VII. 

Felix Young finished Gertrude's portrait, 
and he afterwards transferred to canvas the 
features of many members of that circle of 
which it may be said that he had become, 
for the time, the pivot and the centre. I am 
afraid it must be confessed that he was a 
decidedly flattering painter, and that he 
imparted to his models a romantic grace 
which seemed easily and cheaply acquired by 
the payment of a hundred dollars to a young 
man who made ^^ sitting" so entertaining. 
For Felix was paid for his pictures, making, 
as he did, no secret of the fact that in guiding 
his steps to the Western world affectionate 
curiosity had gone hand in hand with a 
desire to better his condition. He took his 
uncle's portrait quite as if Mr. Wentworth 
had never averted himself from the experi- 



VH.] . i8i 

ment ; and as he compassed his end only by 
the exercise of gentle violence it is but fair 
to add that he allowed the old man to give 
him nothing but his time. He passed his 
arm into Mr. Wentworth's one summer 
morning— very few arms, indeed, had ever 
passed into Mr. Wentworth's — and led him 
across the garden and along the road into the 
studio which he had extemporized in the 
little house among the apple-trees. The 
grave gentleman felt himself more and more 
fascinated by his clever nephew, whose fresh, 
demonstrative youth seemed a compendium 
of experiences so strangely numerous. It 
appeared to him that Felix must know a 
great deal ; he would like to learn what he 
thought about some of those things as 
regards which his own conversation had 
always been formal but his knowledge vague. 
Felix had a confident, gayly trenchant way 
of judging human actions which Mr. Went- 
worth grew little by little to envy ; it seemed 
like criticism made easy. Forming an 
opinion — say on a person's conduct — was 



1 82 . . 

with Mr. Wentworth a good deal like 
fumbling in a lock with a key chosen at 
hazard. He seemed to himself to go about 
the world with a big bunch of these ineffec- 
tual instruments at his girdle. His nephew, 
on the other hand, with a single turn of the 
wrist, opened any door as adroitly as a house- 
thief. He felt obliged to keep up the con- 
vention that an uncle is always wiser than a 
nephew, even if he could keep it up no 
otherwise than by listening in serious 
silence to Felix's quick, light, constant dis- 
course. But there came a day when he 
lapsed from consistency and almost asked 
his nephew's advice. 

" Have you ever entertained the idea of 
settling in the United States ? " he asked one 
morning, while Felix brilliantly plied his 
brush. 

" My dear uncle," said Felix, " excuse me 
if your question makes me smile a litde. 
To begin with, I have never entertained an 
idea. Ideas often entertain me; but I am 
afraid I have never seriously made a plan. I 



vii] . 185 

know what you are going to say ; or rather, I 
know what you think, for I don't think you 
will say it — ^that this is very frivolous and 
loose-minded on my part. So it is ; but I 
am made like that; I take things as they 
come, and somehow there is always some new 
thing to follow the last. In the second 
place, I should never propose to settle. I 
can't settle, my dear uncle; I am not a 
settler. I know that is what strangers are 
supposed to do here; they always settle. 
But I haven't — to answer your question — 
entertained that idea." 

" You intend to return to Europe and 
resume your irregular manner of life ? " Mr. 
Wentworth inquired. 

" I can't say I intend. But it's very likely 
I shall go back to Europe. After all, I am 
a European. I feel that, you know. It will 
depend a good deal upon my sister. She's 
oven more of a European than I ; here, you 
Icnow, she's a picture out of her setting. 
-And as for ^ resuming,' dear uncle, I really 
tiave never given up my irregular manner of 







i84 . . 

life. What, for me, could be more irregular 
than this ? " 

"Than what?" asked Mr. Wentworth, 
with his pale gravity . 

" Well, than everything ! Living in the 
midst of you, this way; this charming, 
quiet, serious family life; fraternizing with 
Charlotte and Gertrude; calling upon 
twenty young ladies, and going out to walk 
with them ; sittiag with you in the evening 
on the piazza and listening to the crickets, 
and going to bed at ten o'clock." 

" Your description is very animated," said 
Mr. Wentworth ; " but I see nothing im- 
proper in what you describe." 

"Neither do I, dear uncle. It is ex- 
tremely delightful ; I shouldn't like it if it 
were improper. I assure you I don't like 
improper things; though I dare say you 
think I do," Felix went on, painting 
away. 

'^ I have never accused you of that." 

'^ Pray don't," said Felix ; " because, you 
see, at bottom I am a terrible Philistine." 



7IL] . 185 

•It 

^ A Philistine? " repeated Mr. Wentworth. 

^ I mean, as one may say, a plain, God- 
fearing man." Mr. Wentworth looked at 
[lim reservedly, like a mystified sage, and 
Felix continued, "I trust I shall enjoy a 
irenerable and venerated old age. I mean 
:o live long. I can hardly call that a plan, 
perhaps ; but it's a keen desire — a rosy 
nsion. I shall be a lively, perhaps even a 
frivolous, old man ! " 

"It is natural," said his uncle, senten- 
dously, " that one should desire to prolong 
in agreeable life. We have perhaps a selfish 
indisposition to bring our pleasure to a close. 
But I presume," he added, " that you expect 
:o marry." 

" That too, dear uncle, is a hope, a desire, 
I vision," said Felix. It occurred to him for 
in instant that this was possibly a preface 
:o the offer of the hand of one of Mr. 
Wentworth's admirable daughters. But in 
:he name of decent modesty and a proper 
>ense of the hard realities of this world, Felix 
Danished the thought. His uncle was the 



i86 . . 

incarnation of benevolence, certainly; but 
from that to accepting — much more postu- 
lating — the idea of a union between a young 
lady with a dowry presumptively brilliant, 
and a penniless artist with no prospect of 
fame, there was a very long way. Felix 
had lately become conscious of a luxurious 
preference for the society — if possible, 
unshared with others — of Gertrude Went- 
worth ; but he had relegated this young lady, 
for the moment, to the coldly brilliant 
category of unattainable possessions. She 
was not the first woman for whom he had 
entertained an unpractical admiration. He 
had been in love with duchesses and 
countesses, and he had made, once or twice, 
a perilously near approach to cynicism in 
declaring that the disinterestedness of women 
had been overrated. On the whole he had 
tempered audacity with modesty ; and it is 
but fair to him, now, to say explicitly that 
he would have been incapable of takmg 
advantage of his present large allowance of 
familiarity to make love to the younger of 



VI . 187 

his handsome cousins. Felix had grown up 
among traditions in the light of which such 
a proceeding looked like a grievous breach 
of hospitality. I have said that he was 
always happy, and it may be counted among 
the present sources of happiness that he had, 
as regards this matter of his relations with 
Gertrude, a deliriously good conscience. 
His own deportment seemed to him suffused 
with the beauty of virtue — a form of beauty 
that he admired with the same vivacity with 
which he admired all other forms. 

" I think that if you marry," said Mi. 
Wcntworth presently, "it will conduce to 
your happiness." 

" Sicurissimo i " Felix exclaimed ; and 
then, arresting his brush, he looked at his 
uncle with a smile. " There is something I 
feel tempted to say to you. May I risk 
it?'' 

Mr. Wentworth drew himself up a little. 
**I am very safe; I don't repeat things." 
fiut he hoped Felix would not risk too 
much. 



1 88 . . 

Felix was laughing at his answer. ^It's 
odd to hear you telling me how to be happy. 
I don't think you know yourself, dear uncle. 
Now, does that sound brutal ? '* 

The old man was silent a moment, and 
then, with a dry dignity that suddenly 
touched his nephew, "We may sometimes 
point out a road we are unable to follow." 

"Ah, don't tell me you have had any 
sorrows," Felix rejoined. " I didn't suppose 
it, and I didn't mean to allude to them. I 
simply meant that you all don't amuse 
yourselves." 

" Amuse ourselves ? We are not 
children." 

" Precisely not ! You have reached the 
proper age. I was saying that, the other 
day, to Gertrude," Felix added. "I hope, 
it was not indiscreet." 

" If it was," said Mr. Wentworth, with a 
keener irony than Felix would have thought 
him capable of, " it was but your way of 
amusing yourself. I am afraid you never 
had a trouble." 



m.] . 189 

" Oh, yes, I have ! " Felix declared, with 
some spirit; "before I knew better. But 
j^ou don't catch me at it again." 

Mr. Wentworth maintained for a while a 
silence more expressive than a deep-drawn 
sigh. " You have no children," he said at last. 

" Don't tell me," Felix exclaimed, " that 
your charming young people are a source of 
grief to you I " 

" I don't speak of Charlotte." And then, 
after a pause, Mr. Wentworth continued, 
" I don't speak of Gertrude. But I feel 
considerable anxiety about CUfFord. I will 
tell you another time." 

The next time he gave Felix a sitting his 
nephew reminded him that he had taken 
him into his confidence. " How is Clifford 
to-day?" Felix asked. "He has always 
seemed to me a young man of remarkable 
discretion. Indeed, he is only too discreet ; 
he seems on his guard against me — as if he 
thought me rather light company. The 
other day he told his sister — Gertrude 
repeated it to me — that I was always 



I90 . . 

laughing at him. If I laugh it is simply 
from the impulse to try and inspire him 
with confidence. That is the only way I 
have." 

" Clifford's situation is no laughing 
matter," said Mr. Wentworth. " It is very 
peculiar, as I suppose you have guessed." 

"Ah, you mean his love affair with his 
cousm ? " 

Mr. Wentworth stared, blushing a little. 
" I mean his absence from college. He has 
been suspended. We have decided not to 
speak of it unless we are asked." 

" Suspended ? " Felix repeated. 

" He has been requested by the Harvard 
authorities to absent himself for six months. 
Meanwhile he is studying with Mr. Brand. 
We think Mr. Brand will help him ; at least 
we hope so." 

"What befell him at colleger" Felix 
asked. " He was too fond of pleasure ? 
Mr. Brand certainly will not teach him any 
of those secrets ! " 

" He was too fond of something of which 



VI . 191 

he should not have been fond. I suppose it 
is considered a pleasure." 

Felix gave his light laugh. "My dear 
uncle, is there any doubt about its being a 
pleasure ? C^est de son dge^ as they say in 
France." 

" I should have said rather it was a vice 
of later life — of disappointed old age." 

Felix glanced at his uncle, with his lifted 
eyebrows, and then, "Of what are you 
speaking ? " he demanded, smiling. 

"Of the situation in which Clifford was 
found." 

" Ah, he was found — he was caught ? " 

" Necessarily, he was caught. He 
couldn't walk ; he staggered." 

" Oh," said Felix, " he drinks ! I rather 
suspected that, from something I observed 
the first day I came here. I quite agree 
with you that it is a low taste. It is not a 
vice for a gentleman. He ought to give it 
up. 

"We hope for a good deal from Mr. 
Brand's influence," Mr. Wentworth went on. 



192 . . 

" He has talked to him from the first. And 
he never touches anything himself." 

" I will talk to him — I will talk to him ! " 
Felix declared, gayly. 

^^ What will you say to him ? " asked his 
uncle, with some apprehension. 

Felix for some moments answered no- 
thing. " Do you mean to marry him to his 
cousin ? " he asked at last. 

" Marry him ? " echoed Mr. Wentworth. 
" I shouldn't think his cousin would want to 
marry him." 

"You have no understanding, then, with 
Mrs. Acton ? " 

Mr. Wentworth stared, almost blanklv. "I 
have never discussed such subjects with her.'' 

"I should think it might be time," s^d 
Felix. "Lizzie Acton is admirably pretty, 
and if Clifford is dangerous ^" 

"They are not engaged," said Mr. 
Wentworth. " I have no reason to suppose 
they are engaged." 

" Par exemple ! " cried Felix. " A clandes- 
tine engagement ? Trust me, Clifford, as I 



viL] . 193 

say, is a charming boy. He is incapable of 
that. Lizzie Acton, then, would not be 
jealous of another woman." 

" I certainly hope not," said the old man, 
with a vague sense of jealousy being an even 
lower vice than a love of liquor. 

"The best thing for Clifford, therefore,'' 
Felix propounded, "is to become interested 
in some clever, charming woman." And he 
paused in his painting, and, with his elbows 
on his knees, looked with bright communi- 
cativeness at his uncle. " You see, I believe 
greatly in the influence of women. Living 
with women helps to make a man a gentle- 
man. It is very true, Clifford has his sisters, 
who are so charming. But there should be a 
different sentiment in play from the fraternal, 
you know. He has Lizzie Acton ; but she, 
perhaps, is rather immature." 

"I suspect Lizzie has talked to him, 
reasoned with him," said Mr. Wentworth. 

" On the impropriety of getting tipsy — on 
the beauty of temperance? That is dreary 
work for a pretty young girl. No," Felix 



o 



194 . . 

continued; " Clifford ought to frequent some 
agreeable woman, who, without ever mention- 
ing such unsavoury subjects, would give him 
a sense of its being very ridiculous to he 
fuddled. If he could fall in love with her a 
little, so much the better. The thing would 
operate as a cure." 

"Well, now, what lady should you 
suggest ? " asked Mr. Wentworth. 

"There is a clever woman under your 
hand. My sister." 

"Your sister — under my hand?" Mr. 
Wentworth repeated. 

" Say a word to Clifford. Tell him to be 
bold. He is well-disposed already; he has 
invited her two or three times to drive. But 
I don't think he comes to see her. Give 
him a hint to come — to come often. He 
will sit there of an afternoon, and they will 
talk. It will do him good." 

Mr. Wentworth meditated. " You think 
she will exercise a helpful influence ? " 

" She will exercise a civilizing — I may call 
it a sobering — influence. A charming, 



VI . f95 

witty woman always does — especially if she 
is a little of a coquette. My dear uncle, the 
society of such women has been half my 
education. If Clifford is suspended, as you 
say, from college, let Eugenia be his 
preceptress." 

Mr. Wentworth continued thoughtful. 
"You think Eugenia is a coquette?" he 
asked. 

" What pretty woman is not ? " Felix 
demanded in turn. But this, for Mr. 
Wentworth, could at the best have been 
no answer, for he did not think his niece 
pretty. "With Clifford," the young man 
pursued, " Eugenia will simply be enough 
of a coquette to be a little ironical. 
That's what he needs. So you recom- 
mend him to be nice with her, you 
know. The suggestion will come best 
from you." 

"Do I understand," asked the old man, 
" that I am to suggest to my son to make a 
— a profession of — of affection to Madame 
Munster ? " 

i 



196 . Ich. 

" Yes, yes — a, profession I " cried Felix, 
sympathetically. 

"But, as I understand it, Madame 
Miinster is a married woman." 

" Ah," said Felix, smiling, " of course she 
can t marry him. But she will do what she 
can." 

Mr. Wentworth sat for some time with 
his eyes on the floor ; at last he got up. " I 
don't think," he said, "that I can under- 
take to recommend to my son any such 
course." And without meeting Felix's 
surprised glance he broke off his sitting, 
which was not resumed for a fortnight, 

Felix was very fond of the Uttle lake which 
occupied so many of Mr, Wentworth's 
numerous acres, and of a remarkable grove 
of pines which lay upon the further side 
of it, planted upon a steep embankment 
and haunted by the summer breeze. The 
murmur of the air in the far-oflf • tree-top • 
had a strange distinctness; it was almost 
articulate. One afternoon the young man 
came out of his painting-room and passed 



VI . 197 

the open door of Eugenia's little salon. 
Within, in the cool dimness, he saw his 
sister, dressed in white, buried in her arm- 
chair and holding to her face an immense 
bouquet. Opposite to her sat Clifford 
Wentworth, twirling his hat. He had 
evidendy just presented the bouquet to the 
Baroness, whose fine eyes, as she glanced at 
him over the big roses and geraniums, wore 
a conversational smile. Felix, standing on 
the threshold of the cottage, hesitated for a 
moment as to whether he should retrace his 
steps and enter the parlour. Then he went 
his way and passed into Mr. Wentworth's 
garden. That civilizing process to which 
he had suggested that Clifford should be 
subjected appeared to have come on of itself. 
Felix was very sure, at least, that Mr. 
Wentworth had not adopted his ingenious 
device for stimulating the young man's 
aesthetic consciousness. " Doubtless he 
supposes," he said to himself, after the 
conversation that has been narrated, " that I 
desire, out of fraternal benevolence, to 



198 . [cii 

procure for Eugenia the amusement of a 
flirtation — or, as he probably calls it, an 
intrigue — ^with the too suscep ible Clifford. 
It must be admitted — and I have noticed it 
before — that nothing exceeds the license 
occasionally taken by the imagination of 
very rigid people." Felix, on his own side, 
had of course said nothing to Clifford ; but 
he had observed to Eugenia that Mr. 
Wentworth was much mortified at his son's 
low tastes. " We ought to do something to 
help them, after all their kindness to us," he 
had added. "Encourage Clifford to come 
and see you, and inspire him with a taste for 
conversation. That will supplant the other, 
which only comes from his puerility, from 
his not taking his position in the world — 
that of a rich young man of ancient stock — 
seriously enough. Make him a little more 
serious. Even if he makes love to you it is 
no great matter." 

"I am to offer myself as a superior 
form of intoxication — a substitute for a 
brandy bottle, eh?" asked the Baroness. 



vii.] . 199 

" Truly, in this country one comes to strange 
uses." 

But she had not positively declined to 
undertake Clifford's higher education, and 
Felix, who had not thought of the matter 
again, being haunted with visions of more 
personal profit, now reflected that the work 
of redemption had fairly begun. The idea, 
in prospect, had seemed of the happiest, but 
in operation it made him a trifle uneasy. 
"What if Eugenia — what if Eugenia — ?" he 
asked himself sofdy, the question dying away 
in his sense of Eugenia's undetermined ca- 
pacity. But before Felix had time either to 
accept or to reject its admonition, even in 
this vague form, he saw Robert Acton turn 
out of Mr. Wentworth's enclosure by a 
distant gate and come toward the cottage in 
the orchard. Acton had evidently walked 
from his own house along a shady by-way, 
and he was intending to pay a visit to 
Madame Miinster. Felix watched him a 
moment; then he turned away. Acton 
could be left to play the part of Providence 



200 . [en. 

and interrupt — if interruption were needed — . 
Clifford's entanglement with Eugenia. 

Felix passed through the garden toward 
the house and toward a postern gate which 
opened upon a path leading across the fields, 
beside a little wood, to the lake. He stopped 
and looked up at the house ; his eyes rested 
more particularly upon a certain open 
window, on the shady side. Presently 
Gertrude appeared there, looking out into 
the summer light. He took off his hat to 
her and bade her good-day; he remarked 
that he was going to row across the pond, 
and begged that she would do him the 
honour to accompany him. She looked 
at him a moment; then, without saying 
anything, she turned away. But she soon 
reappeared, below, in one of those quaint 
and charming Leghorn hats, tied with white 
satin bows, that were worn at that period; 
she also carried a green parasol. She went 
with him to the edge of the lake, where a 
couple of boats were always moored; they 
got into one of them, and Felix with gentle 



VI . 201 

Strokes propelled it to the opposite shore. 
The day was the perfection of summer 
weather; the little lake was the colour of 
sunshine ; the plash of the oars was the only 
sound, and they found themselves listening 
to it. They disembarked, and, by a winding 
path, ascended the pine-crested mound which 
overlooked the water, whose white expanse 
glittered between the trees. The place was 
delightfully cool and had the added charm 
that — in the softly sounding pine-boughs — 
you seemed to hear the coolness as well as 
feel it. Felix and Gertrude sat down on the 
rust-coloured carpet of pine-needles and 
talked of many things. Felix spoke at last, 
in the course of talk, of his going away ; it 
was the first time he had alluded to it. 

" You are going away r " said Gertrude, 
looking at him. 

" Some day — when the leaves begin to 
fall. You know I can't stay for ever." 

Gertrude transferred her eyes to the outer 
prospect, and then, after a pause, she said, 
" I shall never see you again." 



202 . . 

"Why not?" asked Felix. "We shall 
probably both survive my departure." 

But Gertrude only repeated, " I shall 
never see you again. I shall never hear of 
you," she went on. " I shall know nothing 
about you. I knew nothing about you 
before, and it will be the same again." 

" I knew nothing about you then, un- 
fortunately," said Felix. " But now I shall 
write to you." 

"Don't write to me. I shall not answer 
you," Gertrude declared. 

"I should of course burn your letters," 
said Felix. 

Gertrude looked at him again. "Bum 
my letters? You sometimes say strange 
things." 

"They are not strange in themselves," 
the young man answered. " They are only 
strange as said to you. You will come to 
Europe." 

" With whom shall I come ? " She asked 
this question simply ; she was very much in 
earnest. Felix was interested in her earnest- 



yii.] , 203 

ness ; for some moments he hesitated. '^ You 
can't tell me that," she pursued. " You can't 
say that I shall go with my father and my 
sister ; you don't believe that." 

"I shall keep your letters," said Felix, 
presently, for all answer. 

" I never write. I don't know how to 
write." Gertrude, for some time, said 
nothing more; and her companion, as he 
looked at her, wished it had not been 
*' disloyal " to make love to the daughter of 
an old gentleman who had offered one 
hospitality. The afternoon waned; the 
shadows stretched themselves ; and the light 
grew deeper in the western sky. Two 
persons appeared on the opposite side of the 
lake, coming from the house and crossing 
the meadow. "It is Charlotte and Mr. 
Brand," said Gertrude. "They are coming 
over here." But Charlotte and Mr. Brand 
only came down to the edge of the water 
and stood there, looking across ; they made 
no motion to enter the boat that Felix had 
left at the mooring-place. Felix waved his 



204 . . . 

hat to them ; it was too far to call. They 
made no visible response, and they presently 
turned away and walked along the shore. 

"Mr. Brand is not demonstrative," said 
Felix. " He is never demonstrative to me. 
He sits silent, with his chin in his hand, 
looking at me. Sometimes he looks away. 
Your father tells me he is so eloquent; 
and I should like to hear him talk. He 
looks like such a noble young man. But 
with me he will never talk. And yet I am 
so fond of listening to brilliant imagery!" 

"He is very eloquent," said Gertrude; 
" but he has no brilliant imagery. I have 
heard him talk a great deal. I knew that 
when they saw us they would not come over 
here." 

" x\h, he is making la cour, as they say, to 
your sister r They desire to be alone r ** 

" No," said Gertrude, gravely, " they have 
no such reason as that for being alone." 

" But why doesn't he make la cour to 
Charlotte r " Felix inquired. " She is so 
pretty, so gentle, so good." 



VI . 205 

Gertrude glanced at him, and then she 
looked at the distantly-seen couple they were 
discussing. Mr, Brand and Charlotte were 
walking side by side. They might have 
been a pair of lovers, and yet they might 
not. "They think I should not be here," 
said Gertrude. 

" With me ? I thought you didn't have 
those ideas." 

"You don't understand. There are a 
great many things you don't understand." 

" I understand my stupidity. But why, 
then, do not Charlotte and Mr. Brand, who, 
as an elder sister and a clergyman, are free to 
walk about together, come over and make 
me wiser by breaking up the unlawful in- 
terview into which I have lured you ? " 

"That is the last thing they would do," 
said Gertrude. 

Felix stared at her a moment, with his 
lifted eyebrows. " Je n'y comprends rien ! " 
he exclaimed; then his eyes followed for a 
while the retreating figures of this critica. 
pair. "You may say what you please. 



2o6 . Ich. 

he declared ; " it is evident to me that your 
sister is not indifferent to her clever com- 
panion. It is agreeable to her to be walking 
there with him. I can see that from here." 
And in the excitement of observation Felix 
rose to his feet. 

Gertrude rose also, but she made no 
attempt to emulate her companions 
discovery; she looked rather in another 
direction. Felix's words had struck her; 
but a certain delicacy checked her. "She 
is certainly not indifferent to Mr. Brand; 
she has the highest opinion of him." 

"One can see it — one can see it," said 
Felix in a tone of amused contemplation, 
with his head on one side. Gertrude turned 
her back to the opposite shore ; it was disa- 
greeable to her to look, but she hoped Felix 
would say something more. "Ah, they have 
wandered away into the wood," he added. 

Gertrude turned round again. " She is 
not in love with him,*' she said; it seemec^ 
her duty to say that. 

" Then he is in love with her; or if he i:5 



VI . 207 

not, he ought to be. She is such a perfect 
little woman of her kind. She reminds 
me of a pair of old-fashioned silver sugar- 
tongs ; you know I am very fond of sugar. 
And she is very nice with Mr. Brand ; 
I have noticed that ; very gentle and 
gracious." 

Gertrude reflected a moment. Then she 
took a great resolution. " She wants him to 
marry me," she said. " So of course she is 
nice. 

Felix's eyebrows rose higher than ever. 
"To marry you ! Ah, ah, this is interesting. 
And you think one must be very nice with a 
man to induce him to do that ? " 

Gertrude had turned a little pale, but she 
weiit on, " Mr. Brand wants it himself." 

Felix folded his arms and stood looking 
at her. " I see — I see,** he said quickly. 
" Why did you never tell me this 
before ? " 

"It is disagreeable to me to speak of it 
even now. I wished simply to explain to 
you about Charlotte." 



2o8 . . 

"You don't wish to marry Mr. Brand, 
then ? " 

"No," said Gertrude, gravely. 

" And does your father wish it ? " 

" Very much." 

"And you don't like him — you have 
refused him ? " 

" I don't wish to marry him." 

" Your father and sister think you ought 
to, eh ? " 

" It is a long story," said Gertrude. 
"They think there are good reasons. I 
can't explain it. They think I have 
obligations, and that I have encouraged 
him." 

Felix smiled at her, as if she had been 
telling him an amusing story about some 
one else. "I cant tell you how this 
interests me," he said. "Now you don't 
recognize these reasons — these obligations r " 

"I am not sure; it is not easy." And 
she picked up her parasol and turned away, 
as if to descend the slope. 

"Tell me this," Felix went on, going with 



vn.] . 209 

her : " are you likely to give in — to let them 
persuade you ? " 

Gertrude looked at him with the serious 
face that she had constantly worn in 
opposition to his almost eager smile. 
"I shall never marry Mr. Brand," she 
said. 

"I see!" Felix rejoined. And they 
slowly descended the hill together, saying 
nothing till they reached the margin of the 
pond. "It is your own affair," he then 
resumed; "but do you know, I am not 
altogether glad? If it were settled that 
you were to marry Mr. Brand I should take 
a certain comfort in the arrangement, I 
should feel more free. I have no right to 
make love to you myself, eh?" And he 
paused, lightly pressing his argument upor 
her. 

"None whatever," replied Gertrude 
quickly — too quickly. 

"Your father would never hear of it; I 
haven't a penny. Mr. Brand, of course, has 
property of his own, eh ? " 



2IO . . 

"I believe he has some property; but 
that has nothing to do with it." 

" With you, of course not ; but with your 
father and sister it must have. So, as I say, 
if this were settled, I should feel more at 
liberty." 

"More at liberty?" Gertrude repeated. 
" Please unfasten the boat." 

Felix untwisted the rope and stood 
holding it. ^^ I should be able to say things 
to you that I can't give myself the pleasure 
of saying now," he went on. " I could tell 
you how much I admire you, without 
seeming to pretend to that which I have no 
right to pretend to. I should make violent 
love to you," he added, laughing, "if I 
thought you were so placed as not to be 
offended by it." 

"You mean if I were engaged to another 
man ? That is strange reasoning I ** 
Gertrude exclaimed. 

"In that case you would not take mc 
seriously." 

" I take every one seriously ! " said Ger- 



VI . 211 

trude. And without his help she stepped 
lightly into the boat. 

Felix took up the oars and sent it forward. 
"Ah, this is what you have been thinking 
about? It seemed to me you had some- 
thing on your mind. I wish very much," 
he added, " that you would tell me some of 
these so-called reasons — ^these obligations." 

" They are not real reasons — good 
reasons," said Gertrude, looking at the pink 
and yellow gleams in the water. 

"1 can understand that! Because a 
handsome girl has had a spark of coquetry, 
that is no reason." 

" If you mean me, it's not that. 1 have 
not done that." 

" It is something that troubles you, at any 
rate," said Felix. 

"Not so much as it used to," Gertrude 
rejoined. 

He looked at her, smiling always. " That 
is not saying much, eh?" But she only 
rested her eyes, very gravely, on the lighted 
Water. She seemed to him to be trying to 



212 . . 

hide the signs of the trouble of which she 
had just told him. Felix felt, at all times, 
much the same impulse to dissipate visible 
melancholy that a good housewife feels to 
brush away dust. There was something he 
wished to brush away now; suddenly he 
stopped rowing and poised his oars. " Why 
should Mr. Brand have addressed himself to 
you, and not to your sister ? " he asked. " I 
am sure she would listen to him." 

Gertrude, in her family, was thought 
capable of a good deal of levity; but her 
levity had never gone so far as this. It 
moved her greatly, however, to hear Felix 
say that he was sure of something ; so that, 
raising her eyes toward him, she tried 
intently, for some moments, to conjure up 
this wonderful image of a love-affair between 
her own sister and her own suitor. We 
know that Gertrude had an imaginative 
mind; so that it is not impossible that this 
effort should have been partially successful. 
But she only murmured, "Ah, Felix ^ 
ah, Felix ! " 



viL] . 213 

"Why shouldn't they marry? Try and 
make them marry!" cried Felix 

" Try and make them ? " 

"Turn the tables on them. Then they 
will leave you alone. I will help you as far 
as I can." 

Gertrude's heart began to beat; she was 
greatly excited ; she had never had anything 
so interesting proposed to her before. Felix 
had begun to row again, and he now sent 
the boat home with long strokes. "I 
believe she does care for him!" said Ger- 
trude, after they had disembarked. 

" Of course she does, and we will marry 
them off. It will make them happy ; it will 
make every one happy. We shall have a 
wedding, and I will write an epithalamium." 

" It seems as if it would make me happy," 
said Gertrude. 

"To get rid of Mr. Brand, eh? To 
recover your liberty ? " 

Gertrude walked on. " To see my sister 
married to so good a man." 

Felix gave his light laugh. " You always 



214 . . 

put things on those grounds; you will 
never say anything for yourself. You are 
all so afraid, here, of being selfish. I don't 
think you know how,*' he went on. ^^ Let 
me show you! It will make me bappy for 
myself, and for just the reverse of what I 
told you a while ago. After that, when I 
make love to you, you will have to think I 
mean it." 

"I shall never think you mean anything," 
said Gertrude. " You are too fantastic." 

" Ah," cried Felix, " that's a Hcense to say 
everything ! Gertrude, I adore you ! " 



VII . . 215 



CHAPTER VIIL 

Charlotte and Mr. Brand had not re- 
turned when they reached the house; but 
the Baroness had come to tea, and Robert 
Acton also, who now regularly asked for a 
place at this generous repast or made his 
appearance later in the evening. Clifford 
Wentworth, with his juvenile growl, 
remarked upon it. 

"You are always coming to tea now-a- 
days, Robert," he said. "I should think 
you had drunk enough tea in China." 

"Since when is Mr. Acton more fre- 
quent ? " asked the Baroness. 

" Since you came," said Clifford. " It 
seems as if you were a kind of attraction." 

"I suppose I am a curiosity," said the 
Baroness. " Give me time and I will make 
you a salon." 



2i6 . . 

"It would fall to pieces after you go!" 
exclaimed Acton. 

"Don't talk about her going, in that 
familiar way," Clifford said. " It makes me 
feel gloomy." 

Mr. Wentworth glanced at his son, and, 
taking note of these words, wondered if 
Felix had been teaching him, according to 
the programme he had sketched out, to 
make love to the wife of a German prince. 

Charlotte came in late with Mr. Brand; 
but Gertrude, to whom, at least, Felix had 
taught something, looked in vain, in her 
face, for the traces of a guilty passion. Mr. 
Brand sat down by Gertrude, and she 
presently asked him w^hy they had not 
crossed the pond to join Felix and herself. 

" It is cruel of you to ask me that," he 
answered, very softly. He had a large 
morsel of cake before him ; but he fingered 
it without eating it. "I sometimes think 
you are growing cruel," he added. 

Gertrude said nothing ; she was afraid to 
speak. There was a kind of rage in her 



VII . 217 

heart; she felt as if she could easily 
persuade herself that she was persecuted. 
She said to herself that it was quite right 
that she should not allow him to make her 
believe she was wrong. She thought 
of what Felix had said to her ; she wished, 
indeed, Mr. Brand would marry Charlotte. 
She looked away from him and spoke no 
more. Mr. Brand ended by eating his 
cake, while Felix sat opposite, describing to 
Mr. Wentworth the students' duels at 
Heidelberg. After tea they all dispersed 
themselves, as usual, upon the piazza and in 
the garden; and Mr. Brand drew near to 
Gertrude again. 

^^I didn't come to you this afternoon 
because you were not alone," he began ; 
" because you were with a newer friend." 

"Felix? He is an old friend by this 
time." 

Mr. Brand looked at the ground for some 
moments. "I thought I was prepared to 
hear you speak in that way," he resumed. 
*^ But I find it very painful." 



2i8 . [CH. 

^^I don't see what eke I can say," said 
Grertrude. 

Mr. Brand walked beside her for a while 
in silence; Gertrude wished he would go 
away. '^ He is certainly very accomplished. 
But I think I ought to advise you.** 

" To advise me ? " 

'^ I think I know your nature.** 

'^ I think you don't," said Gertrude, with 
a soft laugh. 

" You make yourself out worse than you 
are — to please him," Mr. Brand said, sadly. 

" Worse — ^to please him ? What do you 
mean ? " asked Gertrude, stopping. 

Mr. Brand stopped also, and with the 
same soft straightforwardness, "He doesn't 
care for the things you care for — ^the great 
questions of life." 

Gertrude, with her eyes on his, shook 
her head. "I don't care for the great 
questions of life. They are much beyond 
me. 

"There was a time when you didn't say 
that," said Mr. Brand. 



viiL] . 219 

^^Oh,** rejoined Gertrude, "I think you 
made me talk a great deal of nonsense. 
And it depends," she added, '^upon what 
you call the great questions of life. There 
are some things I care for." 

" Are they the things you talk about with 
your cousin ? " 

"You should nDt say things to me 
against, my cousin, Mr. Brand," said 
Gertrude. " That is dishonourable." 

He listened to this respectfully; then he 
answered, with a little vibration of the voice, 
"I should be very sorry to do anything 
dishonourable. But I don't see why it is 
dishonourable to say that your cousin is 
frivolous." 

" Go and say it to himself! " 

"I think he would admit it," said Mr. 
Brand. "That is the tone he would take. 
He would not be ashamed of it." 

"Then I am not ashamed of it!" 
Gertrude declared. "That is probably 
what I like him for. I am frivolous 
myself." 



220 . . 

^^ You are trying, as I said just now, to 
lower yourself.'* 

" I am trying for once to be natural ! " 
cried Gertrude passionately. '^ I have been 
pretending, all my life; I have been dis- 
honest; it is you that have made me so!** 
Mr. Brand stood gazing at her, and she went 
on, "Why shouldn't I be frivolous, if I 
want ? One has a right to be frivolous, if 
it 's one's nature. No, I don't care for the 
great questions. I care for pleasure — for 
amusement. Perhaps I am fond of wicked 
things ; it is very possible ! " 

Mr. Brand remained staring ; he was even 
a little pale, as if he had been frightened. 
"I don't think you know what you are 
saying ! " he exclaimed. 

" Perhaps not. Perhaps I am talking 
nonsense. But it is only with you that I 
talk nonsense. I never do so with my 



cousin." 



" I will speak to you again, when you arc 
less excited," said Mr. Brand. 

" I am always excited when vou speak to 



VII . 221 

me. I must tell you that — even if it pre- 
vents you altogether, in future. Your 
speaking to me irritates me. With my 
cousin it is very different. That seems quiet 
and natural*" 

He looked at her, and then he looked 
away, with a kind of helpless distress, at 
the dusky garden and the faint summer 
stars. After which, suddenly turning back, 
" Gertrude, Gertrude ! " he softly groaned. 
" Am I really losing you ? " 

She was touched — she was pained ; but it 
had already occurred to her that she might 
do something better than say so. It would 
not have alleviated her companion's distress 
to perceive, just then, whence she had 
sympathetically borrowed this ingenuity. ^^ I 
am not sorry for you," Gertrude said ; " for 
in paying so much attention to me you are 
following a shadow — you are wasting some- 
thing precious. There is something else 
you might have that you don't look at — 
something better than I am. That is a 
reality!" And then, with intention, she 



222 . . 

looked at him and tried to smile a little. 
He thought this smile of hers very strange ; 
but she turned away and left him. 

She wandered about alone in the garden 
wondering what Mr. Brand would make of 
her words, which it had been a singular 
pleasure for her to utter. Shortly after, 
passing in front of the house, she saw, at a 
distance, two persons standing near the 
garden gate. It was Mr. Brand going away 
and bidding good-night to Charlotte, who 
had walked down with him from the house. 
Gertrude saw that the parting was pro- 
longed ; then she turned her back upon it. 
She had not gone very far, however, when 
she heard her sister slowly following her. 
She neither turned round nor waited for her; 
she knew what Charlotte was going to say. 
Charlotte, who at last overtook her, in fact 
presently began; she had passed her arm 
into Gertrude's. 

"Will you listen to me, dear, if I say 
something very particular ? '* 

"I know what you are going to say,** 



VII . 223 

said Grertrude. "Mr. Brand feels very 
badly." 

"Oh, Gertrude, how can you treat him 
so ? ** Charlotte demanded. And as her sister 
made no answer she added, " After all he 
has done for you ! " 

" What has he done for me ? " 

" I wonder you can ask, Gertrude. He 
has helped you so. You told me so 
yourself, a great many times. You told me 
that he helped you to struggle with your — 
— your peculiarities. You told me that he 
had taught you how to govern your 
temper." 

For a moment Gertrude said nothing. 
Then, " Was my temper very bad ? " she 
asked. 

" I am not accusing you, Gertrude,'* said 
Charlotte. 

" What are you doing, then ? " her sister 
demanded, with a little laugh. 

" I am pleading for Mr. Brand — re- 
minding you of all you owe him." 

" I have given it all back," said Gertrude, 



224 . . 

Still with her little laugh. ."He can take 
back the virtue he imparted ! I want to be 
wicked again." 

Her sister made her stop in the path, and 
fixed upon her in the darkness a sweet 
reproachful gaze. "If you talk this way 
I shall almost believe it. Think of all we 
owe Mr. Brand. Think of how he has 
always expected something of you. Think 
how much he has been to us. Think of 
his beautiful influence upon CliflFord." 

" He is very good," said Gertrude, looking 
at her sister. "I know he is very good. 
But he shouldn't speak against Felix." 

" Felix is good," Charlotte answered, softly 
but promptly. "Felix is very wonderftil. 
Only he is so different. Mr. Brand is much 
nearer to us. I should never think of going 
to Felix with a trouble — with a question. 
Mr. Brand is much more to us, Gertrude." 

"He is very — very good," Gertrude 
repeated. " He is more to you ; yes, much 
more. Charlotte," she added suddenly, 
" you are in love with him ! " 



viii.] . 225 

" Oh, Gertrude I " cried poor Charlotte ; 
and her sister saw her blushing in the 
darkness. 

Gertrude put her arm around her. "I 
wish he would marry you ! " she went 
on. 

Charlotte shook herself free. " You must 
not say such things!" she exclaimed, 
beneath her breath. 

''You like him more than you say, and 
he likes you more than he knows." 

'' This is very cruel of you ! " Charlotte 
Wentworth murmured. 

But if it was cruel Gertrude continued 
pitiless. ''Not if it's true," she answered* 
" I wish he would marry you." 

' Please don't say that." 

" I mean to tell him so ! " said Gertrude. 

" Oh, Gertrude, Gertrude ! " her sister 
almost moaned. 

"Yes, if he speaks to me again about 
myself. I will say, ' Why don't you marry 
Charlotte ? She's a thousand times better 
than I.' " 



226 . . 

*^ You are wicked ; you are changed ! " 
cried her sister. 

* If you don't like it you can prevent it," 
said Gertrude. "You can prevent it by 
keeping him from speaking to me ! " And 
with this she walked away, very conscious of 
what she had done; measuring it and 
finding a certain joy and a quickened sense 
of freedom in it. 

Mr. Wentworth was rather wide of the 
mark in suspecting that Clifford had begun 
to pay unscrupulous compliments to his 
brilliant cousin ; for the young man had 
really more scruples than he received credit 
for in his family. He had a certain trans- 
parent shamefacedness which was m itself 
a proof that he was not at his ease in dissi- 
pation. His collegiate peccadilloes had 
aroused a domestic murmur as disagreeable 
to the young man as the creaking of his 
boots would have been to a house-breaker. 
Only, as the house-breaker would have 
simplified matters by removing his chaus- 
suresy it had seemed to Clifford that the 



Yni.j . 227 

shortest cut to comfortable relations with 

people — ^relations which should make him 

cease to think that when they spoke to him 

they meant something improving — was to 

renounce all ambition toward a nefarious 

development. And, in fact, Clifford's 

ambition took the most commendable form. 

He thought of himself in the future as the 

well-known and much-liked Mr. Wentworth, 

of Boston, who should, in the natural course 

of prosperity, have married his pretty cousin, 

Lizzie Acton ; should live in a wide-fronted 

house, in view of the Common ; and should 

drive, behind a light wagon, over the damp 

autumn roads, a pair of beautifully matched 

sorrel horses. Clifford's vision of the 

coming years was very simple; its most 

definite features were this element of familiar 

matrimony and the duplication of his 

resources for trotting. He had not yet 

asked his cousin to marry him; but he 

meant to do so as soon as he should have 

taken his degree. Lizzie was serenely 

conscious of his intention, and she had 

Q 2 



228 . , 

made up her mind that he would improve. 
Her brother, who was very fond of this 
hght, quick, competent little Lizzie, saw, on 
his side, no reason to interpose. It seemed 
to him a graceful social law that Clifford and 
his sister should become engaged ; he him- 
self was not engaged, but every one else, 
fortunately, was not such a fool as he. He 
was fond of Clifford, as well, and had his 
own way — of which it must be confessed he 
was a* little ashamed — of looking at those 
aberrations which had led to the young 
man's compulsory retirement from the 
neighbouring seat of learning. Acton had 
seen the world, as he said to himself; he 
had been to China and had knocked about 
among men. He had learned the essential 
difference between a nice young fellow and 
a mean young fellow, and he was satisfied 
that there was no harm in Clifford. He 
believed — although it must be added that he 
had not quite the courage to declare it — in 
the doctrine of wild oats, which he thought 
a useful preventive of superfluous fears. If 



VII . 229 

Mr. Wentworth and Charlotte and Mr. 
Brand would only apply it in ClifFord*s case, 
they would be happier ; and Acton thought 
it a pity they should not be happier. They 
took the boy's misdemeanours too much to 
heart; they talked to him too solemnly; 
they frightened and bewildered him. Of 
course there was the great standard of 
morality, which forbade that a man should 
get tipsy, play at billiards for money, or 
cultivate his sensual consciousness ; but what 
fear was there that poor Clifford was going 
to run a tilt at any great standard ? It had, 
however, never occurred to Acton to dedicate 
the Baroness Miinster to the redemption of 
a refractory collegian. The instrument, 
here, would have seemed to him quite too 
complex for the operation. Felix, on the 
other hand, had spoken in obedience to the 
belief that the more charming a woman is, 
the more numerous, literally, are her definite 
social uses. 

Eugenia herself, as we know, had plenty 
of leisure to enumerate her uses. As I have 



230 . [cir. 

had the honour of intimating, she had come 
four thousand miles to seek her fortune; 
and it is not to be supposed that after this 
great effort she could neglect any apparent 
aid to advancement. It is my misfortune 
that in attempting to describe in a short 
compass the deportment of this remarkable 
woman I am obliged to express things 
rather brutally. I feel this to be the case, 
for instance, when I say that she had 
primarily detected such an aid to advance- 
ment in the person of Robert Acton, but 
that she had afterwards remembered that a 
prudent archer has always a second bow- 
string. Eugenia was a woman of finely- 
mingled motive, and her intentions were 
never sensibly gross. She had a sort of 
aesthetic ideal for Clifford which seemed to 
her a disinterested reason for taking him in 
hand. It was very well for a fresh-coloured 
young gentleman to be ingenuous; but 
Clifford, really, was crude. With such a 
pretty face he ought to have prettier 
manners. She would teach him that, with 



VII , 231 

a beautiful name, the expectation of a large 
property, and, as they said in Europe, a 
social position, an only son should know 
how to carry himself. 

Once Clifford had begun to come and see 
her by himself and for himself, he came 
very often. He hardly knew why he should 
come; he saw her almost every evening at 
his father's house ; he had nothing particular 
to say to her. She was not a young girl, 
and fellows of his age called only upon 
young girls. He exaggerated her age ; she 
seemed to him an old woman ; it was happy 
that the Baroness, with all her intelligence, 
was incapable of guessing this. But 
gradually it struck Clifford that visiting 
old women might be, if not a natural, at 
least, as they say of some articles of diet, an 
acquired taste. The Baroness was certainly 
a very amusing old woman; she talked to 
him as no lady — and indeed no gentleman 
— had ever talked to him before. 

"You should go to Europe and make 
the tour," she said to him one afternoon. 



232 . . 

"Of course, on leaving college, you will 

go-" 

" I don't want to go," Clifford declared. " I 

know some fellows who have been to Europe. 

They say you can have better fun here." 

"That depends. It depends upon your 
idea of fun. Your friends probably were 
not introduced." 

" Introduced ? " Clifford demanded. 

" They had no opportunity of going into 
society; they formed no relations,^' This 
was one of a certain number of words that 
the Baroness often pronounced in the 
French manner. 

" They went to a ball, in Paris ; I know 
that," said Clifford. 

" Ah, there are balls and balls ; especially 
in Paris. No, you must go, you know ; it 
is not a thing from which you can dispense 
yourself. You need it." 

" Oh, Fm very well," said Clifford. " I'm 
not sick." 

" I don't mean for your health, my poor 
child. I mean for your manners." 



viiL] . 233 

" I haven't got any manners ! " growled 
Clifford. 

" Precisely. You don't mind my assenting 
to that, eh?" asked the Baroness with a 
smile. " You must go to Europe and get a 
few. You can get them better there. It is 
a pity you might not have come while I was 
living in — in Germany. I would have 
introduced you; I had a charming little 
circle. You would perhaps have been 
rather young; but the younger one begins, 
I think, the better. Now, at any rate, you 
have no time to lose, and when I return you 
must immediately come to me." 

All this, to Clifford's apprehension, was 
a great mixture — his beginning young, 
Eugenia's return to Europe, his being 
introduced to her charming little circle. 
What was he to begin, and what was her little 
circle? His ideas about her marriage had 
a good deal of vagueness ; but they were in 
so far definite as that he felt i- to be a matter 
not to be freely mentioned. He sat and 
looked all round the room; he supposed 



234 . . 

she was alluding in some way to her 
marriage. 

"Oh, I don't want to go to Germany," 
he said; it seemed to him the most con- 
venient thing to say. 

She looked at him a while, smiling with 
her lips, but not with her eyes. " You have 
scruples ? " she asked. 

" Scruples r " said Clifford. 

" You young people, here, are very 
singular ; one doesn't know where to expect 
you. When you are not extremely im- 
proper you are so terribly proper. I dare 
say you think that, owing to my irregular 
marriage, I live with loose people. You 
were never more mistaken. I have been all 
the more particular.** 

"Oh, no," said Clifford, honestly dis- 
tressed. " I never thought such a thing 
as that." 

"Are you very surer I am convinced 
that your father does, and your sisters. 
They say to each other that, here, I am on 
my good behaviour, but that over there — 



• 



viri.] . 235 

married by the left hand — I associate, with 
light women." 

"Oh, no," cried Clifford, energetically, 
" they don't say such things as that to each 
other I " 

" If they think them they had better say 
them," the Baroness rejoined. "Then they 
can be contradicted. Please contradict that 
whenever you hear it, and don't be afraid 
of coming to see me on account of the 
company I keep. I have the honour of 
knowing more distinguished men, my poor 
child, than you are likely to see in a life- 
time. I see very few ' women ; but those 
are women of rank. So, my dear young 
Puritan, you needn't be afraid. I am not in 
the least one of those who think that the 
society of women who have lost their place 
in the vrai monde is necessary to form a 
young man. I have never taken that tone. 
I have kept my place myself, and I think we 
are a much better school than the others. 
Trust me, Clifford, and I will prove that to 
you," the Baroness continued, while she 



236 . . 

made the agreeable reflection that she could 
not, at least, be accused of perverting her 
young kinsman. "So if you ever fall 
among thieves don't go about saying I sent 
you to them." 

Clifford thought it so comical that he 
should know -^ in spite of her figurative 
language — ^what she meant, and that she 
should mean what he knew, that he could 
hardly help laughing a little, although he 
tried hard. "Oh, no! oh, no!" he 
murmured. 

" Laugh out, laugh out, if I amuse you!" 
cried the Baroness. "I am here for that!" 
And Clifford thought her a very amusing 
person indeed. *^But remember," she s^d 
on this occasion, " that you are coming- 
next year — to pay me a visit over 
there." 

About a week afterward she said to him, 
point-blank, "Are you seriously making 
love to your little cousin ? " 

"Seriously making love" — these words, 
on Madame Miinster s lips, had to Clifford's 



VII . 237 

sense a portentous and embarrassing sound ; 
he hesitated about assenting, lest he should 
commit himself to more than he understood. 
''Well, I shouldn't say it if I was!" he 
exclaimed, 

" Why wouldn't you say it ? " the 
Baroness demanded. ''Those things ought 
to be known." 

" I don t care whether it is known or not," 
Clifford rejoined. " But I don't want people 
looking at me." 

" A young man of your importance ought 
to learn to bear observation — to carry 
himself as if he were quite indifferent to it. 
I won't say, exactly, unconscious," the 
Baroness explained. "No, he must seem 
to know he is observed, and to think it 
natural he should be; but he must appear 
perfectly used to it. Now you haven't that, 
Clifford ; you haven't that at all. You must 
have that, you know. Don't tell me you 
are not a young man of importance,' 
Eugenia added. " Don't say anything so 
flat as that." 



238 . . 

"Ohj noj you don't catch me saying 
that ! " cried Clifford. 

"Yes, you must come to Germany,'* 
Madame Miinster continued. " I will show 
you how people can be talked about and 
yet not seem to know it. You will be 
talked about, of course, with me ; it will be 
said you are my lover. I will show you how 
little one may mind that — how little I shall 
mind it." 

Clifford sat staring, blushing, . and 
laughing. " I shall mind it a good deal I ** 
he declared. 

" Ah, not too much, you know ; that 
would be uncivil. But I give you leave to 
mind it a little; especially if you have a 
passion for Miss Acton. Voyons; as 
regards that, you either have, or you have 
not. It is very simple to say it." 

" I don't see why you want to know," said 
CUfford. 

"You ought to want me to know. If 
one is arranging a marriage, one tells one's 
friends." 



viiL] . 239 

" Oh, Fm not arranging anything," said 
Clifford. 

" You don't intend to marry your 
cousin ? " 

" Well, I expect I shall do as I choose ! " 

The Baroness leaned her head upon the 
back of her chair and closed her eyes, as if 
she were tired. Then opening them again, 
^ Your cousin is very charming," she said. 

"She is the prettiest girl in this place," 
Clifford rejoined. 

" * In this place ' is saying little ; she would 
be charming anywhere. I am afraid you 
are entangled." 

" Oh, no, I'm not entangled." 

"Are you engaged? At your age that is 
the same thing." 

Clifford looked at the Baroness with some 
audacity. " Will you tell no one ? " 

" If it's as sacred as that — no." 

" Well, then — we are not ! " said Clifford. 

"That's the great secret — that you are 
not, eh ? " asked the Baroness, with a quick 
laugh. "I am very glad to hear it. You 



240 , . 

are altogether too young. A young man in 
your position must choose and compare; he 
must see the world first. Depend upon it," 
she added, " you should not settle that 
matter before you have come abroad and 
paid me that visit. There are several 
things I should like to call your attention to 
first." 

'^ Well, I am rather afraid of that visit," 
said Clifford. "It seems to me it will be 
rather like going to school again." 

The Baroness looked at him a moment. 
"My dear child," she said, "there is no 
agreeable man who has not, at some 
moment, been to school to a clever woman 
— probably a little older than himself. And 
you must be thankful when you get your 
instruction gratis. With me you would get 
it gratis." 

The next day Clifford told Lizzie Acton 
that the Baroness thought her the most 
charming girl she had ever seen. 

Lizzie shook her head. "No, she 
doesn't ! " she said. 



VII . 241 

"Do you think everything she says," 
asked Clifford, " is to be taken the opposite 
way? 

" I think that is !. " said Lizzie. 

Clifford was going to remark that in this 
case the Baroness must desire greatly to 
bring about a marriage between Mr. Clifford 
Wentworth and Miss Elizabeth Acton ; but 
he resolved, on the whole, to suppress this 
observation. 



242 . . 



CHAPTER IX. 

It seemed to Robert Acton, after Eugenia 
had come to his house, that something had 
passed between them which made them a 
good deal more intimate. It was hard to 
say exactly what, except her telling him that 
she had taken her resolution with regard to 
the Prince Adolf; for Madame Miinsters 
visit had made no difference in their 
relations. He came to see her very often; 
but he had come to see her very often before. 
It was agreeable to him to find himself in 
her little drawing-room ; but this was not a 
new discovery. There was a change, however, 
in this sense : that if the Baroness had been 
a great deal in Acton's thoughts before, she 
was now never out of them. From the first 
she had been personally fascinating ; but the 
fascination now had become intellectual as 



IX,] . 243 

well. He was constantly pondering her 
words and motions ; they were as interesting 
as the factors in an algebraic problem. This 
is saying a good deal; for Acton was 
extremely fond of mathematics. He asked 
himself whether it could be that he was in 
love with her, and then hoped he was not ; 
hoped it not so much for his own sake as for 
that of the amatory passion itself If this 
was love, love had been over-rated. Love was 
a poetic impulse, and his own state of feeling 
with regard to the Baroness was largely 
characterized by that eminently prosaic 
sentiment — curiosity. It was true, as Acton 
with his quietly cogitative habit observed to 
himself, that curiosity, pushed to a given 
point, might become a romantic passion; 
and he certainly thought enough about this 
charming woman to make him restless and 
even a little melancholy. It puzzled and 
vexed him at times to feel that he was not 
more ardent. He was not in. the least bent 
upon remaining a bachelor. In his youngei 
years he had been — or he had tried to be — 

B 2 



244 . . 

of the opinion that it would be a good deal 
"jollier " not to marry, and he had flattered 
himself that his single condition was some- 
thing of a citadel. It was a citadel, at all 
* events, of which he had long since levelled 
the outworks. He had removed the guns 
from the ramparts; he had lowered the draw- 
bridge across the moat. The draw-bridge 
had swayed lightly under Madame Miinsters 
step; why should he not cause it to be 
raised again, so that she might be kept 
prisoner? He had an idea that she would 
become — in time at least, and on learning 
the conveniences of the place for making a 
lady comfortable — a tolerably patient captive. 
But the draw-bridge was never raised, and 
Acton's brilliant visitor was as free to depart 
as she had been to come. It was part of his 
curiosity to know why the deuce so suscep- 
tible a man was not in love with so charming 
a woman. If her vanous graces were, as I 
have said, the factors in an algebraic pro- 
blem, the answer to this question was the 
indispensable unknown quantity. The pur- 



IX.] . 245 

suit of the unknown quantity was extremely 
absorbing; for the present it taxed all 
Acton's faculties. 

Toward the middle of August he was 
obliged to leave home for some days; an 
old friend, with whom he had been associated 
in China, had begged him to come to 
Newport, where he lay extremely ill. His 
friend got better, and at the end of a week 
Acton was released. I use the word 
^^ released " advisedly ; for in spite of his 
attachment to his Chinese comrade he had 
been but a half-hearted visitor. He felt as if 
he had been called away from the theatre 
during the progress of a remarkably 
interesting drama. The curtain was up all 
this time, and he was losing the fourth act ; 
that fourth act which would be so essential 
to a just appreciation of the fifth. In other 
words he was thinking about the Baroness, 
who, seen at this distance, seemed a truly 
distinguished figure. He saw at Newport a 
great many pretty women, who certainly were 
figures as distinguished as beautiful light 



246 . . 

dresses could make them ; but though they 
talked a great deal — and the Baroness's strong 
point was perhaps also her conversation — 
Madame Miinster appeared to lose nothing 
by the comparison. He wished she too had 
come to Newport. Would it not be possible 
to make up, as they said, a party for visiting 
the famous watering-place and invite Eugenia 
to join it? It was true that the complete 
satisfaction would be to spend a fortnight at 
Newport with Eugenia alone. It would be 
a great pleasure to see her, in society, cany 
everything before her, as he was sure she 
would do. When Acton caught himself 
thinking these thoughts he began to walk up 
and down, with his hands in his pockets, 
frowning a little and looking at the floor. 
What did it prove — ^for it certainly proved 
something — this lively disposition to be 
"off" somewhere with Madame Miinster, 
away from all the rest of them ? Such a 
vision, certainly, seemed a refined implication 
of matrimony, after the Baroness should 
have formally got rid of her informal 



IX.] . 247 

husband. At any rate, Acton, with his 
characteristic discretion, forbore to give 
expression to whatever else it might imply, 
and the narrator of these incidents is not 
obliged to be more definite. 

He returned home rapidly, and, arriving 
in the afternoon, lost as little time as possible 
in joining the familiar circle at Mr. 
Wentworth's. On reaching the house, 
however, he found the piazzas empty. The 
doors and windows were open, and their 
emptiness was made clear by the shafts of 
lamp-light from the parlours. Entering the 
house, he found Mr. Wentworth sitting 
alone in one of these apartments, engaged 
in the perusal of the North American 
Review. After they had exchanged 
greetings and his cousin had made discreet 
inquiry about his journey, Acton asked 
what had become of Mr. Wentworth's 
companions. 

"They are scattered about, amusing 
themselves as usual," said the old man. " I 
saw Charlotte, a short time since, seated, with 



248 . . 

Mr. Brand, upon the piazza. They were 
conversing with their customary animation. 
I suppose they have joined her sister, who, 
for the hundredth time, was doing the 
honours of the garden to her foreign 
cousin." 

" I suppose you mean Felix," said Acton. 
And on Mr. Wentworth's assenting, he said, 
" And the others ? " 

"Your sister has not come this evening. 
You must have seen her at home," said Mr. 
Wentworth. 

"Yes. I proposed to her to come. She 
declined." 

" Lizzie, I suppose, was expecting a 
visitor," said the old man, with a kind of 
solemn slyness. 

" If she was expecting Clifford, he had not 
turned up." 

Mr. Wentworth, at this intelligence, 
closed the North American Revietv and 
remarked that he understood Clifford to say 
that he was going to see his cousin. 
Privately, he reflected that if Lizzie Acton 



IX.] . 249 

had had no news of his son, Clifford must 
have gone to Boston for the evening; an 
unnatural course of a summer night, 
especially when accompanied with disin- 
genuous representations. 

"You must remember that he has two 
cousins," said Acton, laughing. And then, 
coming to the point, "If Lizzie is not 
here," he added, "neither apparently is the 
Baroness." 

Mr. Wentworth stared a moment, and 
remembered that queer proposition of Felix's. 
For a moment he did not know whether it 
was not to be wished that Clifford, after all, 
might have gone to Boston. "The 
Baroness has not honoured us to-night," he 
said. "She has not come over for three 
days." 

" Is she ill ? " Acton asked. 

" No ; I have been to see her." 

" What is the matter with her ? " 

" Well," said Mr. Wentworth, " I infer she 
is tired of us." 

Acton pretended to sit down, but he was 



iSo , . 

restless ; he found it impossible to talk with 
Mr. Wentworth. At the end of ten minutes 
he took up his hat and said that he thought 
he would " go off." It was very late ; it was 
ten o'clock. 

His quiet-faced kinsman looked at him a 
moment. " Are you going home ? " he asked. 

Acton hesitated, and then answered that 
he had proposed to go over and take a look 
at the Baroness. 

" Well, you are honest, iat least," said Mr. 
Wentworth, sadly. 

"So are you, if you come to that!" cried 
Acton, laughing. " Why shouldn't I be 
honest r " 

The old man opened the North Ame- 
rican again, and read a few lines. " If we 
have ever had any virtue amongst us, we 
had better keep hold of it now," he said. 
He was not quoting. 

"We have a Baroness among us," said 
Acton. "That's what we must keep hold 
of ! " He was too impatient to see Madame 
Miinster again to wonder what Mr. Went- 



IX.] . 251 

worth was talking about. Nevertheless, 
after he had passed out of the house and 
traversed the garden and the little piece of 
road that separated him from Eugenia's 
provisional residence, he stopped a moment. 
He stood in her little garden; the long 
window of her parlour was open, and he 
could see the white curtains, with the lamp- 
light shining through them, swaying softly to 
and fro in the warm night-wind. There was 
a sort of excitement in the idea of seeing 
Madame Miinster again; he became aware 
that his heart was beating rather faster 
than usual. It was this that made him 
stop, with a half-amused surprise. But 
in a moment he went along the piazza 
and, approaching the open window, tapped 
upon its lintel with his stick. He could see 
the Baroness within ; she was standing in 
the middle of the room. She came to the 
window and pulled aside the curtain ; then 
she stood looking at him a moment. 
She was not smiling ; she seemed 
serious. 



252 . . 

" Mais entrez done ! " she said at last. 
Acton passed in across the wndow-sill; he 
wondered, for an instant, what was the 
matter with her. But the next moment 

she had begun to smile and had put out her 
hand. "Better late than never/' she said. 
"It is very kind of you to come at this 
hour." 

" I have just returned from my journey," 
said Acton. 

" Ah, very kind, very kind," she repeated, 
looking about her where to sit. 

" I went first to the big house," Acton 
continued. "I expected to find you 
there." 

She had sunk into her usual chair; but 
she got up again and began to move about 
the room. Acton had laid down his hat 
and stick ; he was looking at her, conscious 
that there was in fact a great charm in 
seeing her again. " I don't know whether I 
ought to tell you to sit down," she said. 
" It is too late to begin a visit." 

"It is too early to end one," Acton 



IX.] . 253 

declared; "and we needn't mind the 
beginning." 

She looked at him again, and, after a 
moment, dropped once more into her low 
chair, while he took a place near her. " We 
are in the middle, then ? " she asked. " Was 
that where we were when you went away ? 
No, I haven't been to the other house." 

" Not yesterday, nor the day before, eh ? " 

" I don't know how many days it is." 

" You are tired of it ? " said Acton. 

She leaned back in her chair; her arms 
were folded. "That is a terrible accusa- 
tion, but I have not the courage to defend 
myself." 

"I am not attacking you," said Acton. 
" I expected something of this kind." 

"It's a proof of extreme intelligence. I 
hope you enjoyed your journey." 

" Not at all," Acton declared. " I would 
much rather have been here with you." 

"Now you are attacking me," said the 
Baroness. " You are contrasting my 
inconstancy with your own fidelity." 



254 . [ca 

" I confess I never get tired of people I 
like." 

" Ah, you are not a poor wicked foreign 
woman, with irritable nerves and a sophisti- 
cated mind ! " 

" Something has happened to you since I 
went away," said Acton, changing his place. 

"Your going away — that is what has 
happened to me." 

"Do you mean to say that you have 
missed me ? " he asked. 

" If I had meant to say it, it would not 
be worth your making a note of. I am 
very dishonest and my compliments are 
worthless." 

Acton was silent for some moments. 
" You have broken down," he said at last 

Madame Miinster left her chair and 
began to move about. 

" Only for a moment. I shall pull myself 
together again." 

" You had better not take it too hard. If 
you are bored, you needn't be afraid to say 
so — to me at least." 



IX.] . 255 

" You shouldn't say such things as that," 
the Baroness answered. " You should en- 
courage me." 

"I admire your patience; that is en- 
couraging." 

"You shouldn't even say that. When 
you talk of my patience you are disloyal to 
your own people. Patience implies suiFering; 
and what have I had to suffer ? " 

*^Oh, not hunger, not unkindness, cer- 
tainly," said Acton, laughing. "Neverthe- 
less, we all admire your patience." 

" You all detest me I " cried the Baroness, 
with a sudden vehemence, turning her back 
toward him. 

" You make it hard," said Acton, getting 
up, " for a man to say something tender to 
you." This evening there was something 
particularly striking and touching about 
her; an unwonted softness and a look of 
suppressed emotion. He felt himself 
suddenly appreciating the fact that she had 
behaved very well. She had come to this 
quiet corner of the world under the weight 



256 . . 

of a cruel indignity, and she had been so 
gracefully, modestly thankful for the rest 
she found there. She had joined that 
simple circle over the way ; she had mingled 
in its plain provincial talk ; she had shared 
its meagre and savourless pleasures. She 
had set herself a task and she had rigidly 
performed it. She had conformed to the 
angular conditions of New England life, and 
she had had the tact and pluck to carry it 
off as if she liked them. Acton felt a more 
downright need than he had ever felt before 
to tell her that he admired her and that she 
struck him as a very superior woman. AD 
along, hitherto, he had been on his guard 
with her ; he had been cautious, observant, 
suspicious. But now a certain light tumult 
in his blood seemed to intimate that a 
finer degree of confidence in this charming 
woman would be its own reward. ^ We 
don't detest you," he went on. "I don*t 
know what you mean. At any rate, I speak 
for myself; I don't know anything about 
the others. Very likely, you detest them 



IX.] . 257 

for the dull life they make you lead. 
Really, it would give me a sort of pleasure 
to hear you say so," 

Eugenia had been looking at the door on 
the other side of the room ; now she slowly 
turned her eyes toward Robert Acton. 
" What can be the motive," she asked, " of 
a man like you — an honest man, a galant 
homme — in saying so base a thing as that ? " 

" Does it sound very base ? " asked Acton, 
candidly. " I suppose it does, and I thank 
you for telling me so. Of course I don't 
mean it literally." 

The Baroness stood looking at him. 
" How do you mean it ? " she asked. 

This question was difficult to answer, and 
Acton,, feeling the least bit foolish, walked 
to the open window and looked out. He 
. stood there, thinking a moment, and then he 
turned back. " You know that document 
that you were to send to Germany," he said. 
"You called it you-r 'renunciation.' Did 
you ever send it ? " 

Madame Miinster's eyes expanded: she 



s 



2S8 . . 

looked very grave. " What a singular 
answer to my question ! " 

'^ Oh, it isn't an answer," said Acton. " I 
have wished to ask you, many times. I 
thought it probable you would tell mc 
yourself. The question, on my part, seems 
abrupt now ; but it would be abrupt at any 



time." 



The Baroness was silent a moment ; and 
then, '^ I think I have told you too much ! " 
she said. 

This declaration appeared to Acton to 
have a certain force ; he had indeed a sense 
of asking more of her than he offered her. 
He returned to the window and watched, 
for a moment, a little star that twinkled 
through the lattice of the piazza. There 
were at any rate offers enough he could 
make; perhaps he had hitherto not been 
sufficiently explicit in doing so. " I wish 
you would ask something of me," he 
presently said. " Is there nothing I can do 
for you ? If you can't stand this dull life 
any more, let me amuse you ! " 



IX.] . 259 

The Baroness had sunk once more into a 
chair, and she had taken up a fan which she 
held, with both hands, to her mouth. Over 
the top of the fan her eyes were fixed on 
him. "You are very strange to-night," 
she said with a laugh. 

"I will do anything in the world," he 
rejoined, standing in front of her. 
" Shouldn't you like to travel about and 
see something of the country ? Won't you 
go to Niagara ? You ought to see Niagara, 
you know." 

"With you, do you mean ? " 

" I should be delighted to take you." 

" You aJone ? " 

Acton looked at her, smiling, and yet 
with a serious air. "Well, yes; we might 
go alone," he said. 

" If you were not what you are," she 
answered, " I should feel insulted." 

" How do you mean — what I am ? " 

" If you were one of the gentlemen I have 
been used to all my life. If you were not a 
queer Bostonian." 



26o . [cw, 

" If the gentlemen you have been used to 
have taught you to expect insults," said 
Acton, " I am glad I am what I am. You 
had much better come to Niagara." 

" If you wish to ^ amuse ' me," the 
Baroness declared, "you need go to no 
further expense. You amuse me very 
effectually." 

He sat down opposite to her ; she still 
held her fan up to her face, with her eyes 
only showing above it. There was a 
moment's silence, and then he said, re- 
turning to his former question, " Have you 
sent that document to Germany r " 

Again there was a moment's silence. 
The expressive eyes of Madame Miinster 
seemed, however, half to break it. " I will 
tell you — at Niagara ! " she said. 

She had hardly spoken when the door at 
the further end of the room opened — ^the 
door upon which, some minutes pre^aous, 
Eugenia had fixed her gaze. Clifford 
Wentworth stood there, blushing and 
looking rather awkward. The Baroness 



IX.] . 261 

rose, quickly, and Acton, more slowly, did 
the same. Clifford gave him no greeting ; 
he was looking at Eugenia. 

" Ah, you were here ? " exclaimed Acton. 

" He was in Felix's studio," said Madame 
Miinster. " He wanted to see his sketches." 

Clifford looked at Robert Acton, but he 
said nothing ; he only fanned himself with 
his hat. " You chose a bad moment," said 
Acton ; " you hadn't much light." 

^* I hadn't any ! " said Clifford, laughing. 

" Your candle went out ? " Eugenia asked. 
**You should have come back here and 
lighted it again." 

Clifford looked at her a moment. "So 
I have — come back. But I have left the 
candle ! " 

Eugenia turned away. "You are very 
stupid, my poor boy. You had better go 
home." 

"Well," said Clifford, "good-night!" 

"Haven't you a word to throw to a 
man when he has safely returned from a 
dangerous journey ? " Acton asked. 



262 . . 

"How do you do?" said ClifFord. "I 
thought — I thought you were " — ^And he 
paused, looking at the Baroness again. 

"You thought I was at Newport, eh? 
So I was — ^this morning." 

" Good-night, clever child ! " said Madame 
Miinster, over her shoulder. 

ClifFord stared at her — not at all like a 
clever child; and then, with one of his 
little facetious growls, took his departure. 

" What is the matter with him ? " asked 
Acton, when he was gone. "He seemed 
rather in a muddle." 

Eugenia, who was near the window, 
glanced out, listening a moment. "The 
matter — the matter" — she answered. "But 
you don't say such things here." 

" If you mean that he had been drinking 
a little, you can say that." 

" He doesn't drink any more. I have 
cured him. And in return he is in love 
with me." 

It was Acton's turn to stare. He instantly 
thought of his sister; but he said nothing 



IX.] . 263 

about her. He began to laugh. " I don't 
wonder at his passion ! But I wonder at his 
forsaking your society for that of your 
brother's paint-brushes." 

Eugenia was silent a minute. ^^ He had 
not been in the studio. I invented that — at 
the moment." 

" Invented it ? For what purpose ? " 

" He has an idea of being romantic. He 
has adopted the habit of coming to see me 
at midnight — passing only through the 
orchard and through Felix's painting-room, 
which has a door opening that way. It 
seems to amuse him," added Eugenia, with a 
little laugh. 

Acton felt more surprise than he con- 
fessed to, for this was a new view of Clifford, 
whose irregularities had hitherto been quite 
without the romantic element. He tried to 
laugh again, but he felt rather too serious, 
and after a moment's hesitation his serious- 
ness explained itself. '^ I hope you don't 
encourage him," he said. " He must not be 
inconstant to poor Lizzie." 



264 . . 

" To your sister ? " 

" You know they are decidedly intimate," 
said Acton. 

" Ah," cried Eugenia smiling, " has she- 
has she — ^" 

" I don't know," Acton interrupted, " what 
she has. But I always supposed that 
Clifford had a desire to make himself agree- 
able to her." 

"Ah, par exemple!" the Baroness went 
on. "The little monster! The next time 
he becomes sentimental I will tell him that 
he ought to be ashamed of himself." 

Acton was silent a moment. "You had 
better say nothing about it." 

"I had told him as much aheady, on 
general grounds," said the Baroness. "But 
in this country, you know, the relations of 
young people are so extraordinary that one 
is quite at sea. They are not engaged when 
you would quite say they ought to be. 
Take Charlotte Wentworth, for instance, 
and that young ecclesiastic. If I were her 
father I should insist upon his marrying 



IX.] . 265 

her; but it appears to be thought there is 
no urgency. On the other hand, you 
suddenly learn that a boy of twenty and a 
little girl who is still with her governess — 
your sister has no governess ? Well, then, 
who is never away from her mamma — a 
young couple, in short, between whom you 
have noticed nothing beyond an exchange 
of the childish pleasantries characteristic of 
their age, are on the point of setting up as 
man and wife." The Baroness spoke with a 
certain exaggerated volubility which was m 
contrast with the languid grace that had. 
characterized her manner before Clifford 
made his appearance. It seemed to Acton 
that there was a spark of irritation in her eye 
— a note of irony (as when she spoke of 
Lizzie being never away from her mother) 
in her voice. If Madame Miinster was 
irritated, Robert Acton was vaguely mysti- 
fied; she began to move about the room 
again, and he looked at her without saying 
anything. Presently she took out her 
watch, and, glancing at it, declared that it 



^66 . [cii. 

was three o'clock in the morning and that 
he must go. 

*^ I have not been here an hour/' he said, 
"and they are still sitting up at the big 
house. You can see the lights. Your 
brother has not come in." 

"Oh, at the big house," cried Eugenia, 
"they are terrible people! I don't know 
what they may do over there. I am a quiet 
little humdrum woman ; I have rigid rules 
and I keep them. One of them is not to 
have visitors in the small hours — especiaDy 
clever men like you. So good-night ! " 

Decidedly, the Baroness was incisive ; and 
though Acton bade her good-night and 
departed, he was still a good deal mystified. 

The next day Clifford Wentworth came 
to see Lizzie, and Acton, who was at home 
and saw him pass through the garden, took 
note of the circumstance. He had a natural 
desire to make it tally with Madame 
Miinster's account of Clifford's disaffection ; 
but his ingenuity, finding itself unequal to 
the task, resolved at last to ask help of the 



IX.] . 267 

young man's candour. He waited till he 
saw him going away, and then he went out 
and overtook him in the grounds. 

" I wish very much you would answer me 
a question," Acton said. " What were you 
doing last night at Madame MUnster's ? '' 

Clifford began to laugh and to blush, by 
no means like a young man with a romantic 
secret. "What did she tell you?" he 
asked. 

*^That is exactly what I don't want to 
say." 

" Well, I want to tell you the same," said 
Clifford ; " and unless I know it perhaps I 



1, " 
cant. 



They had stopped in a garden path ; 
Acton looked hard at his rosy young 
kinsman. " She said she couldn't fancy 
what had got into you; you appeared 
to have ' taken a violent dislike to 
her. 

Clifford stared, looking a little alarmed. 
•'Oh come," he growled, "you don't mean 
that ! " 



268 . [ca 

And that when — for common civility's 
sake — you came occasionally to the house you 
left her alone and spent your time in Felix's 
studio, under pretext of looking at his 
sketches." 

" Oh, come ! " growled Clifford, again. 

"Did you ever know me to tell an 
untruth ? " 

"Yes, lots of them!" said Clifford, 
seeing an opening, out of the discussion, for 
his sarcastic powers. "Well," he presently 
added, " I thought you were my father." 

" You knew some one was there ? " 

" We heard you coming in." 

Acton meditated. "You had been with 
the Baroness, then ? " 

" I was in the parlour. We heard your 
step outside. I thought it was my father." 

"And on that," asked Acton, "you ran 
away? 

" She told me to go — to go out by the 
studio." 

Acton meditated more intensely ; if there 
had been a chair at hand he would have sat 



IX.] . 269 

down. '^ Why should she wish you not to 
meet your father ? " 

"Well," said Clifford, "father doesn't 
like to see me there." 

Acton looked askance at his companion, 
and forbore to make any comment upon 
this assertion. " Has he said so," he asked, 
*^ to the Baroness ? " 

" WeU, I hope not," said Clifford. " He 
hasn't said so— in so many words — to me. 
But I know it worries him ; and I want to 
stop worrying him. The Baroness knows 
it, and she wants me to stop, too." 

" To stop coming to see her ? " 

" I don't know about that ; but to 
stop worrying father. Eugenia knows 
everything," Clifford added, with an air 
of knowingness of his own. 

" Ah," said Acton, interrogatively, 
" Eugenia knows everything r " 

"She knew it was not father coming 



• 9» 

m. 



Then why did you go r " 
Clifford blushed and laughed afresh. 



270 . . 

"Well, I was afraid it was. And besides, 
she told me to go at any rate." 

" Did she think it was I ? " Acton asked. 

" She didn't say so." 

Again Robert Acton reflected. "But 
you didn't go," he presently said; "you 
came back." 

" I couldn't get out of the studio," 
Clifford rejoined. "The door was locked, 
and Felix has nailed some planks across the 
lower half of the confounded windows, to 
make the light come in from above. So 
they were no use. I waited there a good 
while, and then suddenly I felt ashamed. I 
didn't want to be liiding away from my own 
father. I couldn't stand it any longer. I 
bolted out, and when I found it was you I 
was a little flurried. But Eugenia carried 
It off', didn't she?" Clifford added, in the 
tone of a young humourist whose perception 
had not been permanently clouded by the 
sense of his own discomfort. 

" Beautifully ! " said Acton. " Especially," 
he continued, "when one remembers that 



IX.] . 271 

you were very imprudent and that she must 
have been a good deal annoyed." 

^^ Oh," cried Clifford, with the indifference 
of a young man who feels that however 
he may have failed of felicity in behaviour, 
he is extremely just in his impressions, 
" Eugenia doesn't care for anything ! " 

Acton hesitated a moment. " Thank you 
for telling me this," he said at last. And 
then, laying his hand on Clifford's shoulder, 
he added, "Tell me one thing more: are 
you by chance the least bit sweet on the 
Baroness ? " 

" No, sir ! " said Cliflbrd, almost shaking 
off his hand. 



272 . . 



CHAPTER X, 

The first Sunday that followed Robert 
Acton's return from Newport witnessed a 
change in the brilliant weather that had long 
prevailed. The rain began to fall and the 
day was cold and dreary. Mr. Wentworth 
and his daughters put on overshoes and 
went to church, and Felix Young, without 
overshoes, went also, holding an umbrella 
over Gertrude. It is to be feared that, in 
the whole observance, this was the pri\nlege 
he most highly valued. The Baroness 
remained at home ; she was in neither a 
cheerful nor a devotional mood. She had, 
however, never been, during her residence in 
the United States, what is called a regular 
attendant at divine service;' and on this 
particular Sunday morning of which I began 
with speaking she stood at the window of 



X.] . 273 

her Ktde drawing-room, watching the long 
arm of a rose-tree that was attached to her 
piazza, but a portion of which had disen- 
gaged itself, sway to and fro, shake and 
gesticulate, against the dusky drizzle of the 
sky. Every now and then, in a gust of 
wind, the rose-tree scattered a shower of 
water-drops against the window-pane ; it 
appeared to have a kind of human move- 
ment — a menacing, warning intention. The 
room was very cold ; Madame Miinster put 
on a shawl and walked about. Then she 
determined to have some fire; and sum- 
moning her ancient negress, the contrast of 
whose polished ebony and whose crimson 
turban had been at first a source of satis- 
faction to her, she made arrangements for 
the production of a crackling flame. This 
old woman's name was Azarina. The 
Baroness had began by thinking that there 
would be a savoury wildness in her talk, and, 
for amusement, she had encouraged her to 
chatter. But Azarina was dry and prim; 
her conversation was anything but African ; 



274 . . 

she reminded Eugenia of tlie tiresome old 
ladies she met in society. She knew, 
however, how to make a fire ; so that after 
she had laid the logs Eugenia, who was 
terribly bored, found a quarter of an hour's 
entertainment in sitting and watching them 
blaze and sputter. She had thought it very 
likely Robert Acton would come and see 
her; she had not met him since that 
infelicitous evening. But the morning 
waned without his coming; several times 
she thought she heard his step on the piazza, 
but it was only a window-shutter shaking in 
a rain-gust. The Baroness, since the begin- 
ning of that episode in her career of which a 
slight sketch has been attempted in these 
pages, had had many moments of irritation. 
But to-day her irritation had a peculiar 
keenness; it appeared to feed upon itself. 
It urged her to do something; but it 
suggested no particularly profitable line of 
action. If she could have done something 
at the moment, on the spot, she would have 
stepped upon a European steamer and 



X.] . 275 

turned her back, with a kind of rapture, 
upon that profoundly mortifying failure, her 
visit to her American relations. It is not 
exactly apparent why she should have 
termed this enterprise a failure, inasmuch 
as she had been treated with the highest 
distinction for which allowance had been 
made in American institutions. Her irrita- 
tion came, at bottom, from the sense, which, 
always present, had suddenly grown acute, 
that the social soil on this big, vague 
continent was somehow not adapted for 
growing those plants whose fragrance she 
especially inclined to inhale and by which 
she liked to see herself surrounded — a 
species of vegetation for which she carried 
a collection of seedlings, as we may say, in 
her pocket. She found her chief happiness 
in the sense of exerting a certain power and 
miaking a certain impression ; and now she 
felt the annoyance of a rather wearied 
swimmer who, on nearing shore, to land, 
finds a smooth straight wall of rock when he 

had counted upon a clean firm beach. Her 

T 2 



276 . [CH. 

power, in the American air, seemed to have 
lost its prehensile attributes; the smooth 
wall of rock was insurmountable. " Surely 
ie Tien suis pas la^'* she said to herself, 
^' that I let it make me uncomfortable that a 
Mr. Robert Acton shouldn't honour me 
with a visit ! " Yet she was vexed that he had 
not come ; and she was vexed at her vexation. 

Her brother, at least, came in, stamping 
in the hall and shaking the wet from his 
coat. In a moment he entered the room, 
with a glow in his cheek and half-a-dozen 
rain-drops glistening on his moustache. 
*^ Ah, you have a fire," he said. 

^^ Les beaux jours sont passes," replied the 
Baroness. 

^^ Never, never ! They have only begun," 
Felix declared, planting himself before the 
hearth. He turned his back to the fire, 
placed his hands behind him, extended his 
legs and looked away through the window 
with an expression of face which seemed to 
denote the perception of rose-colour even 
in the tints of a wet Sunday. 



X] . 277 

His sister, from her chair, looked up at 
him, watching him; and what she saw in 
his face was not grateful to her present 
mood. She was not puzzled by many- 
things, but her brother's disposition was a 
frequent source of wonder to her. I say 
frequent, and not constant, for there were 
long periods during which she gave her 
attention to other problems. Sometimes 
she had said to herself that his happy 
temper, his eternal gaiety, was an affectation, 
a pose ; but she was vaguely conscious that 
during the present summer he had been 
a highly successful comedian. They had 
never yet had an explanation ; she had not 
known the need of one. Felix was pre- 
sumably following the bent of his disinter- 
ested genius, and she felt that she had no 
advice to give him that he would under- 
stand. With this, there was always a 
certain element of comfort about Felix — 
the assurance that he would not interfere. 
He was very delicate, this pure-minded 
Felix; in effect, he was her brother, and 



278 . . 

Madame Mtirister felt that there was a 
great propriety, every way, in that. It is 
true that Felix was delicate; he was not 
fond of explanations with his sister; this 
was one of the very few things in the world 
about which he was uncomfortable. But 
now he was not thinking of anything 
uncomfortable. 

"Dear brother," said Eugenia at last, 
" do stop making les yeux doux at the rain." 

"With pleasure. I will make them at 
you ! " answered Felix. 

"How much longer," asked Eugenia, in 
a moment, "do you propose to remain in 
this lovely spot ? " 

Felix stared. " Do you want to go away 
— already ? " 

" ' Already ' is delicious. I am not so 
happy as you." 

Felix dropped into a chair, looking at 
the fire. "The fact is I am happy," he 
said in his light, clear tone. 

" And do you propose to spend your life 
in making love to Gertrude Wentworth ? " 



X.] . 279 

"Yes!" said Felix, smiling sidewise at 
his sister. 

The Baroness returned his glance, much 
more gravely ; and then, " Do you like 
her ? " she asked. 

" Don't you ? " Felix demanded. 

The Baroness was silent a moment. 
"I will answer you in the words of the 
gentleman who was asked if he liked music : 
^ Je ne la crains pas ! ' " 

" She admires you immensely," said Felix. 

" I don't care for that. Other women 
should not admire one." 

" They should dislike you ? " 

Again Madame Miinster hesitated. "They 
should hate me ! It's a measure of the time 
I have been losing here that they don't." 

" No time is lost in which one has been 
happy!" said Felix, with a bright senten- 
tiousness which may well have been a little 
irritating. 

" And in which," rejoined his sister, with 
a harsher laugh, " one has secured the 
affections of a young lady with a fortune ! " 



28o . . 

Felix explained, very candidly and seri- 
ously. "I have secured Gertrude's affec- 
tion, but I am by no means sure that I 
have secured her fortune. That may come 
—or it may not." 

^^Ah, well, it may! That's the great 
point." 

" It depends upon her father. He doesn't 
smile upon our union. You know he wants 
her to marry Mr. Brand." 

"I know nothing about it!" cried the 
Baroness. "Please to put on a log." Felix 
complied with her request and sat watching 
the quickening of the flame. Presently his 
sister added, "And you propose to elope 
with mademoiselle?" 

" By no means. I don't wish to do any- 
thing that's disagreeable to Mr. Wentworth. 
He has been far too kind to us." 

"But you must choose between pleasing 
yourself and pleasing him." 

" I want to please every one ! " exclaimed 
Felix, joyously. " I have a good conscience. 
I made up my mind at the outset that it 



X.] . 281 

was not my place to make love to Ger- 
trude." 

^^So, to simplify matters, she made love 
to you ? " 

Felix looked at his sister with sudden 
gravity. ^^You say you are not afraid of 
her," he said. "But perhaps you ought 
to be — a little. She's a very clever 
person." 

" I begin to see it ! " cried the Baroness. 
Her brother, making no rejoinder, leaned 
back in his chair, and there was a long 
silence. At last, with an altered accent, 
Madame Miinster put another question. 
" You expect, at any rate, to marry ? " 

"I shall be greatly disappointed if we 
don't." 

"A disappointment or two will do you 
good ! " the Baroness declared. " 4nd, after- 
wards, do you mean to turn Amencan ? " 

"It seems to me I am a very good 
American already. But we shall go to 
Europe. Gertrude wants extremely to see 
the world." 



282 . . 

" Ah, like me, when I came here ! " said 
the Baroness with a little laugh. 

" No, not like you," Felix rejoined, look- 
ing at his sister with a certain gentle 
seriousness. While he looked at her she 
rose from her chair, and he also got up. 
'^Gertrude is not at all like you," he went 
on ; " but in her own way she is almos*- 
as clever." He paused a moment ; his 
soul was full of an agreeable feeling and 
of a lively disposition to express it. His 
sister, to his spiritual vision, was always 
like the lunar disk when only a part of it 
is lighted. The shadow on this bright 
surface seemed to him to expand and to 
contract; but whatever its proportions, he 
always appreciated the moonlight. He 
looked at the Baroness, and then he kissed 
her. " I am very much in love with 
Gertrude," he said. Eugenia turned away 
and walked about the room, and Felix 
continued, "She is very interesting, and 
very different from what she seems. She 
has never had a chance. She is very 



X.] . 283 

brilliant. We will go to Europe and amuse 
ourselves." 

The Baroness had gone to the window, 
where she stood looking out. The day was 
drearier than ever; the rain was doggedly 
falling. "Yes, to amuse yourselves/' she 
said at last, "you had decidedly better go 
to Europe!" Then she turned round, 
looking at her brother. A chair stood near 
her; she leaned her hands upon the back 
of it. "Don't you think it is very good 
of me," she asked, " to come all this way 
with you simply to see you properly married 
— if properly it is ? " 

"Oh, it will be properly " cried Felix, 
with light eagerness. 

The Baroness gave a litde laugh. " You 
are thinking only of yourself, and you don't 
answer my question. While you are amus- 
ing yourself — with the brilliant Gertrude 
— ^what shall I be doing ? '•' 

" Vous serez de la partie ! " cried Felix. 

"Thank you; I should spoil it." The 
Baroness dropped her eyes for some 



284 . . 

moments. "Do you propose, however, to 
leave me here ? " she inquired. 

Felix smiled at her. " My dearest sister, 
where you are concerned 1 never propose. 
I execute your commands.' 

"I believe," said Eugenia, slowly, "that 
you" are the most heartless person living. 
Don't you see that I am in trouble ? " 

" I saw that you were not cheerful, and I 
gave you some good news." 

"Well, let me give you some news," 
said the Baroness. "You probably will 
not have discovered it for yourself. Robert 
Acton wants to marry me." 

"No, I had not discovered that. But 
I quite understand it. Why does it make 
you unhappy ? " 

" Because I can't decide." 

"Accept him, accept him!" cried Felix, 
joyously. " He is the best fellow in the world." 

" He is immensely in love with me," said 
the Baroness. 

"And he has a large fortune. Permit 
me in turn to remind you of that." 



X.] , 285 

*^Oh, I am perfectly aware of it/' said 
Eugenia. ^^ That's a great item in his 
favour. I am terribly candid." And she 
left her place and came nearer her brother, 
looking at him hard. He was turning over 
several things; she was wondering in what 
manner he really understood her. 

There were several ways of understanding 
her : there was what she said, and there was 
what she meant, and there was something, 
between the two, that was neither. It is 
probable that, in the last analysis, what 
she meant was that Felix should spare her 
the necessity of stating the case more 
exactly and should hold himself com- 
missioned to assist her by all honourable 
means to marry the best fellow in the world. 
But in all this it was never discovered what 
Felix understood. 

*^Once you have your liberty, what are 
your objections ? " he asked. 

" Well, I don't particularly like him." 

« Oh, try a little." 

^I am trying now," said Eugenia. "I 



286 . . 

should succeed better if he didn't live here. 
I could never live here." 

"Make him go to Europe/' Felix sug- 
gested. 

'' Ah, there you speak of happiness based 
upon violent effort," the Baroness rejoined. 
"That is not what I am looking for. He 
would never live in Europe." 

"He would live anywhere, with you!" 
said Felix, gallantly. 

His sister looked at him still, with a ray 
of penetration in her charming eyes; then 
she turned away again. "You see, at all 
events," she presently went on, '" that if it 
had been said of me that 1 had come over 
here to seek my fortune it would have to be 
added that I have found it ! " 

" Don't leave it lying ! " urged Felix, with 
smiling solemnity. 

"I am much obliged to you for your 
interest," his sister declared, after a moment. 
"But promise me one thing: pas de zele! 
If Mr. Acton should ask you to plead his 
cause, excuse yourself." 



X.] . 287 

" I shall certainly have the excuse," said 
Felix, " that I have a cause of my own to 
plead." 

"If he should talk of me — favourably," 
Eugenia continued, "warn him against 
dangerous illusions. I detest importunities ; 
I want to decide at my leisure, with my eyes 
open." 

" I shall be discreet," said Felix, " except to 
you. To you I will say. Accept him outright." 

She had advanced to the open door-way, 
and she stood looking at him. "I will go 
and dress and think of it," she said ; and he 
heard her moving slowly to her apartments. 

Late in the afternoon the rain stopped, 
and just afterwards there was a great 
flaming, flickering, trickling sunset. Felix 
sat in his painting-room and did some 
work ; but at last, as the light, which had not 
been brilliant, began to fade, he laid down 
his brushes and came out to the little piazza 
of the cottage. Here he walked up and 
down for some time, looking at the splendid 
blaze of the western sky and saying, as he 



288 . . 

had often said before, that this was certainly 
the country of sunsets. There was some- 
thing in these glorious deeps of fire that 
quickened his imagination ; he always found 
images and promises in the western sky. 
He thought of a good many things — of 
roaming about the world with Gertrude 
Wentworth ; he seemed to see their possible 
adventures, in a glowing frieze, between the 
cloud-bars ; then of what Eugenia had just 
been telling him. He wished very much 
that Madame Miinster would make a 
comfortable and honourable marriage. 
Presently, as the sunset expanded and 
deepened, the fancy took him of making a 
note of so magnificent a piece of colouring. 
He returned to his studio and fetched out a 
small panel, with his palette and brushes, 
and, placing the panel against a window-sill, 
he began to daub with great gusto. While 
he was so occupied he saw Mr. Brand, in 
the distance, slowly come down from Mr. 
Wentworth's house, nursing a large folded 
umbrella. He walked with a joyless, 



X.] . 289 

meditative tread and his eyes were bent 
upon the ground. Felix poised his brush 
for a moment, watching him; then, by a 
sudden impulse, as he drew nearer, advanced 
to the garden-gate and signaled to him — the 
palette and hunch of brushes contributing to 
this effect. 

Mr. Brand stopped and started ; then he 
appeared to decide to accept Felix's invita- 
tion. He came out of Mr. Wentworth's 
gate and passed along the road ; after which 
he entered the little garden of the cottage. 
Felix had gone back to his sunset ; but he 
made his visitor welcome while he rapidly 
brushed it in. 

" I wanted so much to speak to you that 
I thought I would call you," he said, in the 
friendliest tone. "All the more that you 
have been to see me so little. You have 
come to see my sister; I know that. But 
you haven't come to see me — ^the celebrated 
artist. Artists are very sensitive, you know ; 
they notice those things." And Felix turned 
round, smiling, with a brush in his mouth. 



290 . . 

Mr. Brand stood there with a certain 
blank, candid majesty, pulling together the 
large flaps of his umbrella. " Why should 
I come to see you ? " he asked. " I know 
nothing of Art." 

"It would sound very conceited, I 
suppose," said Felix, "if I were to say 
that it would be a good little chance for 
you to learn something. You would ask 
me why you should learn ; and I should 
have no answer to that. I suppose a 
minister has no need for Art, eh ? " 

" He has need for good temper, sir," said 
Mr. Brand, with decision. 

Felix jumped up, with his palette on his 
thumb and a movement of the liveliest 
deprecation. "That's because I keep you 
standing there while I splash my red paint! 
I beg a thousand pardons ! You see what 
bad manners Art gives a man; and how 
right you are to let it alone. I didn't mean 
you should stand, either. The piazza, as 
you see, is ornamented with rustic chairs; 
though indeed I ought to warn you that 



X] . 291 

they have nails in the wrong places. I was 
just making a note of that sunset. I never 
saw such a blaze of different reds. It looks 
as if the Celestial City were in flames, eh ? 
If that were really the case I suppose it 
would be the business of you theologians to 
put out the fire. Fancy me — an ungodly 
artist — quietly sitting down to paint it ! " 

Mr. Brand had always credited Felix 
Young with a certain impudence, but it 
appeared to him that on this occasion his 
impudence was so great as to make a special 
explanation — or even an apology — necessary. 
And the impression, it must be added, was 
sufficiently natural. Felix had at all times 
a brilliant assurance of manner which was 
simply the vehicle of his good spirits and 
his good will; but at present he had a 
special design, and as he would have 
adnaitted that the design was audacious, so 
he was conscious of having summoned all 
the arts of conversation to his aid. But he 
was so far from desiring to offend his visitor 
that he was rapidly asking himself what 



292 . [ca 

personal compliment he could pay the 
young clergyman that would gratify him 
most. If he could think of it, he was 
prepared to pay it down. " Have you been 
preaching one of your beautiful sermons 
to-day?" he suddenly asked, laying down 
his palette. This was not what Felix had 
been trying to think of, but it was a toler- 
able stop-gap. 

Mr. Brand frowned — as much as a man 
can frown who has very fair, soft eyebrows, 
and, beneath them, very gentle, tranquil 
eyes. "No, I have not preached any 
sermon to-day. Did you bring me over 
here for the purpose of making that 
inquiry ? " 

Felix saw that he was irritated, and he 
regretted it immensely ; but he had no fear 
of not being, in the end, agreeable to Mr. 
Brand. He looked at him, smiling and 
laying his hand on his arm. " No, no, not 
for that — not for that. I wanted to ask you 
something ; I wanted to tell you something. 
I am sure it will interest you very much. 



X.] . 293 

Only— as it is something rather private— we 
had better come into my little studio. I 
have a western window ; we can still see the 
sunset. Andiamor'' And he gave a little 
pat to his companion's arm. 

He led the way in ; Mr. Brand stiffly and 
softly followed. The twilight had thickened 
in the little studio ; but the wall opposite the 
western window was covered with a deep 
pink flush. There were a great many 
sketches and half-finished canvases sus- 
pended in this rosy glow, and the corners 
of the room were vague and dusky. Felix 
begged Mr. Brand to sit down; then 
glancing round him, " By Jove, how pretty 
it looks ! " he cried. But Mr. Brand would 
not sit down; he went and leaned against 
the window ; he wondered what Felix wanted 
of him. In the shadow, on the darker parts 
of the wall, he saw the gleam of three or 
four pictures that looked fantastic and 
surprising. They seemed to represent 
naked figures. Felix stood there, with his 
head a little bent and his eyes fixed upon 



294 . . 

his visitor, smiling intensely, pulling his 
moustache. Mr. Brand felt vaguely uneasy. 
"It is very delicate — ^what I want to say," 
Felix began. "But I have been thinking 
of it for some time." 

"Please to say it as quickly as possible," 
said Mr. Brand. 

" It's because you are a clergyman, you 
know," Felix went on. "I don't think I 
should venture to say it to a common 



man." 



Mr. Brand was silent a moment. "If 
it is a question of yielding to a weakness, of 
resenting an injury, I am afraid I am a very 



common man." 



" My dearest friend," cried Felix, " this is 
not an injury; it's a benefit — a great ser- 
vice ! You will like it extremely. Only it's 
so delicate!" And, in the dim light, he 
continued to smile intensely. " You know I 
take a great interest in my cousins — in 
Charlotte and Gertrude Wentworth. That's 
very evident from my ha\4ng travelled some 
five thousand miles to see them." Mr. 



X.] , 295 

Brand said nothing and Felix proceeded. 
*^ Coming into their society as a perfect 
stranger I received of course a great many 
new impressions, and my impressions had a 
great freshness, a great keenness. Do you 
know what T mean ? " 

"I am not sure that I do; but I should 
like you to continue." 

*^I think my impressions have always a 
good deal of freshness," said Mr. Brand's 
entertainer; "but on this occasion it was 
perhaps particularly natural that — coming in, 
as I say, from outside — I should be struck 
with things that passed unnoticed among 
yourselves. And then I had my sister to 
help me ; and she is simply the most observ- 
ant woman in the world." 

"I am not surprised," said Mr. Brand, 
"that in our litde circle two intelligent 
persons should have found food for observ- 
ation. I am sure that, of late, I have found 
it myself! " 

"Ah, but I shall surprise you yet!" cried 
Felix, laughing. "Both my sister and I 



296 , . 

took a great fancy to my cousin Char- 
lotte." 

^^Your cousin Charlotte?" repeated Mr. 
Brand. 

'^We fell in love with her from the 
first ! " 

"You fell in love with Charlotte?" Mr. 
Brand murmured. 

^'Dame ! " exclaimed Felix, " she's a very 
charmmg person ; and Eugenia was especi- 
ally smitten." Mr. Brand stood staring, and 
he pursued, "Affection, you know, opens 
one's eyes, and we noticed something. 
Charlotte is not happy! Charlotte is in 
love." And Felix, drawing nearer, laid his 
hand again upon his companion's arm. 

There was something akin to an acknow- 
ledgment of fascination in the way Mr. 
Brand looked at him ; but the young 
clergyman retained as yet quite enough 
self-possession to be able to say, with a 
good deal of solemnity, " She is not in love 
with you." 

Felix gave a light laugh, and rejomed 



X.] . 297 

with the alacrity of a maritime adventurer 
who feels a pufF of wind in his sail. " Ah, 
no ; if she were in love with me I should 
know it ! I am not so blind as you." 

"As I?" 

"My dear sir, you are stone blind. Poor 
Charlotte is dead in love with you ! " 

Mr. Brand said nothing for a moment; 
he breathed a little heavily. " Is that what 
you wanted to say to me ? " he asked. 

"I have wanted to say it these three 
weeks. Because of late she has been worse. 
I told you," added Felix, "it was very 
delicate." 

" Well, sir "—Mr. Brand began ; " well. 



sir ". 



« 



I was sure you didn't know it," Felix 
continued. " But don't you see — as soon as 
I mention it — how everything is explained ? " 
Mr. Brand answered nothing; he looked 
for a chair and softly sat down. Felix could 
see that he was blushing; he had looked 
straight at his host hitherto, but now he 
looked away. The foremost effect of what 



298 . , 

he had heard had been a sort of irritation 
of his modesty. "Of course," said Felix, 
^^I suggest nothing; it would be veiy 
presumptuous in me to advise you. But 
I think there is no doubt about the 
fact." 

Mr. Brand looked hard at the floor for 
some moments; he was oppressed with a 
mixture of sensations. Felix, standing there, 
was very sure that one of them was profound 
surprise. The innocent young man had 
been completely unsuspicious of poor 
Charlotte's hidden flame. This gave Felix 
great hope; he was sure that Mr. Brand 
would be flattered. Felix thought him very 
transparent, and indeed he was so ; he could 
neither simulate nor dissimulate. " I scarcely 
know what to make of this," he said at last, 
without looking up; and Felix was struck 
with the fact that he offered no protest or 
contradiction. Evidently Felix had kindled 
a train of memories — a, retrospective illum- 
ination. It was making, to Mr. Brand's 
astonished eyes, a very pretty blaze; his 



x.] . 299 

second emotion had been a gratification of 
vanity. 

"Thank me for telfmg you" Felix 
rejoined. " It's a good thing to know." 

"I am not sure of that," said Mr. 
Bfand. 

*'Ah, don't let her languish!" Felix 
murmured, lightly and sofdy. 

" You do advise me, then ? " And Mr. 
Brand looked up. 

" I congratulate you ! " said Felix, 
smiling. He had thought at first his visitor 
was simply appealing ; but he saw he was a 
little ironical. 

" It is in your interest ; you have 
interfered with me," the young clergyman 
went on. 

Felix still stood and smiled. The little 
room had grown darker, and the crimson 
glow had faded ; but Mr. Brand could see 
the brilliant expression of his face. " I won't 
pretend not to know what you mean," said 
Felix at last. " But I have not really inter- 
fered with you. Of what you had to lose — 



300 . , 

with another person — you have lost nothing. 
And think what you have gained I " 

" It seems to me I am the proper judge, 
on each side," Mr. Brand declared. He got 
up, holding the brim of his hat against his 
mouth and staring at Felix through the dusk. 

" You have lost an illusion ! " said Felix. 

" What do you call an illusion ? " 

"The belief that you really know — that 
you have ever really known — Gertrude 
Wentworth. Depend upon that," pursued 
Felix. " I don't know her yet ; but I have 
no illusions ; I don't pretend to." 

Mr. Brand kept gazing, over his hat, 
"She has always been a lucid, limpid 
nature," he said, solemnly. 

" She has always been a dormant nature. 
She was waiting for a touchstone. But now 
she is beginning to awaken." 

" Don't praise her to me ! " said Mr. 
Brand, with a little quaver in his voice. " If 
you have the advantage of me that is not 
generous." 

" My dear sir, I am melting with gener- 



X.] . 301 

osity!" exclaimed Felix. *^And I am not 
praising my cousin. I am simply attempting 
a scientific definition of her. She doesn't 
care for abstractions. Now 1 think the con- 
trary is what you have always fancied — is the 
basis on which you have been building. She 
is extremely preoccupied with the concrete. 
I care for the concrete, too. But Gertrude 
is stronger than I ; she whirls me along ! " 

Mr. Brand looked for a moment into the 
crown of his hat. " It's a most interesting 
nature." 

" So it is," said Felix. " But it pulls— it 
pulls — ^like a runaway horse. Now I like 
the feeling of a runaway horse ; and if I am 
thrown out of the vehicle it is no great 
matter. But if you should be thrown, Mr. 
Brand" — and Felix paused a moment — 
*^ another person also would suffer from the 
accident." 

" What other person ? " 

" Charlotte Wentworth ! " 

Mr. Brand looked at Felix for a moment 
sidewise, mistrustfully ; then his eyes slowly 



302 . . 

wandered over the ceiling. Felix was sure 
he was secretly struck with the romance of 
the situation. '^ 1 think this is none of our 
business/' the young minister murmured. 

"None of mine, perhaps; but surely 
yours I " 

Mr. Brand lingered still, looking at the 
ceiling; there was evidently something he 
wanted to say. " What do you mean by 
Miss Gertrude being strong?" he asked, 
abruptly. 

" Well," said Felix meditatively, " I mean 
that she has had a great deal of self-posses- 
sion. She was waiting — for years; even 
when she seemed, perhaps, to be living in 
the present. She knew how to wait; she 
had a purpose. That's what I mean by her 
being strong." 

" But what do you mean by her purpose ? ** 

■^ Well — the purpose to see the world ! " 

Mr. Brand eyed his strange informant 

askance again; but he said nothing. At 

last he turned away, as if to take leave. He 

seemed bewildered, however; for instead of 



X.] . 303 

going to the door he moved toward the 
opposite corner of the room. Felix stood 
and watched him for a moment — almost 
groping about in the dusk ; then he led him 
to the door, with a tender, almost fraternal 
movement. " Is that all you have to say ? " 
asked Mr. Brand. 

" Yes, it's all-rr— but it will bear a good deal 
of thinking of." 

Felix went with him to the garden-gate, 
and watched him slowly walk away into the 
thickening twilight with a relaxed rigidity 
that tried to rectify itself. " He is offended, 
excited, bewildered, perplexed — and en 
chanted I " Felix said to himself. " That's a 
capital mixture." 



•» 



304 . . 



CHAPTER XI. 

Since that visit paid by the Baroness 
Miinster to Mrs. Acton, of which some 
account was given at an earlier stage of this 
narrative, the intercourse between these two 
ladies had been neither frequent nor intimate. 
It was not that Mrs. Acton had failed to 
appreciate Madame Miinster's charms; on 
the contrary, her perception of the graces of 
manner and conversation of her brilliant 
visitor had been only too acute. Mrs. Acton 
was, as they said in Boston, very " intense,'* 
and her impressions were apt to be too many 
for her. The state of her health required 
the restriction of emotion ; and this is why, 
receiving, as she sat in her eternal arm-chair, 
very few visitors, even of the soberest local 
type, she had been obliged to limit the 
number of her interviews with a lady whose 



XL] . 305 

costume and manner recalled to her imagin- 
ation — Mrs. Acton's imagination was a mar- 
vel — all that she had ever read of the most 
stirring historical periods. But she had sent 
the Baroness a great many quaintly-worded 
messages and a great many nosegays from 
her garden and baskets of beautiful fruit. 
Felix had eaten the fruit, and the Baroness 
had arranged the flowers and retui^ned the 
baskets and the messages. On the day that 
followed that rainy Sunday of which mention 
has been made, Eugenia determined to go 
and pay the beneficent invalid a ''visite 
d'adieux;'' so it was that, to herself, she 
qualified her enterprise. It may be noted 
that neither on the Sunday evening nor on 
the Monday morning had she received that 
expected visit from Robert Acton. To his 
own consciousness, evidently, he was " keeping 
away ; " and as the Baroness, on her side, was 
keeping away from her uncle's, whither, for 
several days, Felix had been the unembar- 
rassed bearer of apologies and regrets for 
absence, chance had not taken the cards from 



3o6 . . 

the hands of design. Mr. Wentworth and his 
daughters had respected Eugenia's seclusion ; 
certain intervals of mysterious retirement 
appeared to them, vaguely, a natural part 
of the graceful, rhythmic movement of 
so remarkable a life. Gertrude especiaDy 
held these periods in honour ; she wondered 
what Madame Miinster did at such times, 
but she would not have permitted herself to 
inquire too curiously. 

The long rain had freshened the air, and 
twelve hours' brilliant sunshine had dried the 
roads; so that the Baroness, in the late 
afternoon, proposing to walk to Mrs. Acton s, 
exposed herself to no great discomfort. As 
with her charming undulating step she moved 
along the clean, grassy margin of the road, 
beneath the thickly hanging boughs of the 
orchards, through the quiet of the hour and 
place and the rich maturity of the summer, 
she was even conscious of a sort of luxurious 
melancholy. The Baroness had the amiable 
weakness of attaching herself to places — even 
when she had begun with a little aversion; 



XL] . 307 

and now, with the prospect of departure, she 
felt tenderly toward this well-wooded corner 
of the Western world, where the sunsets were 
so beautiful and one's ambitions were so pure. 
Mrs. Acton was able to receive her ; but on 
entering this lady's large, freshly-scented 
room the Baroness saw that she was looking 
very ill. She was wonderfully white and 
transparent, and, in her flowered arm-chair, 
she made no attempt to move. But she 
flushed a little — like a young girl, the 
Baroness thought — and she rested her clear, 
smiling eyes upon those of her visitor. Her 
vroice was low and monotonous, like a 
roice that had never expressed any human 
passions. ' 

" I have come to bid you good-bye," said 
Eugenia. " I shall soon be going away." 

'^ When are you going away ? " 

" Very soon — any day." 

"I am very sorry," said Mrs. Acton. 
^ I hoped you would stay — always." 

'^ Always ? " Eugenia demanded. 

"Well, I mean a long time," said Mrs. 



z 2 



3oS . [or. 

Acton, in her sweet, feeble tone. '^They 
tell me you are so comfortable — that you 
have got such a beautiful little house." 

Eugenia stared — that is, she smiled; she 
thought of her poor little chalet and she 
wondered whether her hostess were jesting. 
"Yes, my house is exquisite," she said; 
" though not to be compared to yours." 

" And my son is so fond of going to see 
you," Mrs. Acton added. "I am afraid 
my son will miss you." 

"Ah, dear madam," said Eugenia, with 
a little laugh, " I can't stay in America for 
your son ! " 

" Don't you like America ? " 

The Baroness looked at the front of her 
dress* "If I liked it — that would not be 
staying for your son ! " 

Mrs. Acton gazed at her with her grave 
tender eyes, as if she had not quite under- 
stood. The Baroness at last found some 
thing irritating in the sweet, soft stare of her 
hostess ; and if one were not bound to be 
merciful to great invalids she would almost 



X . 309 

have taken the liberty of pronouncing her, 
mentally, a fool, "I am afraid, then, I 
shall never see you again," said Mrs. Acton. 
" You know I am dying." 

" Ah, dear madam," murmured Eugenia. 

"I want to leave my children cheerful 
and happy. My daughter will probably 
marry her cousin." 

^^Two such interesting young people," 
said the Baroness vaguely. She was not 
thinking of Clifford Wentworth. 

" I feel so tranquil about my end," Mrs. 
Acton went on. "It is coming so easily, 
so surely." And she paused, with her mild 
gaze always on Eugenia's. 

The Baroness hated to be reminded of 
death; but even in its imminence, so far 
as Mrs. Acton was concerned, she preserved 
her good manners. "Ah, madam, you are 
too charming an invalid," she rejoined. 

But the delicacy of this rejoinder was 
apparently lost upon her hostess, who went 
on in her low, reasonable voice, " I want 
to leave my children bright and comfortable. 



3IO . . 

You seem to me all so happy here— just 
as you are. So I wish you could stay. 
It would be so pleasant for Robert" 

Eugenia wondered what she meant by 
its being pleasant for Robert ; but she felt 
that she would never know what such a 
woman as that meant. She got up; she 
was afraid Mrs. Acton would tell her again 
that she was dying. "Good-bye, dear 
madam," she said. "I must remember 
that your strength is precious." 

Mrs. Acton took her hand and held it 
a moment "Well, you have been happy 
here, haven't you? And you like us all, 
don't you? I wi^h you would stay," she 
added, " in your beautiful little house," 

She had told Eugenia that her waiting- 
woman would be in the hall, to show her 
down-stairs; but the large landing outside 
her door was empty, and Eugenia stood 
there looking about. She felt irritated ; the 
dying lady had not "/a main heureuse!^ 
She passed slowly down-stairs, still looking 
about. The broad staircase made a great 



xi.T . 311 

bend, and in the angle was a high window, 
looking westward, with b, deep bench, 
covered with a row of flowering plants in 
curious old pots of blue China-ware. The 
yellow afternoon Ught came in through the 
flowers and flickered a little on the white 
wainscots. Eugenia paused a moment ; the 
house was perfectly still, save for the ticking, 
somewhere, of a great clock. The lower 
hall stretched away at the foot of the stairs, 
half covered over with a large Oriental rug. 
Eugenia lingered a little, noticing a great 
many things. "Comme c'est bien!" she 
said to herself; such a large, solid, irre- 
proachable basis of existence the place 
seemed to her to indicate. And then she 
reflected that Mrs. Acton was soon to with- 
draw from it The reflection accompanied 
her the rest of the way down-stairs, where 
she paused again, making more observa- 
tions. The hall was extremely broad, and 
on either side of the front door was a wide, 
deeply-set window, which threw the shadows 
of everything back into the house. There 



312 . . 

were high-backed chairs along the wall and 
big Eastern vases upon tables, and, on either 
side, a large cabinet with a glass front and 
little curiosities within, dimly gleaming. 
The doors were open — into the darkened 
parlour, the library, the dining-room. All 
these rooms seemed empty. Eugenia 
passed along, and stopped a moment on the 
threshold of each. "Comme c'est bien!** 
she murmured again; she had thought of 
just such a house as this when she decided 
to come to America. She opened the front 
door for herself— her light tread had sum- 
moned none of the servants — and on the 
threshold she gave a last look. Outside, 
she was still in the humour for curious 
contemplation ; so instead of going directly 
down the little drive, to the gate, she 
wandered away toward the garden, which 
lay to the right of the house. She had not 
gone many yards over the grass before she 
paused quickly; she perceived a gentleman 
stretched upon the level verdure, beneath a 
tree. He had not heard her coming, and 



X . 313 

he lay motionless, flat on his back, with his 
hands clasped under his head, staring up at 
the sky; so that the Baroness was able to 
reflect, at her leisure, upon the question of 
his identity. It was that of a person who 
had lately been much in her thoughts ; but 
her first impulse, nevertheless, was to turn 
away; the last thing she desired was to have 
the air of coming in quest of Robert Acton. 
The gentleman on the grass, however, gave 
her no time to decide; he could not long 
remain imconscious of so agreeable a pre- 
sence. He rolled back his eyes, stared, 
gave an exclamation, and then jumped up. 
He stood an instant, looking at her. 

" Excuse my ridiculous position," he said. 

" I have just now no sense of the ridicul- 
ous. But, in case you have, don't imagine 
I came to see you." 

"Take care," rejoined Acton, "how you 
put it into my head! I was thinking of 
you. 

" The occupation of extreme leisure ! " 
said the Baroness. " To think of a woman 



314 . [cH. 

when you are in that position is no compli- 
ment." 

"I didn't say I was thinking well!" 
Acton affirmed, smiling. 

She looked at him, and then she turned 
away. "Though I didn't come to sec 
you," she said, " remember at least that I 
am within your gates." 

" I am delighted — I am honoured ! 
Won't you come into the house ? " 

" I have just come out of it. I have been 
calling upon your mother. I have been 
bidding her farewell." 

" Farewell ? " Acton demanded. 

" I am going away," said the Baroness. 
And she turned away again, as if to illustrate 
her meaning. 

"When are you going?" asked Acton, 
standing a moment in his place. But the 
Baroness made no answer, and he followed 
her. 

" I came this way to look at your garden," 
she said, walking back to the gate, over the 
grass. " But I must go." 



X . 315 

" Let me at least go with you." He went 
with her, and they said nothing till they 
reached the gate. . It was open, and they 
looked down the road, which was darkened 
over with long bosky shadows. " Must you 
go straight home ? " Acton asked. 

But she made no answer. She said, after 
a moment, " Why have you not been to see 
me ? ** He said nothing, and then she went 
on, "Why don't you answer me ? " 

^* I am trying to invent an answer," Acton 
confessed. 

" Have you none ready ? " 

"None that I can tell you," he said. 
^But let me walk with you riow.'^ 

" You may do as you like." 

She moved slowly along the road, and 
Acton went with her. Presently he said, 
**If I had done as I liked I would have 
come to see you several times." 

" Is that invented ? '' asked Eugenia. 

"No, that is natural. I stayed away 
because" — 

" Ah, here comes the reason, then ! " 



3i6 . . 

" Because I wanted to think about you." 

" Because you wanted to lie down ! " said 
the Baroness. " I have seen you lie down- 
almost— in my drawing-room." 

Acton stopped in the road, with a move- 
nient which seemed to beg her to Knger a 
little. She paused, and he looked at her 
awhile; he thought her very charming. 
" You are jesting," he said ; " but if you are 
really going away it is very serious," 

"If I stay," and she gave a little laugh, 
" it is more serious still ! " 

" When shall you go ? " 

"As soon as possible." 

" And why ? " 

" Why should I stay ? " 

" Because we all admire you so." 

"That is not a reason. I am admired 
also in Europe." And she began to walk 
homeward again. 

" What could I say to keep you ? " asked 
Acton. He wanted to keep her, and it was 
a fact that he had been thinking of her for 
a week. He was in love with her now ; he 



XL] . 317 

was conscious oF that, or he thought he 
was; and the only question with him was 
whether he could trust her. 

"What you can say to keep me?" she 
repeated. " As I want very much to go it 
is not in my interest to tell you. Besides, I 
can't imagine." 

He went on with her in silence ; he was 
much more affected by what she had told 
him than appeared. Ever since that evening 
of his return from Newport her image had 
had a terrible power to trouble him. What 
Clifford Wentworth had told him — that had 
affected him, too, in an adverse sense; but 
it had not liberated him from the discomfort 
of a charm of which his intelligence was 
impatient. " She is not honest, she is not 
honest," he kept murmuring to himself. 
That is what he had been saying to the 
summer sky, ten minutes before. Unfor- 
tunately, he was unable to say it finally, 
definitively; and now that he was near her 
it seemed to matter wonderfully little. " She 
is a woman who will lie," he had said to 



3i8 . . 

himself. Now, as he went along, he re- 
minded himself of this observation ; but it 
failed to frighten him as it had done before. 
He almost wished he could make her lie and 
then con\ict her of it, so that he might see 
how he should like that. He kept thinking 
of this as he walked by her side, while she 
moved forward with her light, graceful 
dignity. He had sat with her before; he 
had driven with her; but he had never 
walked with her. 

" By Jove, how comme il faut she is ! '' he 
said, as he observed her sidewise. When 
they reached the cottage in the orchard she 
passed into the gate without asking him to 
follow ; but she turned round, as he stood 
there, to bid him good-night. 

" I asked you a question the other night 
which you never answered," he said. " Have 
you sent off that document — liberating 
yourself ? ^' 

She hesitated for a single moment, — very 
naturally. Then, " Yes," she said, simply. 

He turned away ; he wondered whether 



XL] . , 319 

that- would do for his lie. But he saw her 
again that evening, for the Baroness re- 
appeared at her uncle's. He had little talk 
with her, however; two gentlemen had 
driven out from Boston, in a buggy, to call 
upon Mr. Wentworth and his daughters, 
and Madame Miinster was an object of 
absorbing interest to both of the visitors. 
One of them, indeed, said nothing to her ; 
he only sat and watched with intense gravity, 
and leaned forward solemnly, presenting his 
ear (a very large one), as if he were deaf, 
whenever she dropped an observation. He 
had evidently been impressed with the idea 
of her misfortunes and reverses ; he never 
smiled. His companion adopted a lighter, 
easier style; sat as near as possible to 
Madame Miinster; attempted to draw her 
out, and proposed every few moments a new 
topic of conversation. Eugenia was less 
vividly responsive than usual and had less 
to say than, from her brilliant reputation, 
her interlocutor expected, upon the relative 
merits of European and American institu- 



320 . . 

tions; but she was inaccessible to Robert 
Acton, who roamed about the piazza with 
his hands in his pockets, Hstening for the 
grating sound of the buggy from Boston, 
as it should be brought round to the side- 
door. But he listened in vain, and at last 
he lost patience. His sister came to him 
and begged him to take her home, and he 
presently went off with her. Eugenia 
observed him leaving the house with 
Lizzie; in her present mood the fact 
seemed a contribution to her irritated 
conviction that he had several precious 
qualities. "Even that mal-elevee little girl," 
she reflected, "makes him do what she 
wishes." 

She had been sitting just within one of the 
long windows that opened upon the piazza; 
but very soon after Acton had gone away 
she got up abruptly, just when the talkative 
gentleman from Boston was asking her what 
she thought of the "moral tone*' of that 
city. On the piazza she encountered Clif- 
ford Wentworth, coming round from the 



XL] . 321 

Other side of the house. She stopped 
him ; she told him she wished to speak to 
him. 

^^Why didn't you go home with your 
cousin ? " she asked. 

Clifford stared. "Why, Robert has 
taken her," he said. 

"Exactly so. But you don't usually 
leave that to him." 

" Oh," said Clifford, " I want to see those 
fellows start off. They don't know how to 
drive." 

" It is not, then, that you have quarrelled 
with your cousin?" 

Clifford reflected a moment, and then 
with a simplicity which had, for the Ba- 
roness, a singularly baffling quality, "Oh, 
no ; we have made up ! " he said. 

She looked at him for some moments ; 
but Clifford had begun to be afraid of the 
Baroness's looks, and he endeavoured, now, 
to shift himself out of their range* "Why 
do you never come to see me any more ? " 
>he asked. " Have I displeased you ? " 



322 . . 

"Displeased me? Well, I guess not!" 
said Clifford, with a laugh. 

" Why haven't you come, then ? " 

"Well, because I am afraid of getting 
shut up in that back room." 

Eugenia kept looking at him. " I should 
think you would like that." 

" Like it ! " cried Clifford. 

" I should, if I were a young man calling 
upon a charming woman." 

"A charming woman isn't much use 
to me when I am shut up in that back 



room I 



" I am afraid I am not of much use to you 
anjrwhere ! " said Madame Miinster. " And 
yet you know how 1 have offered to be." 

"Well," observed Clifford, by way of 
response, "there comes the buggy." 

" Never mind the buggy. Do you know 
I am going away ? " 

" Do you mean now ? " 

" I mean in a few days. I leave this 
place." 

" You are going back to Europe : " 



X . 323 

" To Europe, where you are to come and 
see me." 

^^Oh, yes, I'll come out there," said 
CUfFord. 

"But before that," Eugenia declared, 
" you must come and see me here." 

"Well, I shall keep clear of that back 
room ! " rejoined her simple young kinsman. 

The Baroness was silent a moment. 
"Yes, you must come frankly — boldly. 
That will be very much better. I see that 



now." 



" I see it ! " said Clifford. And then, in 
an instant, "What's the matter with that 
buggy ? " His practised ear had apparently 
detected an unnatural creak in the wheels of 
the light vehicle which had been brought 
to the portico, and he hurried away to 
investigate so grave an anomaly. 

The Baroness walked homeward, alone, in 

the starlight, asking herself a question. Was 

she to have gained nothing — ^was she to 

have gained nothing ? 

Gertrude Wentworth had held a silent 

y 2 



324 . . 

place in the little circle gathered about the 
two gentlemen from Boston. She was not 
interested in the visitors ; she was watching 
Madame Munster, as she constantly watched 
her. She knew that Eugenia also was not 
interested — that she was bored; and 
Gertrude was absorbed in study of the 
problem how, in spite of her indifference 
and her absent attention, she managed to 
have such a charming manner. That was 
the manner Gertrude would have liked to 
have ; she determined to cultivate it, and 
she wished that — to give her the charm — she 
might in future very often be bored. While 
she was engaged in these researches, Felix 
Young was looking for Charlotte, to whom 
he had something to say. For some time, 
now, he had had something to say to 
Charlotte, and this evening his sense of the 
propriety of holding some special conversa- 
tion with her had reached the motive-point 
—resolved itself into acute and delightful 
desire. He wandered through the empty 
rooms on the large ground-floor of the 



XL] . 325 

house, and found her at last in a small 
apartment denominated, for reasons not 
immediately apparent, Mr. Wentwbrth's 
^^ office : " an extremely neat and well-dusted 
room, with an array of law-books, in time- 
darkened sheep-skin, on one of the walls ; a 
large map of the United States on the other, 
flanked on either side by an old steel 
engraving of one of Raphael's Madonnas ; 
and on the third severa glass cases contain- 
ing specimens of butterflies and beetles. 
Charlotte was sitting by a lamp, embroider- 
ing a slipper. Felix did not ask for whom 
the slipper was destined ; he saw it was very 
large. 

He moved a chair toward her and sat 
down, smiling as usual, but, at first, not 
speaking. She watched him, with her 
needle poised, and with a certain shy, 
fluttered look which she always wore when 
he approached her. There was something 
in Felix's manner that quickened her 
modesty, her self-consciousness ; if absolute 
choice had been given her she would have 



326 . . 

preferred never to find herself alone with 
him ; and, in fact, though she thought him 
a most brilliant, distinguished, and well- 
meaning person, she had exercised a much 
larger amount of tremulous tact than he had 
ever suspected, to circumvent the accident of 
t^te-a-tke. Poor Charlotte could have given 
no account of the matter that would not 
have seemed unjust both to herself and to 
her foreign kinsman ; she could only have 
said — or rather, she would never have said it 
— that she did not like so much gentleman's 
society at once. She was not reassured, 
accordingly, when Jie began, emphasizing 
his words with a kind of admiring radiance, 
" My dear cousin, I am enchanted at finding 
you alone." 

"I am very often alone," Charlotte 
observed. Then she quickly added, "I 
don't mean I am lonely ! " 

" So clever a woman as you is never 
lonely," said Felix. "You have company 
in your beautiful work." And he glanced 
at the big slipper. 



X . 3V 

^^1 like to work," declared Charlotte, 
simply. 

" So do I ! " said her companion. " And 
I like to idle, too. But it is not to idle 
that I have come in search of you. I want 
to tell you something very particular." 

^^ Well," murmured Charlotte ; " of 
course, if you must " — 

"My dear cousin," said Felix, "it's 
nothing that a young lady may not listen to. 
At least I suppose it isn't. But voyons ; you 
shall judge. I am terribly in love." 

"Well, FeHx," began Miss Wentworth, 
gravely. But her very gravity appeared to 
check the development of her phrase. 

' " I am in love with your sister ; but in 
love, Charlotte — in love ! " the young man 
pursued. Charlotte had laid her work in her 
lap ; her hands were tightly folded on top of 
it ; she was staring at the carpet. " In short, 
I'm in love, dear lady," said Felix. " Now I 
want you to help me." 

" To help you ? " asked Charlotte, with a 
tremor. 



328 ^ . . 

" I don't mean with Gertrude ; she and I 
have a perfect understanding ; and oh, how 
well she understands one ! I mean with 
your father and with the world in general, 
including Mr. Brand." 

"Poor Mr. Brand!" said Charlotte, 
slowly, but with a simplicity which made 
it evident to Fehx that the young minister 
had not repeated to Miss Wentworth the 
talk that had lately occurred between them. 

"Ah, now, don't say *poor' Mr. Brand! 
I don't pity Mr. Brand at all But I pity 
your father a little, and I don't want to 
displease him. Therefore, you see, I want 
you to plead for me. You don't think me 
very shabby, eh ? " 

" Shabby ? " exclaimed Charlotte softly, 
for whom Felix lepresented the most polished 
and iridescent qualities of mankind. 

" I don't mean in my appearance," rejoined 
Felix, laughing ; for Charlotte was looking 
at his boots. "I mean in my conduct. 
You don't think it's an abuse of hos- 
pitality ? " 



X . 329 

" To — to care for Gertrude ? " asked 
Charlotte. 

"To have really expressed one's self. 
Because I have expressed myself, Charlotte ; 
I must tell you the whole truth — I have ! 
Of course I want to marry her — and here 
is the difficulty. I held off as long as I 
could ; but she is such a terribly fascinating 
person ! She's a strange creature, Charlotte ; 
I don't believe you really know her." 
Charlotte took up her tapestry again, and 
again she laid it down. ^^ I know your 
father has had higher views," Felix con- 
tinued ; " and I think you have shared 
them. You have wanted to marry her to 
Mr. Brand." 

"Oh, no," said Charlotte, very earnestly. 
" Mr. Brand has always admired her. But 
we did not want anything of that kind." 

Felix stared. " Surely, marriage was what 
you proposed ? " 

"Yes; but we didn't wish to force 
her." 

" A la bonne heure ! That's ver}^ unsafe. 



330 . . 

you know. With these arranged marriages 
there is often the deuce to pay." 

"Oh, Felix," said Charlotte, "we didn't 
want to ^arrange.' ^' 

" I am delighted to hear that. Because 
in such cases — even when the woman is a 
thoroughly good creature — she can't help 
looking for a compensation. A charming 
fellow comes along — and voila ! " Charlotte 
sat mutely staring at the floor, and Felix 
presently added, "Do go on with your 
slipper. I like to see you work." 

Charlotte took up her variegated canvas, 
and began to draw vague blue stitches in 
a big round rose. ." If Gertrude is so — so 
strange," she said, "why do you want to 
marry her ? " 

"Ah, that's it, dear Charlotte! I like 
strange women ; I always have liked 
them. Ask Eugenia! And Gertrude is 
wonderful; she says the most beautiful 
things ! " 

Charlotte looked at him, almost for the 
first time, as if her meaning required to be 



X . 331 

severely pointed. " You have a great in- 
fluence over her." 

" Yes— and no ! " said Felix. " I had at 
first, I think ; but now it is six of one and 
half-a-dozen of the other ; it is reciprocal. 
She affects me strongly — ^for she is so strong. 
I don't believe you know her ; it's a beauti- 
ful nature." 

^^ Oh, yes, Felix ; I have always thought 
Gertrude's nature beautiful." 

"Well, if you think so now," cried the 
young man, " wait and see ! She's a folded 
flower. Let me pluck her from the parent 
tree and you will see her expand. I'm sure 
you will enjoy it." 

"I don't understand you," murmured 
Charlotte. '' I cant, Felix." 

"Well, you can understand this — that 
I beg you to say a good word for me to 
your father. He regards me, I naturally 
believe, as a very light fellow, a Bohemian, 
an irregular character. Tell him I am not 
all this; if I ever was, I have forgotten it. 
I am fond of pleasure — ^yes ; but of innocent 



332 . . 

pleasure. Pain is all one; but in pleasure, 
you know, there are tremendous distinctions. 
Say to him that Gertrude is a folded flower 
and that I am a serious man ! " 

Charlotte got up from her chair, slowly 
rolling up her work, "We know you are 
very kind to every one, Felix,'' she said. 
"But we are extremely sorry for Mr. 
Brand." 

"Of course you are — you especially! 
Because," added Felix hastily, "you are a 
woman. But I don't pity him. It ought 
to be enough for any man that you take an 
interest in him." 

" It is not enough for Mr. Brand," said 
Charlotte simply. And she stood there a 
moment, as if waiting conscientiously for 
anything more that Felix might have to 
say. 

" Mr. Brand is not so keen about his 
marriage as he was," he presently said. 
" He is afraid of your sister. He begins to 
think she is wicked." 

Charlotte looked at him now with 



XL] . 333 

beautiful appealing eyes — eyes into which he 
saw the tears rising, "Oh, FeUx, Felix/' 
she cried, "what have you done to 
her ? " 

" I think she was asleep ; I have waked 
her up : " 

But Charlotte, apparently, was really 
crying ; she walked straight out of the 
room. And Felix, standing there and 
meditating, had the apparent brutality to 
take satisfaction in her tears. 

Late that night Gertrude, silent and 
serious, came to him in the garden ; it was 
a kind of appointment. Gertrude seemed to 
like appointments. She plucked a handful 
of heliotrope and stuck it into the front of 
her dress, but she said nothing. They 
walked together along one of the paths, and 
Felix looked at the great, square, hospitable 
house, massing itself vaguely in the starlight, 
with all its windows darkened. 

" I have a little of a bad conscience," 
he said. " I oughtn't to meet you this 
way till I have got your father's consent." 



334 . . 

Gertrude looked at him for some time. 
" I don't understand you." 

"You very often say that," he said. 
" Considering how little we understand each 
other, it is a wonder how well we get on ! " 

" We have done nothing but meet since 
you came here — but meet alone. The first 
time I ever saw you we were alone," 
Gertrude went on. " What is the difference 
now ? Is it because it is at night ? " 

"The difference, Gertrude," said Felix, 
stopping in the path, " the difference is that, 
I love you more — more than before I" 
And then they stood there, talking, in the 
warm stillness and in front of the closed 
dark house. "I have been talking to 
Charlotte — been trying to bespeak her 
interest with your father. She has a kind of 
sublime perversity; was ever a woman so 
bent upon cutting off her own head ? " 

" You are too careful," said Gertrude : 
" you are too diplomatic." 

" Well," cried the young man, " I didn't 
come here to make any one unhappy ! " 



X . 335 

Gertrade looked round her awhile in the 
odorous darkness. ^' I will do anything you 
please/' she said. 

" For instance ? '' asked Felix, smiling 

" I will go away. I will do anything you 
please." 

Felix looked at her in solemn admiration. 
" Yes, we will go away," he said. " But we 
will make peace first." 

Gertrude looked about her again, and 
then she broke out, passionately, " Why do 
they try to make one feel guilty ? Why do 
they make it so difficult ? Why can't they 
understand ? " 

" I will make them understand ! " said 
Felix. He drew her hand into his arm, and 
they wandered about in the garden, talking, 
for an hour. 



336 . . 



CHAPTER XII. 

Felix allowed Charlotte time to plead liis 
cause ; and then, on the third day, he 
sought an interview with his uncle. It was 
in the morning ; Mr, Wentworth was in liis 
office; and, on going in, Felix found that 
Charlotte was at that moment in conference 
with her father. She had, in fact, been 
constantly near him since her interview with 
Felix; she had made up her mind that it 
was her duty to repeat very Uterally her 
cousin's passionate plea. She had accord- 
ingly followed Mr. Wentworth about like a 
shadow, in order to find him at hand when 
she should have mustered sufficient com- 
posure to speak. For poor Charlotte, in 
this matter, naturally lacked composure; 
especially when she meditated upon some of 
Felix's intimations. It was not cheerful work, 



xiL] . 337 

at the best, to keep giving small hammer-taps 
to the coffin in which one had laid away, for 
burial, the poor little unacknowledged off- 
spring of one's own misbehaving heart ; and 
the occupation was not rendered more agree- 
able by the fact that the ghost of one's stifled 
dream had been summoned from the shades 
by the strange, bold words of a talkative 
young foreigner. What had Felix meant 
by saying that Mr. Brand was not so keen ? 
To herself her sister's justly depressed suitor 
had shown no sign of faltering. Charlotte 
trembled all over when she allowed herself to 
believe for an instant now and then that, 
privately, Mr. Brand might have faltered ; 
and as it seemed to give more force to 
Felix's words to repeat them to her father, 
she was waiting until she should have taught 
herself to be very calm. But she had now 
begun to tell Mr. Wentworth that she was 
extremely anxious. She was proceeding 
to develop this idea, to enumerate the 
objects of her anxiety, when Felix came 
in. 



338 . . 

Mr. Wentwoith sat there, with his legs 
crossed, lifting his dry, pure countenance 
fi-om the Boston Advertiser. Felix en- 
tered smiling, as if he had something par- 
ticular to say, and his uncle looked at him 
as if he both expected and deprecated this 
event. Felix vividly expressing himself had 
come to be a formidable figure to his uncle, 
who had not yet arrived at definite views as 
to a proper tone. For the first time in his 
life, as I have said, Mr. Wentworth shirked 
a responsibility ; he earnestly desired that it 
might not be laid upon him to determine 
how his nephew's lighter propositions should 
be treated. He lived under an apprehension 
that Felix might yet beguile him into assent 
to doubtful inductions, and his conscience 
instructed him that the best form of vigil- 
ance was the avoidance of discussion. He 
hoped that the pleasant episode of his 
nephew's visit would pass away without 
a further lapse of consistency. 

Felix looked at Charlotte with an 
air of understanding, and then at Mr. 



XII.1 . 339 

Wentworth, andthen at Charlotte again. Mr. 
Wentworth bent his refined eyebrows upon 
his nephew and stroked down the first page 
of the Advertiser. "I ought to have 
brought a bouquet," said Felix, laughing. 
" In France they always do.'^ 

"We are not in France," observed Mr. 
Wentworth, gravely, while Charlotte earn- 
estly gazed at him. 

" No, luckily, we are not in France, where 
I am afraid I should have a harder time of 
it. My dear Charlotte, have you rendered 
me that delightful service ? " And Felix 
bent toward her as if some one had been 
presenting him. 

Charlotte looked at him with almost 
frightened eyes ; and Mr. Wentworth 
thought this might be the beginning of a 
discussion. " What is the bouquet for r " 
he inquired, by way of turning it off. 

Felix gazed at him, smiling. "Pour la 

demande ! " And then, drawing up a chair, 

he seated himself, hat in hand, with a kind of 

conscious solemnity. 

z 2 



340 , . 

Presently he turned to Charlotte again. 
"My good Charlotte, my admirable Char- 
lotte," he murmured, " you have not played 
me false — you have not sided against 
me." 

Charlotte got up, trembling extremely, 
though imperceptibly. " You must speak to 
my father yourself," she said. " I think you 
are clever enough." 

But Felix, rising too, begged her to remain. 
" I can speak better to an audience ! " he 
declared. 

"I hope it is nothing disagreeable," said 
Mr. Wentworth. 

" It's something delightful, for me ! " And 
Felix, laying down his hat, clasped his hands 
a little between his knees. " My dear uncle," 
he said, " I desire, very earnestly, to marry 
your daughter Gertrude." Charlotte sank 
slowly into her chair again, and Mr. Went- 
worth sat staring, with a light in his face that 
might have been flashed back from an ice- 
berg. He stared and stared ; he said nothing. 
Felix fell back, with his hands still clasped. 



XI . 34i 

" Ah — you don't like it. I was afraid ! " He 
blushed deeply, and Charlotte noticed it — 
remarking to herself that it was the first time 
she had ever seen him blush. She began to 
blush herself and to reflect that he might be 
much in love. 

"This is very abrupt," said Mr. Went- 
worth at last. 

"Have you never suspected it, dear 
uncle ? " Felix inquired. " Well, that proves 
how discreet I have been. Yes, I thought 
you wouldn't like it." 

"It is very serious, Felix," said Mr. 
Wentworth. 

" You think it^s an abuse of hospitality ! " 
exclaimed Felix, smiling again. 

" Of hospitality ? — an abuse ? " his uncle 
repeated very slowly. 

"That is what Felix said to me," said 
Charlotte conscientiously. 

"Of course you think so; don't defend 
yourself!" Felix pursued. "It is an abuse, 
obviously; the most I can claim is that it 
is perhaps a pardonable one. I simply fell 



342 . . 

head over heels in love ; one can hardly help 
that. Though you are Gertrude's pro- 
genitor I don't beUeve you know how 
attractive she is. Dear uncle, she contains 
the elements of a singularly — I may say a 
strangely — charming woman ! " 

" She has always been to me an object of 
extreme concern/' said Mr. Wentworth. 
" We have always desired her happiness." 

"Well, here it is!" FeUx declared. "I 
will make her happy. She believes it, too. 
Now, hadn't you noticed that ? " 

"I had noticed that she was much 
changed," Mr. Wentworth declared, in a 
tone whose unexpressive, unimpassioned 
quality appeared to Felix to reveal a pro- 
fundity of opposition. " It may be that she 
is only becoming what you call a charming 
woman." 

" Gertrude, at heart, is so earnest, so true,*' 
said Charlotte very softly, fastening her eyes 
upon her father. 

" I delight to hear you praise her ! " cried 
FeUx. 



XI . 343 

"She has a very peculiar temperament/' 
said Mr. Wentworth. 

" Eh, even that is praise ! '' Felix rejoined. 
" I know I am not the man you might have 
looked for. I have no position and no 
fortune ; I can give Gertrude no place in the 
world. A place in the world — that's what 
she ought to have; that would bring her 
out" 

*^ A place to do her duty ! " remarked 
Mr. Wentworth. 

" Ah, how charmingly she does it — her 
duty ! " Felix exclaimed, with a radiant face. 
"What an exquisite conception she has of 
it! But she comes honestly by that, dear 
uncle." Mr. Wentworth and Charlotte 
both looked at him as if they were watching 
a greyhound doubling. "Of course with 
me she will hide her light under a bushel," 
he continued; "I being the bushel! Now 
I know you like me — you have certainly 
proved it. But you think I am frivolous 
and penniless and shabby ! Granted — 
granted — a thousand times granted. I have 



344 . . 

been a loose fish — a fiddler, a painter, an 
actor. But there is this to be said : In the 
first place, I fancy you exaggerate ; you lend 
me qualities I haven't had. I have been a 
Bohemian — yes; but in Bohemia I always 
passed for a gentleman. I wish you could 
see some of my old camarades — they would 
tell you ! It was the liberty I liked, but not 
the opportunities ! My sins were all pecca- 
dilloes; I always respected my neighbour's 
property — my neighbour's wife. Do you 
see, dear uncle?'' Mr. Wentworth ought 
to have seen; his cold blue eyes were 
intently fixed. "And then, c^estjini! It's 
all over. Je me range. I have settled 
down to a jog-trot. I find I can earn my 
living — a very fair one — by going about the 
world and painting bad portraits. It's not a 
glorious profession, but it is a perfectly 
respectable one. You won't deny that, eh? 
Going about the world, I say? I must not 
deny that, for that I am afraid I shall always 
do — in quest of agreeable sitters. When I 
say agreeable, I mean susceptible of delicate 



XI . 345 

flattery and prompt of payment. Gertrude 
declares she is willing to share my wander- 
ings and help to pose my models. She 
even thinks it will be charming; and that 
brings me to my third point Gertrude 
likes me. Encourage her a little and she 
will tell you so.^' 

Felix's tongue obviously moved much 
faster than the imagination of his auditors ; 
his eloquence, like the rocking of a boat in 
a deep, smooth lake, made long eddies of 
silence. And he seemed to be pleading and 
chattering still, with his brightly eager smile, 
his uplifted eyebrows, his expressive mouth, 
after he had ceased speaking, and while, with 
his glance quickly turning from the father 
to the daughter, he sat waiting for the effect 
of his appeal. " It is not your want of 
means," said Mr. Wentworth, after a period 
of severe reticence. 

" Now it's delightful of you to say 
that! Only don't say its my want of 
character. Because I have a character — 
I assure you I have ; a small one, a 



346 . . 

little slip of a thing, but still something 
tangible/^ 

"Ought you not to tell Felix that it is 
Mr. Brand, father ? " Charlotte asked, with 
infinite mildness. 

" It is not only Mr. Brand," Mr. Went- 
worth solemnly declared. And he looked at 
his knee for a long time. " It is difficult to 
explain," he said. He wished, evidently, to 
be very just. " It rests on moral grounds, 
as Mr. Brand says. It is the question 
whether it is the best thing for Gertrude." 

'^What is better — what is better, dear 
uncle ? " Felix rejoined urgently, rising in his 
urgency and standing before Mr. Went- 
worth. His uncle had been looking at his 
knee ; but when Felix moved he transferred 
his gaze to the handle of the door which 
faced him. " It is usually a fairly good 
thing for a girl to marry the man she 
loves ! " cried Felix. 

While he spoke, Mr. Wentworth saw the 
handle of the door begin to turn ; the door 
opened and remained slightly ajar, until FelLx 



XI . 347 

had delivered himself of the cheerful axiom 
just quoted. Then it opened altogether and 
Gertrude stood there. She looked excited ; 
there was a spark in her sweet, dull eyes. 
She came in slowly, but with an air of 
resolution, and, closing the door softly, 
looked round at the three persons present. 
Felix went to her with tender gallantry, 
holding out his hand, and Charlotte made a 
place for her on the sofa. But Gertrude put 
her hands behind her and made no motion 
to sit down. 

" We are talking of you ! " said Felix. 

" I know it," she answered. " That's why 
I came." And she fastened her eyes on her 
father, who returned her gaze very fixedly. 
In his own cold blue eyes there was a kind 
of pleading, reasoning light. 

" It is better you should be present," said 
Mr. Wentworth. " We are discussing your 
future." 

"Why discuss it?" asked Gertrude. 
" Leave it to me." 

" That is, to me ! " cried Felix. 



348 . . 

" I leave it, in the last resort, to a greater 
wisdom than ours," said the old man. 

Felix rubbed his forehead gently. " But 
en attendant the last resort, your father lacks 
confidence/' he said to Gertrude. 

" Haven't you confidence in Felix ? " 
Gertrude was frowning; there was something 
about her that her father and Charlotte had 
never seen. Charlotte got up and came to 
her, as if to put her arm round her; but 
suddenly, she seemed afraid to touch 
her. 

Mr. Wentworth, however, was not afraid. 
" I have had more confidence in Felix than 
in you," he said. 

" Yes, you have never had confidence in 
me — never, never ! I don't know why." 

" Oh sister, sister ! " murmured Charlotte. 

"You have always needed advice," Mr. 
Wentworth declared. " You have had a 
difficult temperament." 

" Why do you call it difficult ? It might 
have been easy, if you had allowed it. You 
wouldn't let me be natural. I don't know 



XI . 349 

what you wanted to make of me. Mr. 
Brand was the worst." 

Charlotte at last took hold of her sister. 
She laid her two hands upon Gertrude's arm. 
" He cares so much for you," she almost 
whispered. 

Gertrude looked at her intently an instant ; 
then kissed her. "No, he does not," she 
said. 

"I have never seen you so passionate," 
observed Mr. Wentworth, with an air of 
indignation mitigated by high principles. 

" I am sorry if I offend you," said Gertrude. 

" You offend me, but I don't think you 
are sorry." 

" Yes, father, she is sorry," said Charlotte. 

" I would even go further, dear uncle," 
Felix interposed. " I would question whether 
she really offends you. How can she offend 
you: 

To this Mr. Wentworth made no im- 
mediate answer. Then, in a moment, " She 
has not profited as we hoped." 

" Profited ? Ah voila ! " Felix exclaimed. 



C6 



350 . . 

Gertrude was very pale ; she stood looking 
down. " I have told Felix I would go away 
with him," she presehtly said. 

"Ah, you have said some admirable 
things ! " cried the young man. 

Go away^ sister ? " asked Charlotte. 
Away — away ; to some strange country." 

"That is to frighten you," said Felix, 
smiling at Charlotte. 

" To — what do you call it ? " asked 
Gertrude, turning an instant to Felix. " To 
Bohemia." 

"Do you propose to dispense with pre- 
liminaries ? " asked Mr. Wentworth, getting 
up. 

"Dear uncle, votes plaisantez!" cried 
Felix. "It seems to me that these are 
preUminaries." 

Gertrude turned to her father. "I have 
profited," she said. " You wanted to form 
my character. Well, my character is formed 
— for my age. I know what I want ; I have 
chosen. I am determined to marry this 
gendeman." 



xii.] . 351 

" You had better consent, sir/' said Felix, 
very gently. 

" Yes, sir, you had better consent," added 
a very different voice. 

Charlotte gave a little jump, and the 
others turned to the direction from which it 
had come. It was the voice of Mr. Brand, 
who had stepped through the long window 
which stood open to the piazza. He stood 
patting his forehead with his pocket-hand- 
kerchief; he was very much flushed; his 
face wore a singular expression. 

■ 

"Yes, sir, you had better consent," Mr. 
Brand repeated, coming forward. "I know 
what Miss Gertrude means." 

"My dear friend!" murmured Felix, 
laying his hand caressingly on the young 
minister's arm. 

Mr. Brand looked at him; then at Mr. 
Wentworth; lastly at Gertrude. He did 
not look at Charlotte. But Charlotte's 
earnest eyes were fastened to his own 
countenance ; they were asking an immense 
question of it. The answer to this question 



\ 

\ 



352 . . 

could not come all at once ; but some of the 
elements of it were there. It was one of the 
elements of it that Mr. Brand was very red, 
that he held his head very high, that he had 
a bright excited eye and an air of embarrassed 
boldness — ^the air of a man who has taken a 
resolve in the execution of which he appre- 
hends the failure, not of his moral, but of his 
personal, resources. Charlotte thought he 
looked very grand; and it is incontestable 
that Mr. Brand felt very grand. This, in 
tact, was the grandest moment of his life; 
and it was natural that such a moment 
should contain opportunities of awkwardness 
for a large, stout, modest young man. 

" Come in, sir," said Mr. Wentworth, with 
an angular wave of his hand. " It is very 
proper that you should be present." 

"I know what you are talking about," 
Mr. Brand rejoined. ^^I heard what your 
nephew said." 

^'And he heard what you said!" ex- 
claimed Felix, patting him again on the 
arm. 



3CII.J  353 

"I am not sure that I understood/' said 
Mr. Wentworth, who had angularity in his 
voice as well as in his gestures. 

Gertrude had been looking hard at her 
former suitor. She had been puzzled, like 
her sister; but her imagination moved more 
quickly than Charlotte's. "Mr. Brand 
asked you to let Felix take me away," she 
said to her father. 

The young minister gave her a strange 
look. " It is not because I don't want to 
see you any more," he declared, in a tone 
intended as it were for publicity. 

^*I shouldn't think you would want to 
see me any more," Gertrude answered, 
gently. 

Mr. Wentworth stood staring. "Isn't 
this rather a change, sir ? " he inquired. 
: " Yes, sir." And Mr. Brand looked, 
everywhere ; only still not at Charlotte, 
^*Yes, sir," he repeated. And he held 
his handkerchief a few moments to his 
Hps. 
'. "Where are our rnoral grounds? 



IQS 
A A 



354 . . 

demanded Mr. Wentworth, who had always 
thought Mr. Brand would be just the thing 
for a younger daughter with a peculiar 
temperament. 

"It is sometimes very moral to change, 
you know,'* suggested Felix. 

Charlotte had softly left her sister s side. 
She had edged gently toward her father, 
and now her hand found its way into his 
arm. Mr. Wentworth had folded up 
the Advertiser into a surprisingly small 
compass, and, holding the roll with one 
hand, he earnestly clasped it with the other. 
Mr. Brand was looking at him ; and yet, 
though Charlotte was so near, his eyes 
failed to meet her own. Gertrude watched 
her sister. 

"It is better not to speak of change," 
said Mr. Brand. " In one sense there is no 
change. There was something I desired- 
something I asked of you; I desire 
something still — I ask it of you." And 
he paused a moment; Mr. Wentworth 
looked bewildered. "I should like, in my 



XII.3 .' 355 

ministerial capacity, to unite this young 
couple." 

Gertrude, watching her sister, saw 
Charlotte flushing intensely, and Mr. 
Wentworth felt her pressing upon his arm. 
** Heavenly Powers ! " murmured Mr. Went- 
worth. And it was the nearest approach to 
profanity he had ever made. 

^^ That is very nice ; that is very hand^ 
some ! " Felix exclaimed. 

"I don't understand," said Mr. Went- 
worth; though it was plain that every one 
else did. 

*^That is very beautiful, Mr. Brand," said 
Gertrude, emulating Felix. 

^^I should like to marry you. It will 
give me great pleasure." 

*^ As Gertrude says, it's a beautiful idea," 
said Felix. 

Felix was smiling, but Mr. Brand was 

not even trying to. He himself treated 

his proposition very seriously, **I have 

thought of it, and I should like to do it,'* 

he affirmed. 

A a2 



3i6 ; Ich, 

Charlotte, meanwhile, was staring with 
expanded eyes. Her imagination, as I hare 
said, was not so rapid as her sister's, but now 
it had taken several little jumps, " Father," 
she murmured, " consent ! '' 

Mr. Brand heard her; he looked away. 
Mr. Wentworth, evidently, had no 
imagination at all. " I have always 
thought," he began, slowly, ^^that Ger- 
trude's character required a special line of 
development." 

" Father," repeated Charlotte, ^^ consent'^ 

Then at last Mr. Brand looked . at her. 
Her father felt her leaning more heavily 
upon his folded arm than she had ever done 
before ; and this, with a certain sweet faint- 
ness in her voice, made him wonder what 
Was the matter. He looked down at her 
and saw the encounter of her gaze with the 
young theologian*^ ; but even this told him 
'nothing and he continued ^o be bewildered. 
Nevertheless, "I consent," he said at last; 
'^^ since Mr.- Brand recomniends it/' 

" I should Kke to perform the ceremony 



XI .' 35? 

very soon, observed Mr. Brand, with a sort 
of solemn simplicity. 

" Come, come, that^s charming ! " cried 
Felix, profanely. 

Mr. Wentworth sank into his chair. 
" Doubtless, when you understand it," he 
said, with a certain judicial asperity. 

Gertrude went to her sister and led hef 
away, and Felix having passed his arm into 
Mr. Brand's and stepped out of the long 
window with him, the old man was left 
sitting there in unillumined perplexity. 

Felix did no work that day. In the 
afternoon, with Gertrude, he got into one 
of the boats, and floated about with idly- 
dipping oars. They talked a good deal of 
Mr. Brand — ^though not exclusively. 

"That was a fine stroke," said Felix. " It 
was really heroic." 

Gertrude sat musing, with her eyes 
upon the ripples. "That was what he 
wanted to be; he wanted to do something 
fine.^V 

"He won^t be comfortable till he has 



5S8 . . 

married us," said Felix. ^^So much the 
better/' 

"He wanted to be magnanimous; he 
wanted to have a fine moral pleasure. I 
know him so well/' Grertrude went on, 
Felix looked at her; she spoke slowly, 
gazing at the clear water. " He thought ot 
it a great deal, night and day. He thought 
it would be beautiful. At last he made up 
his mind that it was his duty, his duty to do 
just that — nothing less than that. He felt 
exalted; he felt sublime. That's how he 
likes to feel It is better for him than if I 
had listened to him." 

" It's better for me," smiled Felix. " But 
do you know, as regards the sacrifice, that I 
don't believe he admired you when this 
decision was taken quite so much as he had 
done a fortnight before ? " 

"He never admired me. He admires 
Charlotte; he pitied me. I know him so 
well." 

"Well, then, he didn't pity you so 
^luch.*' 



xiLl , 359 

Gertrade looked at Felix a little, smil- 
ing. "You shouldn't permit yourself," 
she said, "to diminish the splendour of 
his action. He admires Charlotte," she 
repeated. 

" That's capital ! " said Felix laughingly, 
and dipping his oars. I cannot say exactly 
to which member of Gertrude's phrase he 
alluded ; but he dipped his oars again, and 
they kept floating about. 

Neither Felix nor his sister, on that day, 
was present at Mr. Wentworth's at the 
evening repast. The two occupants of the 
chalet dined together, and the young man 
informed his companion that his marriage 
was now an assured fact. Eugenia congra- 
tulated him, and replied that if he were as 
reasonable a husband as he had been, on the 
wht)le, a brother, his wife would have nothing 
to complain of. 

Felix looked at ' her a moment, smiling. 
" I hope," he said, " not to be thrown back 
on my reason." 

" It is very true," Eugenia rejoined, " that 



360 : , 

one's reason is dismally flat. It's a bed with 
the mattress removed." 

But the brother and sister, later in the 
evening, crossed over to the larger house, 
the Baroness desiring to compliment her 
prospective sister-in-law. They found the 
usual circle upon the piazza, with the 
exception of Clifford Wentworth and Lizzie 
Acton; and as every one stood up as 
usual to welcome the Baroness, Eugenia 
had an admiring audience for her compli- 
ment to Gertrude. 

Robert Acton stood on the edge of the 
piazza, leaning against one of the white 
columns, so that he found himself next to 
Eugenia while she acquitted herself of a neat 
little discourse of congratulation. 

" I shall be so glad to know you better," 
she said ; " I have seen so much less of yoii 
than I should have liked. Naturally ; now 
I see the reason why ! You will love me a 
little, won't you ? I think I may say I gain 
on being known." And terminating these 
^observations with the softest cadence of her 



xn.l * 361 

voice, the Baroness imprinted a sort of grand 
official kiss upon Gertrude's forehead* 

Increased familiarity had not, to Ger- 
trude's imagination, diminished the myste- 
rious impressiveness of Eugenia's personality, 
and she felt flattered and transported by this 
little ceremony. Robert Acton also seemed 
to admire it, as he admired so many of 
the gracious manifestations of Madame 
Miinster's wit. 

They had the privilege of making him 
restless, and on this occasion he walked 
away, suddenly, with his hands in his 
pockets, and then came back and leaned 
against his column. Eugenia was now com- 
plimenting her uncle upon his daughter's 
engagement, and Mr. Wentworth was 
listening with his usual plain yet refined 
politeness. It is to be supposed that by this 
time his perception of the mutual relations 
of the young people who surroimded him 
had become more acute; but he still took 
the matter very seriously, and he was not at. 
all exhilarated. 



362 . . 

"Felix will make her a good huisband," 
said Eugenia. "He will be a charming 
companion; he has a great quality — 
indestructible gaiety." 

"You think that's a great quality?" 
masked the old man. 

Eugenia meditated, with her eyes upon 
his. "You think one gets tired of it, 
eh?" 

" I don't know that I am prepared to say 
that," said Mr. Wentworth. 

" Well, we will say, then, that it is tiresome 
for others but delightful for one's self. A 
woman's husband, you know, is supposed to 
be her second self; so that, for Felix and 
Gertrude, gaiety will be a common property.** 

"Gertrude was always very gay," said 
Mr. Wentworth. He was trying to follow 
this argument. 

Robert Acton took his hands out of his 
pockets and came a Uttle nearer to the 
Baroness. "You say you gain by being 
known," he said. "One certainly gains by 
knowing you." 



»!.] . 363 

"What have you gained?'* asked 
Eugenia. 

*^ An immense amount of wisdom.*' 

** That's a questionable advantage for a 
man who was already so wise ! " 

Acton shook his head. "No, I was a 
great fool before I knew you ! " 

"And being a fool you made my ac- 
quaintance ? You are very complimentary." 

"Let me keep it up," said Acton, laugh- 
ing. "I hope, for our pleasure, that your 
brother's marriage will detain you." 

"Why should I stop for my brother's 
marriage when I would not stop for my 
own ? " asked the Baroness. 

"Why shouldn't you stop in either case, 
now that, as you say, you have dissolved 
that mechanical tie that boimd you to 
Europe ? " 

The Baroness looked at him a moment. 
"As I say? You look as if you doubted 
it." 

"Ah," said Acton, returning her glance, 
" that is a remnant of my old folly ! We 



564 ^ tcH.' 

have Other attractions/' he added. "We 
are to have another marriage." 

But she seemed not to hear him; she 
was looking at him still. "My word was 
never doubted before," she said. 

"We are to have another marriage/' 
Acton repeated, smiling. 

Then she appeared to understand. 
"Another marriage?" And she looked at 
the others. Felix was chattering to Ger- 
trude ; Charlotte, at a distance, was watching 
them; and Mr. Brand, in quite another 
quarter, was turning his back to them and, 
with his hands under his coat-tails and his 
large head on one side, was looking at the 
small, tender crescent of a young moon. 
" It ought to be Mr. Brand and Chariotte,*' 
said Eugenia, "but it doesn't look like 



it." 



"There," Acton answered, "you must 
judge just now by contraries. There is 
more than there looks to be. I expect that 
combination one of these days; but that 
is not what I meant/' 



XII.I , 365 

" Well/' said the Baroness, " I never guess 
my own lovers; so I can't guess other 
people's," 

Acton gave a loud laugh, and he wa^ 
about to add a rejoinder when Mr. Went- 
worth approached his niece. ^^You will be 
interested to hear," the old man said, with 
a momentary aspiration toward jocosity, " of 
another matrimonial venture in our little 
circle." 

^*I was just telling the Baroness," Acton 
observed. 

^^Mr. Acton was apparently about to 
announce his own engagement," said 
.Eugenia. 

Mr. Wentworth's jocosity increased. ^^ It 
is not exactly that; but it is in the family. 
Clifford, hearing this morning that Mr. 
Brand had expressed a desire to tie the 
cnuptial knot for his sister, took it into his 
head to arrange that, while his hand was in, 
our good friend should perform a like 
::ceremoriy for himself and Lizzie Acton." 

The Baroness threw back her head and 



36d , [CH. 

smiled at her uncle ; then turning, with an 
intenser radiance, to Robert Acton, **I am 
certainly very stupid not to have thought of 
that," she said. Acton looked down at his 
boots, as if he thought he had perhaps 
reached the limits of legitimate experiment- 
ation, and for a moment Eugenia said 
nothing more. It had been, in fact, a sharp 
knock, and she needed to recover herself. 
This was done, however, promptly enough 
" Where are the young people ? " she asked. 

" They are spending the evening with my 
mother." 

^^ Is not the thing very sudden ? " 

Acton looked up. "Extremely sudden. 
There had been a tacit understanding; but 
within a day or two Clifford appears to have 
received some mysterious impulse to pre- 
cipitate the affair." 

"The impulse," said the Baroness, "was 
the charms of your very pretty sister." 

*^But my sister^s charms were an old 
story; he had always known her." Actoii 
had begun to experiment again. 



xxh] . 367 

Here, however, it was evident the Baroness 
would not help him. ^^ Ah, one can't say ! 
Clifford is very young; but he is a nice 
boy.*' 

" He's a likeable sort of boy, and he will 
be a rich man." This was Acton's last 
experiment ; Madame Miinster turned 
away. 

She made but a short visit and Felix took 
her home. In her little drawing-room she 
went almost straight to the mirror over the 
chimney-piece, and, with a candle uplifted, 
stood looking into it. "I shall not wait 
for your marriage/' she said to her 
brother. " To-morrow my maid shall pack 
up. 

''My dear sister," Felix exclaimed, ''we 
are to be married immediately ! Mr. Brand 
is too uncomfortable." 

But Eugenia, turning and still holding 
her candle aloft, only looked about the little 
sitting-room at her gimcracks and curtains 
and cushions. " My maid shall pack up," 
she repeated. " Bonte divine^ what rubbish ! 



36? ; , 

I feel like a strolling actress ; these are my 
^properties/" 

" Is the play over, Eugenia ? " asked 
Felix. 

She gave him a sharp glance, ^*I have 
spoken my part." 

" With great applause ! " said her 
brother. 

" Oh, applause — applause ! " she mur- 
mured. And she gathered up two or three 
of her dispersed draperies. She glanced 
at the beautiful brocade, and then, "I 
don't see how 1 can have endured it!" 
she said. 

^' Endure it a little longer. Come to my 
wedding." 

"Thank you; that's your affair. My 
affairs are elsewhere." 

'' Where are you going ? " 

" To Germany — by the first ship." 

"You have decided not to marry Mr. 
Acton?" 

" I have refused him," said Eugenia. 

Her brother looked at her in silence* 



XI . 371 

to her gracious bounty, admired this little 
incident extremely, and Robert Acton almost 
wondered whether it did not give him the 
right, as Lizzie's brother and guardian, 
to offer in return a handsome present to 
the Baroness. It would have made him 
extremely happy to be able to offer a hand- 
some present to the Baroness ; but he 
abstained from this expression of his senti- 
ments, and they were in consequence, at the 
very last, by so much the less comfortable. 
It was almost at the very last that he saw her 
— ^late the night before she went to Boston to 
embark. 

*^For myself, I wish you might have 
stayed," he said. *^But not for your own 
sake." 

" I don't make so many differences," said 
the Baroness. " I am simply sorry to be 
going." 

"That's a much deeper difference than 
mine," Acton declared ; '' for you mean you 
are simply glad ! " 

Felix parted with her on the deck of the 



370 . . 

come to seek was even less to be mistaken. 
It is true she had not made any very various 
exertion ; but she appeared to feel justified 
in generalizing — in deciding that the condi- 
tions of action on this provincial continent 
were not favourable to really superior 
women. The elder world was after all their 
natural field. The unembarrassed directness 
with which she proceeded to apply these 
intelligent conclusions appeared to the little 
circle of spectators who have figured in our 
narrative but the supreme exhibition of a 
character to which the experience of life had 
imparted an inimitable pliancy. It had a 
distinct effect upon Robert Acton, who, for 
the two days preceding her departure, was a 
very restless and irritated mortal. She 
passed her last evening at her uncle's, where 
she had never been more charming ; and in 
parting with Clifford Wentworth's affianced 
bride she drew from her own finger a 
curious old ring and presented it to her with 
the prettiest speech and kiss. Gertrude, 
who as an affianced bride was also indebted 



XI . 371 

to her gracious bounty, admired this little 
incident extremely, and Robert Acton almost 
wondered whether it did not give him the 
right, as Lizzie's brother and guardian, 
to offer in return a handsome present to 
the Baroness. It would have made him 
extremely happy to be able to offer a hand- 
some present to the Baroness; but he 
abstained from this expression of his senti- 
ments, and they were in consequence, at the 
very last, by so much the less comfortable. 
It was almost at the very last that he saw her 
— late the night before she went to Boston to 
embark. 

^^For myself, I wish you might have 
stayed," he said. "But not for your own 
sake." 

" I don't make so many differences," said 
the Baroness. " I am simply sorry to be 
going." 

"That's a much deeper difference than 
mine," Acton declared ; " for you mean you 
are simply glad ! " 

Felix parted with her on the deck of the 



372 . . 

ship. " We shall often meet over there/' he 
said. 

" I don't know/' she answered. ^^ Europe 
seems to me much larger than America." 

Mr. Brand, of course, in the days that 
immediately followed, was not the only 
impatient spirit ; but it may be said that ot 
all the young spirits interested in the event 
none rose more eagerly to the level of the 
occasion. Gertrude left her father's house 
with Felix Young ; they were imperturbably 
happy and they went far away. Clifford and 
his young wife sought their felicity in a 
narrower circle, and the latter's influence 
upon her husband was such as to justify, 
strikingly, that theory of the elevating effect 
of easy intercourse with clever women which 
Felix had propounded to Mr. Wentwordi. 
Gertrude was for a good while a distant 
figure, but she came back when Charlotte 
married Mr. Brand. She was present at the 
wedding feast, where Felix's gaiety confessed 
to no change. Then she disappeared, and 
the echo of a gaiety of her own, mingled 



XI . 373 

with that of her husband, often came back 
to the home of her earlier years. Mr. 
Wentworth at last found himself listening 
for it ; and Robert Acton, after his mother's 
death, married a particularly nice young 
girl 

